A 3
THE YEMASSEE.
A ROMANCE OF CAROLINA.
BY THE AUTHOR OF
GUY RIVERS, MARTIN FABER, &c.
IN TWO VOLUMES.
VOL. I.
CHAPTER I.
A scatter'd racea wild, unfetter'd tribe,
That in the forests dwellthat send no ships
For commerce on the watersrear no walls
To shelter from the storm, or shield from strife;
And leave behind, in memory of their name,
No monument, save in the dint, deep woods,
That daily perish as their lords have done
Beneath the keen stroke of the pioneer.
Let us look back upon their forest homes,
As, in that earlier time, when first their foes,
The pale-faced, from the distant nations came,
They dotted the green banks of winding streams.
There
is a small section of country now comprised
within the limits of Beaufort District, in the State of
South Carolina, which, to this day, goes by the name
of Indian Land. The authorities are numerous which
show this district, running along, as it does, and on its
southern side bounded by, the Atlantic Ocean, to have
been the very first in North America, distinguished by
an European settlement. The design is attributed to
the celebrated Coligni, Admiral of France,
[1]
[1]
Dr. Melligan, one of the historians of South Carolina, says
farther
,
that a French settlement, under the same auspices, was actually
made at Charleston, and that the country received the name of
La
Caroline, in honour of Charles IX. This is not so plausible, however,
for as the settlement was made by Huguenots, and under the auspices
of Coligni, it savours of extravagant courtesy to suppose that they
would pay so high a compliment to one of the most bitter enemies
of that religious toleration, in pursuit of which they deserted their
country. Charleston took its name from Charles IL, the reigning
English monarch at the time. Its earliest designation was Oyster
Point town, from the marine formation of its soil. Dr. Hewatt
another of the early historians of Carolina, who possessed many
advantages
in his work not common to other writers, having been a
careful gatherer of local and miscellaneous historyplaces the first
settlement of Jasper de Coligni, under the conduct of Jean Ribaud, at
the mouth of a river called Albemarle, which, strangely enough, the
narration finds in Florida. Here Ribaud is said to have built a fort,
and by him the country was called Carolina. May river, another
alleged place of original location for this colony, has been
sometimes
identified with the St. John's and other waters of Florida or
Virginia; but opinion in Carolina settles down in favour of a stream
still bearing that name, and in Beaufort District, not far from the
subsequent
permanent settlement. Old ruins, evidently French in their
origin, still exist in the neighbourhood.
who, in the
reign of Charles IX., conceived the project with the
ulterior
view of securing a sanctuary for the Huguenots,
when they should be compelled, as he foresaw they
soon would, by the anti-religious persecutions of the
time, to fly from their native into foreign regions. This
settlement, however, proved unsuccessful; and the
events which history records of the subsequent efforts
of the French to establish colonies in the same
neighbourhood
,
while of unquestionable authority, have all
the air and appearance of the most delightful romance.
It was not till an hundred years after, that the same
spot was temporarily settled by the English under
Sayle, who became the first governor, as he was the
first permanent founder of the settlement. The
situation
was exposed, however, to the incursions of the
Spaniards, who, in the meanwhile, had possessed
themselves
of Florida, and who, for a long time after,
continned
to harass and prevent colonization in this quarter.
But perseverance at length triumphed over all these
difficulties, and though Sayle, for farther security in the
infancy of his settlement, had removed to the banks of
the Ashley, other adventurers, by little and little,
contrived
to occupy the ground he had left, and in the year
1700, the birth of a white native child is recorded.
From the earliest period of our acquaintance with
the country of which we speak, it was in the
possession
of a powerful and gallant race, and their tributary
tribes, known by the general name of the Yemassees.
Not so numerous, perhaps, as many of the
neighbouring
nations, they nevertheless commanded the
respectful
consideration of all. In valour they made up for
any deficiencies of number, and proved themselves not
only sufficiently strong to hold out defiance to invasion,
but actually in most cases to move first in the assault.
Their readiness for the field was one of their chief
securities against attack; and their forward valour,
elastic temper, and excellent skill in the rude condition
of their warfare, enabled them to subject to their
dominion
most of the tribes around them, many of which
were equally numerous with their own. Like the
Romans, in this way they strengthened their own
powers by a wise incorporation of the conquered with
the conquerors; and, under the several names of
Huspahs, Coosaws, Combahees, Stonoees, and Sewees,
the greater strength of the Yemassees contrived to
command so many dependants, prompted by their
movements
,
and almost entirely under their dictation. Thus
strengthened, the recognition of their power extended
into the remote interior, and they formed one of the
twenty-eight aboriginal nations among which, at its
first settlement by the English, the province of
Carolina
was divided.
A feeble colony of adventurers from a distant world
had taken up its abode alongside of them. The
weaknesses
of the intruder were, at first, his only but
sufficient
protection with the unsophisticated savage. The
white man had his lands assigned him, and he trenched
his furrows to receive the grain on the banks of
Indian waters. The wild man looked on the
humiliating
labour, wondering as he did so, but without fear,
and never dreaming for a moment of his own
approaching
subjection. Meanwhile the adventurers grew daily
more numerous, for their friends and relatives soon
followed them over the ocean. They too had lands
assigned them, in turn, by the improvident savage; and
increasing intimacies, with uninterrupted security, day
by day, won the former still more deeply into the
bosom of the forests, and more immediately in
connexion
with their wild possessors; until, at length,
we behold the log-house of the white man, rising up
amid the thinned clump of woodland foliage, within
hailing distance of the squat, clay hovel of the savage.
Sometimes their smokes even united; and now and
then the two, the European and his dusky guide,
might be seen, pursuing, side by side and with the
same dog, upon the cold track of the affrighted deer or
the yet more timorous turkey.
Let us go back an hundred years, and more vividly
recall this picture. In 1715, the Yemassees were in
all their glory. They were politic and bravetheir
sway was unquestioned, and even with the Europeans,
then grown equal to their own defence along the coast,
they were ranked as allies rather than auxiliaries.
As such they had taken up arms with the Carolinians
against the Spaniards, who, from St. Augustine,
perpetually
harassed the settlements. Until this period they
had never been troubled by that worst tyranny of all,
the consciousness of their inferiority to a power of
which they were now beginning to grow jealous.
Lord Craven, the governor and palatine of Carolina,
had done much in a little time, by the success of his
arms over the neighbouring tribes, and the admirable
policy which distinguished his government, to impress
this feeling of suspicion upon the minds of the
Yemassees
.
Their aid had ceased to be necessary to
the Carolinians. They were no longer sought or
solicited. The presents became fewer, the borderers
grew bolder and more incursive, and new territory,
daily acquired by the colonists in some way or other,
drove them back for hunting-grounds upon the waters of
the Edistoh and Isundiga.
[2]
[2]
Such is the beautiful name by which the Yemassees knew the
Savannah river.
Their chiefs began to show
signs of discontent, if not of disaffection, and the great
mass of their people assumed a sullenness of habit
and demeanour, which had never marked their conduct
heretofore. They looked, with a feeling of aversion
which as yet they vainly laboured to conceal, upon the
approach of the white man on every side. The thick
groves disappeared, the clear skies grew turbid with
the dense smokes rolling up in solid masses from the
burning herbage. Hamlets grew into existence, as it
were by magic, under their very eyes and in sight of
2
their own towns, for the shelter of a different people;
and at length, a common sentiment, not yet imbodied
perhaps by its open expression, prompted the
Yemassees
in a desire to arrest the progress of a race
with which they could never hope to acquire any real
or lasting affinity. Another and a stronger ground for
jealous dislike, arose necessarily in their minds with
the gradual approach of that consciousness of their
inferiority
which, while the colony was dependant and
weak, they had not so readily perceived. But when
they saw with what facility the new comers could
convert
even the elements not less than themselves into
slaves and agents, under the guidance of the strong
will and the overseeing judgment, the gloom of their
habit swelled into ferocity, and their minds were busied
with those subtle schemes and stratagems with which,
in his nakedness, the savage usually seeks to
neutralize
the superiority of European armour.
The Carolinians were now in possession of the
entire sea-coast, with a trifling exception, which forms
the Atlantic boundary of Beaufort and Charleston
districts. They had but few, and those small and
scattered
,
interior settlements. A few miles from the
seashore
,
and the Indian lands generally girdled them in,
still in the possession as in the right of the aborigines.
But few treaties had yet been effected for the
purchase
of territory fairly out of sight of the sea; those
tracts only excepted which formed the borders of such
rivers, as, emptying into the ocean and navigable to
small vessels, afforded a ready chance of escape to
the coast in the event of any sudden necessity. In
this way, the whites had settled along the banks of
the Combahee, the Coosaw, the Pocota-ligo, and other
contiguous rivers; dwelling generally in small
communities
of five, seven, or ten families; seldom of more,
and these taking care that the distance should be slight
between them. Sometimes, indeed, an individual
adventurer
more fearless than the rest, drove his stakes,
and took up his lone abode, or with a single family, in
some boundless contiguity of shade, several miles from
his own people, and over against his roving neighbour;
pursuing in many cases the same errant life, adopting
many of his savage habits, and this too, without risking
much, if any thing, in the general opinion. For a long
season, so pacific had been the temper of the
Yemassees
towards the Carolinians, that the latter had finally
become regardless of that necessary caution which
bolts a door and keeps a watch-dog.
On the waters of the Pocota-ligo,
[3]
[3]
The Indian pronunciation of their proper names is eminently
musical; we usually spoil them. This name is preserved in Carolina,
but it wants the euphony and force which the Indian tongue gave it.
We pronounce it usually in common quantity. The reader will lay
the emphasis upon the penultimate, giving to the i the sound of
e
.
or Little Wood
river, this was more particularly the habit of the
settlement
.
This is a small stream, about twenty-five
miles long, which empties itself into, and forms one of
the tributaries of, that singular estuary called Broad
river; and thus, in common with a dozen other streams of
similar size, contributes to the formation of the
beautiful
harbour of Beaufort, which, with a happy propriety,
the French denominated Port Royal. Leaving the yet
small but improving village of the Carolinians at
Beaufort
,
we ascend the Pocota-ligo, and still, at intervals,
their dwellings present themselves to our eye
occasionally
on one side or the other. The banks, generally
edged with swamp and fringed with its low peculiar
growth, possess few attractions, and the occasional
cottage serves greatly to relieve a picture, wanting
certainly, not less in moral association than in the
charm of landscape. At one spot we encounter the
rude, clumsy edifice, usually styled the Block House,
built for temporary defence, and here and there
holding
its garrison of five, seven, or ten men, seldom of
more, maintained simply as posts, not so much with
the view to war as of warning. In its neighbourhood
we see a cluster of log dwellings, three or four in
number, the clearings in progress, the piled timber
smoking or in flame, and the stillness only broken by
the dull, heavy echo of the axe, biting into the trunk of
the tough and long-resisting pine. On the banks the
woodman draws up his
dug-out
or canoea single
cypress, hollowed out by fire and the hatchet;around
the fields the negro piles slowly the worming and
ungraceful
fence; while the white boy gathers fuel for the
pot over which his mother is bending in the preparation
of their frugal meal. A turn in the river unfolds to our
sight a cottage, standing by itself, half finished, and
probably deserted by its capricious owner. Opposite,
on the other bank of the river, an Indian dries his
bearskin
in the sun, while his infant hangs in the tree,
wrapped in another, and lashed down upon a board
(for security, not for symmetry), while his mother
gathers up the earth, with a wooden drag, about the
young roots of the tender corn. As we proceed, the
traces of the Indians thicken. Now a cot, and now a
hamlet, grows up before the sight, until, at the very
head of the river, we come to the great place of
council
and most ancient town of the Yemasseesthe
town of Pocota-ligo.
[4]
[4]
It may be well to say that the Pocota-ligo river, as here described,
would not readily be recognised in that stream at present. The
swamps are now reclaimed, plantations and firm dwellings take the
place of the ancient groves; and the bald and occasional tree only
tells us where the forests have been. The bed of the river has been
narrowed by numerous encroachments; and, though still navigable
for sloop and schooner, its fair proportions have become greatly
contracted
in the silent but successful operation of the last hundred
years upon it.
CHAPTER II.
Not in their usual trim was he arrayed,
The painted savage with a shaven head,
And feature, tortured up by forest skill,
To represent each noxious form of ill
And seem the tiger's tooth, the vulture's ravening bill.
The
great town of Pocota-ligo, as it was called
by the Yemassees, was the largest in their occupation.
Its pretensions were few, however, beyond its popu
lation, to rank under that title. It was a simple
collection
of scattered villages, united in process of time
by the coalition with new tribes and the natural
progress
of increase among them. They had other large
towns, however, nor least among these was that of
Coosaw-hatchie, or the refuge of the Coosaws, a
town established by the few of that people who had
survived the overthrow of their nation in a previous
war with the Carolinians. The city of refuge was
a safe sanctuary, known among the greater number
of our forest tribes, and not less respected with them
than the same institutions among the Hebrews.
[5]
[5]
These cities of refuge are, even now, said to exist among the
Cherokees. Certain rites, common to most of the Indian tribes, are
so clearly identical with many of those known to the Asiatics, that
an opinion has been entertained, with much plausibility and force,
which holds the North Americans to have come from the lost tribes
of Israel. Dr. Barton, in his Materia Medica, referring to some
traditions
of the Carolina Indians respecting their medical knowledge
of certain plants, holds it to be sufficient ground for the conjecture.
The theorists on this subject have even pointed out the route of
emigration from the east, by the way of Kamtschatka, descending
south along the shores of the Pacific to Cape Horn. The great
difficulty
,
however, is in accounting for the rapid falling back of any
people into such extreme barbarism, from a comparative condition of
civilization.
The
refuge of the Coosaws, therefore, became recognised
as such by all the Indians, and ranked, though of
inferior
size and population, in no respect below the
town of Pocota-ligo. Within its limitsthat is to say,
within the circuit of a narrow ditch, which had
carefully
prescribed the bounds around itthe murderer
found safety; and the hatchet of his pursuer, and the
club of justice, alike, were to him equally innocuous
while he remained within its protection.
The gray, soft teints of an April dawn had scarcely
yet begun to lighten the dim horizon, when the low
door of an Indian lodge that lay almost entirely
imbowered
in the thick forest, about a mile from
Pocota-ligo
,
was seen to unclose, and a tall warrior to
emerge slowly and in silence from its shelter, followed
by a handsome dog, something of a hound in his gaunt
person, but differing from the same animal in the
possession
of a head exceedingly short and compact.
The warrior was armed after the Indian fashion. The
long straight bow, with a bunch of arrows, probably
a dozen in number, suspended by a thong of deerskin,
hung loosely upon his shoulders. His hatchet or
tomahawk, a light weapon introduced by the colonists,
was slightly secured to his waist by a girdle of the
same material. His dress, which fitted tightly to his
person, indicated a frequent intercourse with the
whites; since it had been adapted to the shape of the
wearer, instead of being worn loosely as the bearskin
of preceding ages. Such an alteration in the national
costume was found to accord more readily with the
pursuits of the savage than the flowing garments
which he had worn before. Until this improvement
he had been compelled, in battle or the chase, to
throw aside the cumbrous covering which neutralized
his swiftness, and to exhibit himself in that state of
perfect nudity, scarcely less offensive to the Indians
than to more civilized communities. The warrior
before
us had been among the first to avail himself of the
arts of the whites in the improvement of the costume;
and though the various parts of the dress were secured
together by small strings of the deer sinew, passed
rudely through opposite holes, every two having their
distinct tie, yet the imitation had been close enough to
answer all purposes of necessity, and in no way to
destroy the claim of the whites to the originating of
the improvement. He wore a sort of pantaloons, the
seams of which had been permanently secured in this
manner, made of tanned buckskin of the brightest
yellow, and of as tight a fit as the most punctilious
dandy in modern times would insist upon. An upper
garment, also of buckskin, made with more regard
to freedom of limb, and called by the whites a
hunting-shirt
,
completed the dress. Sometimes, such was
its make, the wearer threw it as a sort of robe
loosely across his shoulders; secured thus with
the broad belt, either of woollen cloth or of the same
material, which usually accompanied the garment.
In the instance of which we speak, it sat upon the
form of the wearer pretty much after the manner of a
modern gentleman's frock. Buskins, or as named
among them,
mocquasins
, also of the skin of the deer,
tanned, or in its natural state, according to caprice or
emergency, enclosed his feet tightly; and without any
other garment, and entirely free from the profusion of
gaudy ornaments so common to the degraded Indians
of modern times, and of which they seem so
extravagantly
fond, the habit of our new acquaintance may
be held complete. Ornament, indeed, of any
description
,
would certainly have done little, if any thing,
towards the improvement, in appearance, of the
individual
before us. His symmetrical personmajestic
portkeen, falcon eyecalm, stern, deliberate
expression
,
and elevated headwould have been
enfeebled
,
rather than improved, by the addition of beads
and gauds,the tinsel and glitter so common to the
savage now. His form was large and justly
proportioned
.
Stirring event and trying exercise had given
it a confident, free, and manly carriage, which the air
of decision about his eye and mouth admirably tallied
with and supported. He might have been about fifty
years of age; certainly he could not have been less;
though we arrive at this conclusion rather from the
strong, acute, and sagacious expression of his features
than from any mark of feebleness or age. Unlike the
Yemassees generally, who seem to have been of an
elastic and frank temper, the chieffor he is such
under our view, seemed one, like Cassius, who had
learned to despise all the light employs of life, and
now only lived in the constant meditation of deep
scheme and subtle adventure. He moved and looked
as one with a mind filled to overflowing with
restless
thought, whose spirit, crowded with impetuous
feelings, kept up constant warfare with the more
deliberate
and controlling reason.
Thus appearing, and followed closely by his dog,
advancing from the shelter of his wigwam, he drew
tightly the belt about his waist, and feeling carefully
the string of his bow, as if to satisfy himself that it
was unfrayed and could be depended upon, prepared
to go forth into the forest. He had proceeded but a
little distance, however, when, as if suddenly
recollecting
something he had forgotten, he returned
hurriedly
to the dwelling, and tapping lightly upon the
door which had been closed upon his departure,
spoke as follows to some one within:
The knife, Matiwan, the knife.
He was answered in a moment by a female voice;
the speaker, an instant after, unclosing the door and
handing him the instrument he requiredthe long
knife, something like the modern case-knife, which,
introduced
by the whites, had been at once adopted by
the Indians, as of all other things that most necessary
to the various wants of the hunter. Sometimes the
name of the Long Knife was conferred by the Indians,
in a complimentary sense, upon the English, in due
acknowledgment of the importance of their gift.
Protected
,
usually, as in the present instance, by a
leathern
sheath, it seldom or never left the person of its
owner. The chief received the knife, and placed it
along with the tomahawk in the belt around his waist.
He was about to turn away, when the woman, but a
glimpse of whose dusky but gentle features and dark
eyes, appeared through the half-closed door, addressed
him in a sentence of inquiry, in their own language,
only remarkable for the deep respectfulness of its
tone.
Sanutee,the chief, will he not come back with
the night?
He will come, Matiwanhe will come. But the
lodge of the white man is in the old house of the deer,
and the swift-foot steals off from the clear water where
he once used to drink. The white man grinds his corn
with the waters, and the deer is afraid of the noise.
Sanutee will hunt for him in the far swampsand the
night will be dark before he comes back to Matiwan.
Sanuteechief, she again spoke in a faltering
accent, as if to prepare the way for something else,
of the success of which she seemed more doubtful;
but she paused without finishing the sentence.
Sanutee has ears, Matiwanears always for
Matiwan, was the encouraging response, in a manner
and tone well calculated to confirm the confidence
which the language was intended to inspire. Half
faltering still, she however proceeded:
The boy, Sanuteethe boy, Occonestoga
He interrupted her, almost fiercely.
Occonestoga is a dog, Matiwan; he hunts the slaves
of the English in the swamp, for strong drink. He
is a slave himselfhe has ears for their lieshe
believes
in their forked tongues, and he has two voices
for his own people. Let him not look into the lodge of
Sanutee. Is not Sanutee the chief of the Yemassee?
Sanutee is the great chief. But Occonestoga is
the son of Sanutee
Sanutee has no son
But Matiwan, Sanutee
Matiwan is the woman who has lain in the bosom
of Sanutee; she has dressed the venison for Sanutee
when the great chiefs of the Charriquees
[6]
[6]
The name of the Cherokees is thus written in some of the old
documents of South Carolina.
sat at his
board. Sanutee hides it not under his tongue. The
Yemassees speak for Matiwanshe is the wife of
Sanutee.
And mother of Occonestoga, exclaimed the woman,
hurriedly.
No! Matiwan must not be the mother to a dog.
Occonestoga goes with the English to bite the heels
of the Yemassee.
Is not Occonestoga a chief of Yemassee? asked
the woman.
Ha! look, Matiwanthe great Manneyto has bad
spirits that hate him. They go forth and they fear
him, but they hate him. Is not Opitchi-Manneyto
The Yemassee Evil Principle.
a
bad spirit?
Sanutee says.
But Opitchi-Manneyto works for the good spirit.
He works, but his heart is badhe loves not the
work, but he fears the thunder. Occonestoga is the
bad servant of Yemassee: he shall hear the thunder,
and the lightning shall flash in his path. Go, Matiwan,
thou art not the mother of a dog. GoSanutee will
come back with the night.
The eye of the woman was suffused and full of
appeal, as the chief turned away sternly, in a manner
which seemed to forbid all other speech. She watched
him silently as he withdrew, until he was hidden from
sight by the interposing forest, then sunk back
sorrowfully
into the lodge to grieve over the excesses of an
only son, exiled by a justly incensed father from the
abode of which he had been the blessing and the
pride.
Sanutee, in the meanwhile, pursued his way silently
through a narrow by-path, leading to the town of
Pocota-ligo
,
which he reached after a brief period. The
town lay in as much quiet as the isolated dwelling he
had left. The sun had not yet arisen, and the
scattered
dwellings, built low and without closeness or
order, were partly obscured from sight by the
untrimmed
trees, almost in the original forest, which shut
them in. A dog, not unlike his own, growled at him
as he approached one of the more conspicuous
dwellings
,
and this was the only sound disturbing the
general
silence. He struck quickly at the door, and
inquired
briefly
Ishiagaskahe will go with Sanutee.
A boy came at the sound, and in reply, pointing to
the woods, gave him to understandwhile one hand
played with the handle of the chief's knife, which he
continued to draw from and thrust back into its sheath,
without interruption from the wearerthat his father
had already gone forth. Without further pause or
inquiry
,
Sanutee turned, and taking his way through the
body of the town, soon gained the river. Singling
forth a canoe, hollowed out from a cypress, and which
lay with an hundred others drawn up upon the miry
bank, he succeeded with little exertion in launching it
forth into the water, and taking his place upon a seat
fixed in the centre, followed by his dog, with a small
scull or flap-oar, which he transferred with wonderful
dexterity from one hand to the other as he desired to
regulate his course, he paddled himself directly across
the river, though then somewhat swollen and
impetuous
from a recent and heavy freshet. Carefully
concealing
his canoe in a clustering shelter of sedge and
cane, which grew along the banks, he took his way,
still closely followed by his faithful dog, into the
bosom of a forest much more dense than that which
he had left, and which promised a better prospect of
the game which he desired.
CHAPTER III.
The red-deer pauses not to crush
The broken branch and withered bush,
And scarcely may the dry leaves feel
His sharp and sudden hoof of steel;
For, startled in the scatter'd wood,
In fear he seeks the guardian flood,
Then in the forest's deepest haunt,
Finds shelter and a time to pant.
What
seemed the object of the chief Sanutee, the
most wise and valiant among the Yemassees? Was
it gamewas it battle? To us objectless, his course
nevertheless lay onward and alone. It was yet early
day, and though here and there inhabited, no human
being save himself seemed stirring in that dim region.
His path wound about and sometimes followed the
edge of a swamp or bayou, formed by a narrow and
turbid creek, setting in from the river and making one
of the thousand indentions common to all streams
coursing through the level flats of the southern
country
.
He occupied an hour or more in rounding this
bayou; and then, with something of directness in his
progress, he took his way down the river bank and
towards the settlement of the whites. Yet their abodes
or presence seemed not his object. Whenever, here
and there, as he continued along the river, the larger
clay hovel of the pioneer met his sight, shooting up
beyond the limits of civilization, and preparing the way
for its approach, the Indian chief would turn aside
from the prospect with ill-concealed disgust.
He would the plain
Lay in its tall old groves again.
Now and then, asperched on some elevated bank,
and plying the mysteries of his woodcraft, hewing his
timber, clearing his land, or breaking the earththe
borderer rose before his glance, in the neighbourhood
of his half-finished wigwam, singing out some cheery
song of the old country, as much for the strengthening
of his resolve as for the sake of the music, the
warrior
would dart aside into the forest, not only out of
sight but out of hearing, nor return again to the road
he was pursuing until fairly removed from the chance
of a second contact. This desire, however, was not
so readily indulged; for the progress of adventure and
the long repose from strife in that neighbourhood had
greatly encouraged the settlers; and it was not so easy
for Sanutee to avoid the frequent evidences of that
enterprise
among the strangers, which was the chief
cause of his present discontent. Though without
any thing which might assure us of the nature or the
mood at work within him, it was yet evident enough
that the habitations and presence of the whites brought
him nothing but disquiet. He was one of those
persons
,
fortunately for the species, to be found in every
country, who are always in advance of the masses
clustering around them. He was a philosopher not
less than a patriot, and saw, while he deplored, the
destiny which awaited his people. He well knew that
the superior must necessarily be the ruin of the race
which is inferiorthat the one must either sink its
existence in with that of the other, or it must perish.
He was wise enough to see, that in every case of a
leading difference betwixt classes of men, either in
colour or organization, such difference must only and
necessarily eventuate in the formation of castes; and
the one conscious of any inferiority, whether of
capacity
or of attraction, so long as they remain in
propinquity
with the other, will tacitly become instruments
and bondmen. Apart from this foreseeing reflection,
Sanutee had already experienced many of those
thousand
forms of assumption and injury on the part of the
whites, which had opened the eyes of many of his
countrymen, and taught them, not less than himself, to
know, that a people, once conscious of their
superiority
,
will never be found to hesitate long in its
despotic
exercise over their neighbours. An abstract
standard of justice, independent of appetite or
circumstance
,
has not often marked the progress of Christian
(so called) civilization, in its proffer of its great good
to the naked savage. The confident reformer, who
takes sword in one hand and sacrament in the other,
has always found it the surest way to rely chiefly on
the former agent. Accordingly, it soon grew apparent
to the Yemassees, that, while proposing treaties for
the purchase of their lands, the whites were never so
well satisfied, as when, by one subtlety or another, they
contrived to overreach them. Nor was it always that
even the show of justice and fair bargaining was
preserved
by the new comer to his dusky brother. The
irresponsible adventurer, removed from the immediate
surveillance
of society, committed numberless petty
injuries upon the property, and sometimes upon the
person of his wandering neighbour, without being often
subject to the penalties awarded by his own people for
the punishment of such offenders. From time to time,
as the whites extended their settlements, and grew
confident
in their increasing strength, did their
encroachments
go on; until the Indians, originally gentle and
generous enough, provoked by repeated aggression,
were not unwilling to change their habit for one of
Vol. I.B 3
strife and hostility, at the first convenient opportunity.
At the head of those of the Yemassees entertaining
such a feeling, Sanutee stood pre-eminent. A chief
and warrior, having influence with the nation, and once
exercising it warmly in favour of the English, he had,
however, come to see farther than the rest of his
people
the degradation which was fast dogging their
footsteps
.
To the ultimate consequences his mind
therefore
gave itself up, and was now employed in the
meditation of all those various measures of relief and
redress, which would naturally suggest themselves to
a resolute and thinking spirit, warmed by patriotism
and desirous of justice. We shall see, in the sequel,
how deeply he had matured the remedy, and how
keenly he had felt the necessity calling for its
application
.
At length he came to a cottage more tastefully
constructed
than the rest, having a neat veranda in
front, and half concealed by the green foliage of a
thickly clustering set of vines. It was the abode of
the Rev. John Matthews,
[7]
[7]
One of the express conditions upon which the original patent of
Charles II. was granted to the lord proprietors of Carolina, was their
promulgation of the gospel among the Indians. Upon this
charitable
object the mission of Mr. Matthews was undertaken, though it
may be well to add, that one of the grounds of objection made
subsequently
to the proprietary charter was the neglect of the duty.
An objection not so well founded when we consider the difficulties
which the roving habits of the savages must at all times and of
necessity
throw in the way of such labours.
an old English Puritan,
who had settled there with his wife and daughter, and
officiated occasionally as a pastor, whenever a
collection
of his neighbours gave him an opportunity to
exhort. He was a stern and strict, but a good old
man. He stood in the veranda as Sanutee came in
sight. The moment the chief beheld him, he turned
away with a bitter countenance, and resolutely
avoiding
the house until he had gone around it, took no
manner of heed of the friendly hail which the old
pastor had uttered on seeing him approach.
Thus pursuing a winding route, and as much as
possible keeping the river banks, while avoiding the
white settlements, the Indian warrior had spent several
hours since his first departure. He could not well be
said to look for game, though, possibly, as much
from habit as desire, he watched at intervals the fixed
gaze of his keenly scented dog, as it would be
concentrated
upon the woods on either sidenow hearing and
encouraging his cry, as he set upon the track of deer
or turkey, and pursuing digressively the occasional
route of the animal whenever it seemed to the chief
that there was any prospect of his success. As yet,
however, the chase, such as it was, had resulted in
nothing. The dog would return from cover, forego the
scent, and sluggishly, with drooping head and indolent
spirit, silently trip along either before or behind his
master.
It was about mid-day when the chief rested beside a
brooklet, or, as it is called in the south, a branch, that
trickled across the path; and taking from the leathern
pouch which he carried at his side a strip of dried
venison, and a small sack of parched Indian meal, he
partook of the slight repast which his ramble had made
grateful enough. Stooping over the branch, he slaked
his thirst from the clear waters, and giving the residue
of his eatables to the dog, who stood patiently beside
him, he prepared to continue his forward progress.
It was not long before he reached the Block House
of the settlersthe most remote garrison station of the
English upon that river. It had no garrison at this
time, however, and was very much out of repair.
Such had been the friendship of the Yemassees
heretofore with the Carolinians, that no necessity
seemed to exist, in the minds of the latter, for
maintaining
it in better order. The Block House marked
the rightful boundary of the whites upon the river.
Beyond this spot, they had as yet acquired no claim of
territory; and hitherto the Indians, influenced chiefly
by Sanutee and other of their chiefs, had resolutely
refused
to make any further conveyance, or enter into
any new treaty for its disposal. But this had not
deterred
the settlers, many of whom had gone
considerably
B 2
beyond the limit, and suffered no interruption.
All of these were trespassers, therefore, and in a matter
of right would have been soon dispossessed; but in
the event of such an effort, no treaty would have been
necessary to yield sufficient sanction to the
adventurers
for a defence by arms of their possessions; and
many of the borderers so obtruding were of a class to
whom the contiguity of the Indians was quite as
grateful
,
and probably as safe, as that of their own colour.
In the neighbourhood of the Block House, however,
the settlements had been much more numerous. The
families, scattered about at a distance of two, three, or
four miles from one another, could easily assemble in
its shelter in the chance of any difficulty. The fabric
itself was chiefly constructed for such uses; and could
with comparative ease be defended by a few stout
hearts and hands, until relief could reach them from
their brethren on the coast. Though not upon the
river, yet the distance of this fortress from it was
inconsiderable
a
mile or more, perhaps, and with an
unobstructed path to a convenient landing. Retreat
was easy, therefore, in this way, and succours by the
same route could reach them, though all the woods
around were filled with enemies. It was built after a
prevailing fashion for such buildings at the time. An
oblong square of about an acre was taken in by a
strong line of pickets, giving an area upon either end
of the building, but so narrow that the pickets in front
and rear actually made up parts of the fabric, and
were immediately connected with its foundation
timbers
.
The house consisted of two stories, the upper
being divided by a thick partition into two apartments,
with a clumsy window of about three feet square in
each. These two windows fronted either end of the
building, and beyond these there were no other
apertures
than those provided for musket shooting. The
lower story formed but a single hall, from which
ladders
ascended by distinct openings into the upper
apartments. A line of small apertures, made at proper
intervals in the walls below, served also for the use of
muskets against an approaching enemy. The house
was built of pine logs, put together as closely as the
nature of the material and the skill of the artificers
would permit; and, save through the apertures and
windows described, was impervious to a musket bullet.
It was sufficiently spacious for the population of the
country, as it then stood, and the barrier made by
the high pickets on either side was itself no mean
resistance in a sudden fray. A single entrance to the
right area gave access to the building, through a door,
the only one which it possessed, opening in that
quarter. The gate was usually of oak, but in the
present instance it was wanting entirely, having been
probably torn off and carried away by some of the
borderers, who found more use for it than for the
fortress
.
In sundry respects besides, the friendly
relations
existing between the whites and Indians had
contributed to its dilapidation, and the want of trifling
occasional repairs had not immaterially helped its
decay.
From the Block House, which Sanutee examined
both within and without with no little attention and
some show of discontent, he proceeded towards the
river. A little duck-like thinga sort of half schooner,
but of very different management and rigging, lay in
the stream, seemingly at anchor. There was no show
of men on board, but at a little distance from her a
boat rowed by two sailors, and managed by a third,
was pulling vigorously up stream. The appearance
of this vessel, which he had now seen for the first
time, seemed to attract much of his attention; but as
there was no mode of communication, and as she
showed no flag, he was compelled to stifle his curiosity,
from whatever cause it might have sprung. Leaving the
spot, therefore, after a brief examination, he plunged
once more into the forest, and as he took his way
homeward, with more seeming earnestness than before,
he urged his dog upon the scent, while unslinging his
bow, and tightening the sinew until the elastic yew
trembled at the slight pressure which he gave it; then
choosing carefully the arrows, three in number, which
he released from the string which bound the rest, he
seemed now for the first time to prepare himself in
good earnest for the hunt. In thus wandering from
cover to cover, he again passed the greater number of
the white settlements, and in the course of a couple of
hours, had found his way to a spacious swamp, formed
by the overflow of the river immediately at hand, and
familiarly known to the warrior as a great hiding-place
for game. He perceived at this point that the senses
of the intelligent dog became quickened and forward,
and grasping him by the slack skin of the neck, he led
him to a tussock running along at the edge of the
swamp, and in a zigzag course passing through it, and
giving him a harking cheer common to the hunters, he
left him and made a rapid circuit to an opposite point,
where a ridge of land, making out from the bosom of
the swamp, and affording a freer outlet, was generally
known as a choice stand for the affrighted and fugitive
deer. He had not long reached the point and taken
cover, before, stooping to the earth, he detected the
distant
baying of the dog, in anxious scent, keeping a
direct course, and approaching, as was the usual habit,
along the little ridge upon the border of which he
stood. Sinking back suddenly from sight, he crouched
beside a bush, and placing his shaft upon the string,
and giving all ear to the sounds which now continued
to approach, he stood in readiness for his victim. In
another moment and the boughs gave way, the broken
branches were whirled aside in confusion, and breaking
forth with headlong bound and the speed of an arrow,
a fine buck of full head rushed down the narrow ridge
and directly on the path of the Indian. With his
appearance
the left foot of the hunter was advanced, the
arrow was drawn back until the barb chafed upon the
elastic yew, then whizzing, with a sharp twang and most
unerring direction, it penetrated in another instant the
brown sides of the precipitate animal. A convulsive and
upward leap testified the sudden and sharp pang which
he felt; but he kept on, and just at the moment when
Sanutee, having fitted another arrow, was about to
complete what he had so well begun, a gunshot rung
from a little copse directly in front of him, to which the
deer had been flying for shelter; and, with a reeling
stagger which completely arrested his unfinished leap,
the victim sunk, sprawling forward upon the earth, in
the last agonies of death.
CHAPTER IV.
This man is not of ushis ways are strange,
And his looks stranger. Wherefore does he come
What are his labours here, his name, his purpose,
And who are they that know and speak for him?
The
incident just narrated had scarcely taken place,
when the dog of the Indian chief bounded from the
cover, and made towards the spot where the deer lay
prostrate. At the same instant, emerging from the
copse whence the shot had proceeded, and which ran
immediately alongside the victim, came forward the
successful sportsman. He was a stout, strange
looking
person, rough and weather-beaten, had the air,
and wore a dress fashioned something like that of
the sailor. He was of middle stature, stout and
muscular
,
and carried himself with the yawing, see-saw
motion, which marks the movements generally upon
land of that class of men. Still, there was
something
about him that forbid the idea of his being a
common seaman. There was a daring insolence of
look and gesture, which, taken in connexion with the
red, full face, and the watery eye, spoke of
indulgences
and a habit of unrestraint somewhat
inconsistent
with one not accustomed to authority. His dress,
though that of the sailorfor even at that early period
the style of garment worn by this, differed from that
of all other classeswas yet clean, and made of the
finest material. He wore a blue jacket, studded
thickly with buttons that hung each by a link, and formed
so many pendent knobs of solid gold; and there
was not a little ostentation in the thick and repeated
folds of the Spanish chain, made of the same rich
material, which encircled his neck. His pantaloons,
free like the Turkish, were also of a light blue cloth,
and a band of gold lace ran down upon the outer seam
of each leg, from the hip to the heel. A small dirk,
slightly curved, like that worn by the young officers of
our navy in modern times, was the only apparent
weapon which he carried, beyond the short, heavy
Dutch fusil he had just used so successfully.
The deer had scarcely fallen when this personage
advanced
towards him from the wood. The shot had been
discharged at a trifling distance from the object, which
was pushing for the direct spot where the stranger
had been stationed. It had penetrated the breast, and
was almost instantly fatal. A few moments served to
bring him to his victim, while Sanutee from the other
end of the copse also came forward. Before either
of them had got sufficiently nigh to prevent him, the
dog of the chief, having reached the deer, at once,
with the instinct of his nature, struck his teeth into
his throat, tearing it voraciously for the blood, which
the Indian sportsmen invariably taught him to relish.
The stranger bellowed to him with the hope to
arrest his appetite, and prevent him from injuring the
meat; but, accustomed as the dog had been to obey
but one master, and to acknowledge but a single
language
,
he paid no attention to the cries and threats of
the seaman, who now, hurrying forward with a show
of more unequivocal authority, succeeded only in
transferring
the ferocity of the dog from his prey to himself.
Lifting his gun, he threatened but to strike, and the
animal sprang furiously upon him. Thus assailed, the
stranger, in good earnest, with a formidable blow from
the butt of his fusil, sent the enemy reeling; but
recovering
in an instant, without any seeming
abatement
of vigour, with a ferocity duly increased from
his injury, he flew with more desperation than ever to
the assault, and, being a dog of considerable strength,
threatened to become a formidable opponent. But
the man assailed was a cool, deliberate person, and
familiar with enemies of every description.Adroitly
avoiding the dash made at his throat by the animal, he
contrived to grapple with him as he reached the earth,
and by a single hand, with an exercise of some of
the prodigious muscle which his appearance showed
him to possess, he held him down, while with the
other hand he deliberately released his dirk from its
sheath. Sanutee, who was approaching, and who had
made sundry efforts to call off the infuriated dog, now
cried out to the seaman in broken English, Knife him
not, white manit is good dog, knife him not. But
he spoke too late; and in spite of all the struggles
of the animal, with a fierce laugh of derision, the
sailor passed the sharp edge of the weapon over his
throat; then releasing his hold upon him, which all
the while he had maintained with the most iron
inflexibility
of nerve, he left the expiring dog, to which the
stroke had been fatal, to perish on the grass.
It was fortunate for himself that he was rid of the
one assailant so soon; for he had barely returned his
knife to its sheath, and resumed his erect posture, when
Sanutee, who had beheld the whole strugglewhich,
indeed, did not occupy but a few minutesplunged
forward
as furiously as the animal had done, and the next
instant was upon the stranger. The Indian had
hurried
forward to save his dog; and his feelings, roused
into rage by what he had witnessed, took from him
much of that cautious consideration, at the moment,
which an Indian commonly employs the more securely
to effect his revenge; and with a cry of ferocious
indignation
,
throwing aside the bow which rather impeded
his movements, he grappled the seaman with an
embrace
which might have compelled even the native
bear to cry quarter. But the sailor was bold and
fearless
,
and it was soon evident that Sanutee, though
muscular and admirably built, but tall and less com
B 3
pact, laboured of necessity under a disadvantage in the
close struggle which ensued, with one so much shorter
and more closely set. The conditions of the combat
seemed to be perfectly well understood by both
parties
;
for, with the exception of an occasional
exclamation
from one or the other in the first movements of
the struggle, no words passed between them. Their
arms were interlaced, and their bodies closely locked
for a desperate issue, without parley or
preparation
.
At first it would have been difficult to say
which of the two could possibly prove the better man.
The symmetry of the Indian, his manly height, and
free carriage, would necessarily incline the spectator
in his favour; but there was a knotted firmness, a
tough, sinewy bulk of body in the whole make of his
opponent, which, in connexion with his greater youth,
would bring the odds in his favour. If the sailor was
the stronger, however, the Indian had arts which for a
time served to balance his superiority; but Sanutee
was exasperated, and this was against him. His
enemy had all the advantage of perfect coolness, and
a watchful circumspection that seemed habitual, still
defeated in great part the subtleties of his
assailant
.
The error of Sanutee was in suffering impulse
to defeat reflection, which necessarily came too late,
once engaged in the mortal struggle. The Indian,
save in the ball-play, is no wrestler by habit. There
he may and does wrestle, and death is sometimes the
consequence of the furious emulation;
[8]
[8]
In a fair struggle, engaged in this manly exercise, to kill the
antagonist is legitimate with the Indians generally; all other forms
of murder call for revenge and punishment.
but such
exercise
is otherwise unpractised with the aborigines.
To regret his precipitation, however, was now of little
availto avoid its evils was the object.
One circumstance now gave a turn to the affair,
which promised a result decisive on one side or the
other. So close had been the grasp, so earnest the
struggle, that neither of them could attempt to free
and employ his knife without giving a decided
advantage
to his enemy; but in one of those
movements
which distorted their bodies, until the ground
was nearly touched by the knees of both, the knife of
the Indian warrior fell from its sheath, and lay beside
them upon the turf. To secure its possession was
the object, upon which, simultaneously as it were,
their eyes were cast; but duly with the desire came
the necessity of mutual circumspection, and so well
aware were they both of this necessity, that it is
probable
,
but for an unlooked-for circumstance, the battle
must have been protracted sufficiently long, by
exhausting
both parties, to have made it a drawn one.
The affair might then have ended in a compromise;
but it so happened, that in the perpetual change of
ground and position by the combatants, the foot of
Sanutee
at length became entangled with the body of
his dog. As he felt the wrinkling skin glide, and the
ribs yield beneath him, an emotion of tenderness, a
sort of instinct, operated at once upon him, and, as if
fearing to hurt the object, whose utter insensibility he
did not seem at that moment to recollect, he drew up
the foot suddenly, and endeavoured to throw it over
the animal. By separating his legs with this object,
he gave his adversary an advantage, of which he
did not fail to avail himself. With the movement
of Sanutee, he threw one of his knees completely
between
those of the warrior, and pressing his own huge
body at the same time forward upon him, they both
fell heavily, still interlocked, upon the now completely
crushed carcass of the dog. The Indian chief was
partially stunned by the fall, but being a-top, the sailor
was unhurt. In a moment, recovering himself from
the relaxed grasp of his opponent, he rose upon his
knee, which he pressed down heavily upon Sanutee's
bosom; the latter striving vainly to possess
himself
of the tomahawk sticking in his girdle. But his
enemy had too greatly the advantage, and was quite
too watchful to permit of his succeeding in this effort.
The whole weight of one knee rested upon the
instrument
,
which lay in the belt innocuous. With a fearful
smile, which spoke a ferocious exultation of spirit, in
the next moment the sailor drew the dirk knife from
his own side, and flourishing it over the eyes of the
defenceless Indian, thus addressed him:
And what do you say for yourself now, you
red-skinned
devil? Blast your eyes, but you would have
taken off my scalp for little or nothingonly because
of your confounded dog, and he at my throat too.
What if I take off yours?
The white man will strike, calmly responded the
chief, while his eyes looked the most savage
indifference
,
and the lines of his mouth formed a play of
expression
the most composed and natural.
Ay, damme, but I will. I'll give you a lesson to
keep you out of mischief, or I've lost reckoning of my
own seamanship. Hark ye now, you red devil
wherefore did you set upon me? Is a man's blood no
better than a dog's?
The white man is a dog. I spit upon him, was
the reply; accompanied, as the chief spoke, with a
desperate struggle at release, made with so much
earnestness
and vigour as almost for a few moments to
promise to be successful. But failing to succeed, the
attempt only served seemingly to confirm the savage
determination of his conqueror, whose coolness at
such a moment, more perhaps than any thing beside,
marked a character to whom the shedding of blood
seemed a familiar exercise. He spoke to the victim
he was about to strike fatally, with as much composure
as if treating of the most indifferent matter.
Ay, blast you, you're all alikethere's but one
way to make sure of you, and that is, to slit your gills
whenever there's a chance. I know you'd cut mine
soon enough, and that's all I want to know to make
me cut yours. Yet, who are youare you one of these
Yemassees? Tell me your name; I always like to
know whose blood I let.
Does the white man sleep?strike, I do not shut
my eyes to your knife.
Well, dn it, red-skin, I see you don't want to
get off, so here's at you, making a stroke of his
knife, seemingly at the throat of his victim. Sanutee
threw up his arm, but the aim in this quarter had been
a feint; for, turning the direction of the weapon, he
passed the sharp steel directly upon the side of the
warrior, and almost immediately under his own knee.
The chief discovered the deception, and feeling that
all hope was over, began muttering, with a seeming
instinct, in his own language, the words of triumphant
song, which every Indian prepares beforehand for the
hour of his final passage. But he still lived. The
blow was stayed: his enemy, seized by some one
from behind, was dragged backward from the body of
his victim by another and a powerful hand. The
opportunity to regain his feet was not lost upon the
Indian
,
who, standing erect with his bared hatchet, again
confronted his enemy, without any loss of courage,
and on a more equal footing.
CHAPTER V.
His eye hath that within it which affirms
The noble gentleman. Pray you, mark him well;
Without his office we may nothing do
Pleasing to this fair company.
The
sailor turned fiercely, dirk in hand, upon the
person who had thus torn him from his victim; but he
met an unflinching front, and a weapon far more
potent
than his own. The glance of the new comer, not
less than his attitude, warned him of the most perfect
readiness; while a lively expression of the eye, and
the something of a smile which slightly parted his lips,
gave a careless, cavalier assurance to his air, which
left it doubtful whether, in reality, he looked upon a
contest as even possible at that moment. The
stranger
was about thirty years old, with a rich European
complexion, a light blue eye, and features moulded
4
finely, so as to combine manliness with so much of
beauty as may well comport with it. He was
probably
six feet in height, straight as an arrow, and
remarkably
well and closely set. He wore a dress common
among the gentlemen of that period and placea sort
of compound garb, in which the fashion of the English
cavalier of the second Charles had been made to
coalesce
in some leading particulars with that which, in
the American forests, seemed to be imperatively called
for by the novel circumstances and mode of life
prevailing
in that region. The over-coat was of a dark
blue stuff, usually worn open at the bosom, and
displaying
the rich folds of the vest below, of a colour
suited to the taste of the wearer, but which on the
present occasion was of the purest white. The
underclothes
were of a light gray, fitting closely a person
which they happily accommodated and served
admirably
to display. His buskins were like those worn by
the Indians, but coming higher up the leg; and with a
roll just above the ankle, rather wider, but not unlike
that common to the modern boot. A broad buckskin
belt encircled his waist, and secured the doublet which
came midway down his thigh. In his hand he carried
a light masketoon, or smoothbore, of peculiarly
graceful
make for that period, and richly ornamented with
drops of silver let in tastefully along the stock, so as
to shape vaguely a variety of forms and figures. The
long knife stuck in his belt was the only other weapon
which he appeared to carry; and forming, as it does,
one of the most essential implements of woodcraft, we
may scarcely consider it under that designation. A
white Spanish hat, looped broadly up at one of the
sides, and secured with a small button of gold, rested
slightly upon his head, from which, as was the fashion
of the time, the brown hair in long clustering ringlets
depended about the neck.
The sailor, as we have said, turned immediately upon
the person who, so opportunely for Sanutee, had torn
him from the body of the Indian; but he encountered
the presented rifle, and the clicking of the cock assured
him of the readiness of him who held it to settle all
further strife. Apart from this, he saw that the new
comer was no childthat he was of not less powerful
make than the Indian, and with fewer years to subtract
from it. The single effort, too, by which he had been
drawn away from his victim, indicated the possession
of a degree of strength which made the sailor pause
and move cautiously in his advance upon the intruder.
Well, master, said the seaman, what is this
matter to you, that you must meddle in other men's
quarrels? Have you so many lives to spare that you
must turn my knife from the throat of a wild savage to
your own?
Put up your knife, good Pepperboxput it up
while you have permission, said the person so
addressed
,
very complaisantly, and thank your stars
that I came in time to keep you from doing what none
of us might soon undo. Know you not the chief
would you strike the great chief of the Yemassees
our old friend Sanuteethe best friend of the
English
?
And who the devil cares whether he be a friend
to the English or not? I don't; and would just as
lief cut his throat as yours, if I thought proper.
Indeedwhy you are a perfect Trojanpray who
are you, and where did you come from? was the
cavalier's
response to the brutal speech of the sailor, whom
every word of the last speaker seemed to arouse into
new fury, which he yet found it politic to restrain; for
a sense of moral inferiority, in breeding or in station,
seemed to have the effect of keeping down and
quelling
in some sort the exhibitions of a temper which
otherwise would have prompted him again to blows.
The pause which he made before responding to the
last direct inquiry, seemed given to reflection. His
manner became suddenly more moderate, and his
glance rested frequently and with an inquiring
expression
upon the countenance of the Indian. At
length, giving a direct reply to the interrogatory which
seemed a yielding of the strife, he replied,
And suppose, fair master, I don't choose to say
who I am, and from whence I came.What then?
Why then let it alone, my Hercules. I care little
whether you have a name or not. You certainly
cannot
have an honest one. For me you shall be
Hercules
or Nebuchadnezzaryou shall be Turk, or
Ishmaelite
,
or the devilit matters not whence a man comes
when it is easily seen where he will go.
The countenance of the sailor grew black with rage
at the language of the speaker, not less than at his
cool, laughing, contemptuous manner. But the
process
of thinking himself into composure and caution,
going on in his mind for necessary purposes, seemed
to teach him consideration; and leisurely proceeding
to reload his fusil, he offered no interruption to the
Englishman, who now addressed himself to the Indian.
You have suffered a loss, Sanutee, and I'm sorry
for it, chief. But you shall have anothera dog of
mine,a fine pup which I have in Charlestown. When
will you go down to see your English brother at
Charlestown?
Who is the brother of Sanutee?
The governoryou have never seen him, and he
would like to see you. If you go not to see him, he
will think you love him not, and that you lie on the
same blanket with his enemies.
Sanutee is the chief of the Yemasseeshe will
stay at Pocota-ligo with his people.
Well, be it so. I shall bring you the dog to
Pocota-ligo
.
Sanutee asks no dog from the warrior of the
English
.
The dog of the English hunts after the
darkskin
of my people.
No, nochief. I don't mean to give you Dugdale.
Dugdale never parts with his master, if I can help it;
but you say wrong. The dog of the English has never
hunted the Yemassee warrior. He has only hunted
the Savannahs and the Westoes, who were the
enemies
of the English.
The eyes of Sanutee are goodhe has seen the
dog of the English tear the throat of his brother.
Well, you will see the dog I shall bring you to
Pocota-ligo.
Sanutee would not see the young brave of the
English at Pocota-ligo. Pocota-ligo is for the
Yemassees
.
Let the Coosaw-killer come not.
Hah! What does all this mean, Sanutee? Are we
not friends? Are not the Yemassee and the English
two brothers, that take the same track, and have the
same friends and enemies? Is it not so, Sanutee?
Speaks the young chief with a straight tonguehe
says.
I speak truth; and will come to see you in
Pocota-ligo
.
Nothe young brave will come not to Pocota-ligo.
It is the season of the corn, and the Yemassee will
gather to the festival.
The green corn festival! I must be there,
Sanutee
,
and you must not deny me. You were not wont
to be so inhospitable, chief; nor will I suffer it now.
I would see the lodge of the great chief. I would
partake
of the venisonsome of this fine buck, which the
hands of Matiwan will dress for the warrior's board
at evening.
You touch none of that buck, either of you; so
be not so free, young master. It's my game, and had
the red-skin been civil, he should have had his share
in it; but, as it is, neither you nor he lay hands on
it; not a stiver of it goes into your hatch, dn me.
The sailor had listened with a sort of sullen
indifference
to the dialogue which had been going on
between
Sanutee and the new comer; but his looks
indicated
impatience not less than sullenness; and he
took the opportunity afforded him by the last words
of the latter, to gratify, by the rude speech just given,
the malignity of his excited temper.
Why, how now, churl? was the response of the
Englishman, turning suddenly upon the seaman, with
a haughty indignation as he spokehow now, churl?
is this a part of the world where civility is so plenty
that you must fight to avoid a surfeit. Hear you,
sirrah; these woods have bad birds for the unruly, and
you may find them hard to get through if you put not
more good-humour under your tongue. Take your
meat, for a surly savage as you are, and be off as
quick as you can; and may the first mouthful choke
you. Take my counsel, Bully-boy, and clear your
joints, or you may chance to get more of your merits
than your venison.
Who the devil are you, to order me off? I'll go at
my pleasure; and as for the Indian, and as for you
What, Hercules?
I'll mark you both, or there's no sea-room.
Well, as you please, coolly replied the
Englishman
to the threat,as you please; and now that you
have made your speech, will you be good-natured for
a moment, and let your absence stand for your civility?
NoI'll be dd if I do, for any man.
You'll be something more than dd, old boy, if
you stay. We are two, you see; and here's my
Hector
,
who's a little old to be sure, but is more than your
match nowand as the Englishman spoke, he
pointed
to the figure of a sturdy black, approaching the
group from the copse.
And I care not if you were two dozen. You
don't capsize me with your numbers, and I shan't go
till it suits my pleasure, for either red-skin, or white
skin, or black skin; no, not while my name is
What? was the inquiry of the Englishman, as
the speaker paused at the unuttered name; but the
person addressed smiled contemptuously at the
curiosity
which the other had exhibited, and turned slightly
away. As he did so, the Englishman again
addressed
Sanutee, and proposed returning with him to
Pocota-ligo. His anxiety on this point was clearly
enough manifest to the Indian, who replied sternly,
The chief will go alone. He wants not that the
Coosaw-killer should darken the lodge of Matiwan.
Let Harrisonand as he addressed the Englishman
by his name, he placed his hand kindly upon his
shoulder
,
and his tones were more conciliatorylet
Harrison
go down to his shipslet him go with the
pale-faces
to the other lands. Has he not a mother that
looks for him at evening?
Sanutee, said Harrison, fixing his eye upon him
curiouslywherefore should the English go upon
the waters?
The Yemassees would look on the big woods, and
call them their own. The Yemassees would be
free.
Old chief exclaimed the Englishman, in a
stern but low tone, while his quick, sharp eye seemed
to explore the very recesses of the Indian's soul
Old chiefthou hast spoken with the Spaniard.
The Indian paused for an instant, but showed no
signs of emotion or consciousness at a charge, which,
at that period, and under the then existing
circumstances
,
almost involved the certainty of his hostility
towards the Carolinians, with whom the Spaniards of
Florida were perpetually at war. He replied, after an
instant's hesitation, in a calm, fearless manner:
Sanutee is a manhe is a fatherhe is a chief
the great chief of the Yemassee. Shall he come
to the Coosaw-killer, and ask when he would loose
his tongue? Sanutee, when the swift hurricane runs
along the woods, goes into the top of the tall pine,
and speaks boldly to the Manneytoshall he not
speak to the Englishshall he not speak to the
Spaniard
?
Does Harrison see Sanutee tremble, that his eye
looks down into his bosom? Sanutee has no fear.
I know it, chiefI know itbut I would have
you without guile also. There is something wrong,
chief, which you will not show me. I would speak to
you of this, therefore I would go with you to
Pocota-ligo
.
Pocota-ligo is for the Manneytoit is holy ground
the great feast of the green corn is there. The white
man may not go when the Yemassee would be alone.
But white men are in Pocota-ligois not Granger
there, the fur trader?
He will go, replied the chief, evasively, and
turning
away, as he did so, to depart; but suddenly, with
an air of more interest, returning to the spot where
Harrison stood, seemingly meditating deeply, he again
touched his arm, and spoke
Harrison will go down to the great lakes with his
people. Does the Coosaw-killer hear? Sanutee is
the wise chief of Yemassee.
I am afraid the wise chief of Yemassee is about
to do a great folly. But, for the present, Sanutee, let
there be no misunderstanding between us and our
people
.
Is there any thing of which you complain?
Did Sanutee come on his knees to the English?
He begs not breadhe asks for no blanket.
True, Sanutee, I know all thatI know your
pride, and that of your people; and because I know
it, if you have had wrong from our young men, I
would have justice done you.
The Yemassee is not a childhe is strong, he
has knife and hatchetand his arrow goes straight to
the heart. He begs not for the justice of the English
Yet, whether you beg for it or not, what wrong
have they done you, that they have not been sorry?
Sorrywill sorry make the dog of Sanutee to
live?
There you are wrong, Sanutee; the dog assaulted
the stranger, and though he might have been more
gentle, and less hasty, what he did seems to have
been done in self-defence. The deer was his game.
Ha, does Harrison see the arrow of Sanutee?
and he pointed to the broken shaft still sticking in the
side of the animal.
True, that is your mark, and would have been fatal
after a time, without the aid of gunshot. The other
was more immediate in effect.
It is well. Sanutee speaks not for the meat, nor
for the dog. He begs no justice from the English,
and their braves may go to the far lands in their canoes,
or they may hold fast to the land which is the
Yemassee's
.
The sun and the storm are brothersSanutee
has said.
Harrison was about to reply, when his eye caught
the outline of another person approaching the scene.
He was led to observe him, by noticing the glance of
the sailor anxiously fixed in the same direction. That
personage had cooled off singularly in his savageness
of mood, and had been a close and attentive listener
to the dialogue just narrated. His earnestness had
not passed unobserved by the Englishman, whose
keenness
of sense, not less than of vision, had discovered
something more in the manner of the sailor than was
intended for the eye. Following closely his gaze,
while still arguing with Sanutee, he discovered in the
new comer the person of one of the most subtle
chiefs of the Yemassee nationa dark, brave,
collected
malignant, by name Ishiagaska. A glance of
recognition passed over the countenance of the sailor,
but the features of the savage were immoveable.
Harrison watched both of them, as the new comer
approached
,
and he was satisfied from the expression
of the sailor that they knew each other. Once assured
of this, he determined in his own mind that his
presence should offer no sort of interruption to their
freedom; and, with a few words to Ishiagaska and
Sanutee, in the shape of civil wishes and a passing
inquiry, the Englishman, who, from his past conduct
in the war of the Carolinians with the Coosaws, had
acquired among the Yemassees, according to the Indian
fashion, the imposing epithet, so frequently used in
the foregoing scene by Sanutee, of
Coosah-moray-te
or, as it has been Englished, the killer of the Coosaws
took his departure from the scene, followed by the
black slave Hector. As he left the group he
approached
the sailor, who stood a little apart from the Indians,
and with a whisper, addressed him in a sentence which
he intended should be a test.
Hark ye, Ajax; take safe advice, and be out of the
woods as soon as you can, or you will have a long
arrow sticking in your ribs.
The blunt sense of the sailor did not see further
than the ostensible object of the counsel thus conveyed,
and his answer confirmed, to some extent, the
previous
impression of Harrison touching his
acquaintance
with Ishiagaska.
Keep your advice for a better occasion, and be
dd to you, for a conceited whipper-snapper as you
are. You are more likely to feel the arrow than I am,
and so look to it.
Harrison noted well the speech, which in itself had
little meaning; but it conveyed a consciousness of
security on the part of the seaman, after his previous
combat with Sanutee, greatly out of place, unless he
possessed some secret resources upon which to rely.
The instant sense of Harrison readily felt this; but
apart from that, there was something so sinister and
so assured in the glance of the speaker,
accompanying
his words, that Harrison did not longer doubt the
justice of his conjecture. He saw that there was
business between the seaman and the last-mentioned
Indian. He had other reasons for this belief, which
the progress of events will show. Contenting
himself
with what had been said, he turned away with
a lively remark to the group at parting, and, followed
by Hector, was very soon deeply buried in the
neighbouring
forest.
CHAPTER VI.
Goscan his course, pursue him to the last,
Hear what he counsels, note thou well his glance,
For the untutored eye hath its own truth,
When the tongue speaks in falsehood.
Harrison
, followed closely by his slave, silently
entered the forst, and was soon buried in subjects
of deep meditation, which, hidden as yet from us,
were in his estimation of paramount importance. His
elastic temper and perceptive sense failed at this
moment to suggest to him any of those thousand
objects of contemplation in which he usually took
delight. The surrounding prospect was unseen
the hum of the woods, the cheering cry of bird and
grasshopper, equally unheeded; and for some time
after leaving the scene and actors of the preceding
chapter, he continued in a state of mental abstraction,
perfectly mysterious to his attendant. Hector, though
a slave, was a favourite, and his offices were rather
those of the humble companion than of the servant.
He regarded the present habit of his master with no
little wonderment. In truth, Harrison was not often
in the mood to pass over and disregard the varieties of
the surrounding scenery, in a world so new, as at the
present moment. On the contrary, he was one of
those men, of wonderful common sense, who could
readily, at all times, associate the mood of most
extravagance
and life with that of the most every-day
concern. Cheerful, animated, playfully and soon
excited
,
he was one of those singular combinations we
do not often meet with, in which constitutional
enthusiasm
and animal life, in a development of
extravagance
sometimes little short of madness, are singularly
enough mingled up with a capacity equal to the most
trying requisitions of necessity, and the most sober
habits of reflection. Unusually abstracted as he now
appeared to the negro, the latter, though a favourite,
knew better than to break in upon his mood, and
simply
kept close at hand, to meet any call that might be
made upon his attention. By this time they had
reached a small knoll of green overlooking the river,
which, swollen by a late freshet, though at its full and
falling, had overflowed its banks, and now ran along
with some rapidity below them. Beyond and down
the stream, a few miles off, lay the little vessel to
which we have already given a moment's attention.
Her presence seemed to be as mysterious in the eye
of Harrison, as in a previous passage it had appeared
to that of Sanutee. Dimly outlined in the distance,
a slender shadow darkening an otherwise clear and
mirror-like surface, she lay sleeping, as it were, upon
the water, not a sail in motion, and no gaudy ensign
streaming from her tops.
Hector, said his master, calling the slave, while
he threw himself lazily along the knoll, and motioned
the negro near him: Hector.
SaMossa.
You marked that sailor fellow, did you?
Yes, Mossa.
What is he; what do you think of him?
Me tink noting about 'em, sa.Nebber see 'em
aforeno like he look.
Nor I, Hectornor I. He comes for no good,
and we must see to him.
I tink so, Mossa.
Nowlook down the river. When did that strange
vessel come up?
Nebber see 'em till dis morning, Mossa, but speck
he come up yesserday. Mass Nichol, de doctor,
wha' talk so bigda him fuss show 'em to me dis
morning.
What said Nichols?
He say 'twas English ship; den he say 'twas no
English, 'twas Dutchbut he soon change he mind,
and say 'twas little Dutch and little Spaniard: after
dat he make long speech to young Mass Grayson.
What said Grayson?
He laugh at de doctor, make de doctor cross, and
den he cuss me for a dam black rascal.
That made you cross too, eh?
Certain, Mossa; 'cause Mass Nichol hab no
respectability
for nigger in 'em, and talk widout make
proper osservation.
Well, no matter. But did Grayson say any thing
of the vessel?
He look at 'em well, Mossa, but he no say noting;
but wid long stick he write letters in de sand. Dat
young Grayson, Mass Charleshe strange
gentleman
berry
strange gentleman.
How often must I tell you, Hector, not to call me
by any name here but Gabriel Harrison? will you
never remember, you scoundrel?
Ax pardon, Mossa'member next time.
Do so, old boy, or we quarrel:and now, hark
you, Hector, since you know nothing of this vessel,
I'll make you wiser. Look down over to Moccasin
Pointunder the long grass at the edge, and
half-covered
by the canes, and tell me what you see
there?
Da boat, Mossa.I swear da boat. Something
dark lie in de bottom.
That is a boat from the vessel, and what you see
lying dark in the bottom, are the two sailors that
rowed it up. That sailor-fellow came in it, and he is
the captain. Now, what does he come for, do you
think?
Speck, sa, he come for buy skins from de Injins.
No:that craft is no trader. She carries guns,
but conceals them with box and paint. She is built to
run and fight, not to carry. I looked on her closely
this morning. Her paint is Spanish, not English.
Besides, if she were English, what would she be
doing here? Why run up this river, without stopping
at Charlestown or Port Royalwhy keep from the
landing
here, avoiding the whites; and why is her officer
pushing up into the Indian country beyond our
purchase
?
He hab 'ting for sell de Injins, I speck, Mossa.
Scarcelythey have nothing to buy with; it is
only a few days since Granger came up from Port
Royal, where he had carried all the skins of their last
great hunt, and it will be two weeks at least before
they go on another. Nono. They get from us what
we are willing to sell them; and this vessel brings
them those things which they cannot get from us
fire-arms and ammunition, Hector.
You tink so, Mossa.
You shall find out for both of us, Hector. Are
your eyes open?
Yes Mossa, I can sing
Vol. I.C 5
`Possum up a gum-tree,
Racoon in de hollow,
In de grass de yellow snake,
In de clay de swallow.'
Evidence enoughnow, hear me. This sailor
fellow comes from St. Augustine, and brings arms
to the Yemassees. I know it, else why should he
linger behind with Sanutee and Ishiagaska, after his
quarrelling with the old chief, unless he knew of
something which must secure his protection? I saw
his look of recognition to Ishiagaska, although the
savage, more cunning than himself, kept his eye cold
andyes, it must be so. You shall go, said his
master, half musingly, half direct. You shall go.
When did Granger cross to Pocota-ligo?
Dis morning, Mossa.
Did the commissioners go with him?
No, Mossaonly tree gentlemans gone wid
him.
Who were they?
Sir Edmund Bellinger, salib close 'pon
Asheepoh
Mass
Stephen Latham, and nodderI no hab he
name.
Very wellthey will answer well enough for
commissioners. Where have you left Dugdale?
I leff um wid de blacksmith, Mossahim dat lib
down pass de Chief Bluff.
Good; and now, Hector, you must take track after
this sailor.
Off hand, Mossa?
Yes, at once. Take the woods here, and make
the sweep of the cypress, so as to get round them.
Keep clear of the river, for that sailor will make no
bones of carrying you off to St. Augustine, or to the
West Indies. Watch if he goes with the Indians.
See all that you can of their movements, and let them
not see you. Should they find you out, be as stupid
as a pine stump.
And whay I for find you, Mossa, when I come
back? At de parson's, I speck.The slave smiled
knowingly as he uttered the last member of the
sentence
,
and looked significantly into the face of his
master, with a sidelong glance, his mouth at the same
time showing his full white
tuscular
array from ear to
ear.
Perhaps so, said his master, quietly and without
seeming to observe the peculiar expression of his
servant's
faceperhaps so, if you come back soon. I
shall be there for a while, but to-night you will
probably
find me at the Block House. Away now, and see
that you sleep not with your eye open till they trap
you.
Ha, Mossa. Dat eye must be bright like de moon
for trap Hector.
I hope sokeep watchful, for if that sailor fellow
puts hands upon you, he will cut your throat as
freely as he did the dog's, and probably a thought
sooner.
Promising strict watchfulness, the negro took his
way back into the woods, closely following the
directions
of his master. Harrison, in the meanwhile,
having despatched this duty so far, rose buoyantly from
the turf, and throwing aside the air of sluggishness
which for the last half hour had invested him, darted
forward in a fast walk in the direction of the white
settlements; still, however, keeping as nearly as he
might to the banks of the river, and still with an eye
which closely scanned at intervals the appearance of
the little vessel which, as we have seen, had occasioned
so much doubt and inquiry. It was not often that a
vessel of her make and size had been seen up that
little, insulated river; and as, from the knowledge of
Harrison, there could be little or no motive of trade
for such craft in that quarterthe small business
intercourse
of the whites with the Indians being soon
transacted, and through mediums far less imposing
the suspicions of the Englishman were not a little
excited, particularly as he had known for some time
the increasing discontent of the savages. The fact,
too, that the vessel was a stranger, and that her crew
C2
and captain had kept studiously aloof from the whites,
and had sent their boat to land at a point actually
within the Indian boundary, was of itself enough to
instigate such surmises. The ready intelligence of
Harrison at once associated the facts and inferences
with a political object: and being also aware by
previous information that Spanish guarda-costas, as the
cutters employed at St. Augustine for the protection
of the coast were styled, had been seen to put into
almost every river and creek in the English territory
from St. Mary's to Hatteras, and within a short period
of time, the connected circumstances were well
calculated
to excite the scrutiny of all well-intentioned citizens.
The settlement of the English in Carolina, though
advancing with wonderful rapidity, was yet in its
infancy; and the great jealousy which their progress
had occasioned in the minds of their Indian neighbours,
was not a little stimulated in its tenour and
development
by the artifices of the neighbouring Spaniards,
as well of St. Augustine as of the Island of Cuba.
The utmost degree of caution against enemies so
powerful and so acted upon was absolutely necessary,
and we shall comprehend to its full the extent of this
consciousness, after repeated sufferings had taught
them providence, when we learn from the historians
that it was not long from this period when the settlers
upon the coast were compelled to gather oysters for
their subsistence with one hand, while carrying
fire-arms
in the other for their protection. At this time,
however, unhappily for the colony, such a degree of
watchfulness was entirely unknown. Thoughtless as
ever, the great mass is always slow to note and
prepare
against those forewarning evidences of that
change which is at all times going on around them.
The counsellings of nature and of experience are
seldom heeded by the inconsiderate many until their
promises are realized, and then beyond the control
which would have converted them into agents with the
almost certain prospect of advantageous results. It is
fortunate, perhaps, for mankind, that there are some few
minds always in advance, and for ever preparing the
way for society, perishing freely themselves that the
species may have victory. Perhaps, indeed, patriotism
itself would lack something of its stimulating character,
if martyrdom did not follow its labours and its love
for man.
Harrison, active in perceiving, decisive in providing
against events, with a sort of intuition, had traced out
a crowd of circumstances, of most imposing character
and number, in the coming hours, of which few if any
in the colony beside himself had any idea. He
annexed
no small importance to the seeming trifle; and
his mind was deeply interested in all the changes
going on in the province. Perhaps it was his
particular
charge to note these thingshis station, pursuit
his duty, which, by imposing upon him some of the
leading responsibilities of the infant society in which
he lived, had made him more ready in such an
exercise
than was common among those around him.
On this point we can now say nothing, being as yet
quite as ignorant as those who go along with us. As
we proceed we shall probably all grow wiser.
As Harrison thus rambled downwards along the
river's banks, a friendly voice hallooed to him from its
bosom, where a pettiauger, urged by a couple of sinewy
rowers, was heaving to the shore.
Halloo, captain, cried one of the menI'm so
glad to see you.
Ah, Grayson, he exclaimed to the one, how
do you fare?to the other, Master Grayson, I give
you courtesy.
The two men were brothers, and the difference made
in Harrison's address between the two, simply
indicated
the different degrees of intimacy between them
and himself.
We've been hunting, captain, and have had glorious
sport, said the elder of the brothers, known as Walter
Graysontwo fine bucks and a doeshall we have
you to sup with us to-night?
Hold me willing, Grayson, but not ready. I have
labours for to-night will keep me from you. But I
shall tax your hospitality before the venison's out.
Make my respects to the old lady, your mother; and
if you can let me see you at the Block House
to-morrow
,
early morning, do so, and hold me indebted.
I will be there, captain, God willing, and shall do
as you ask. I'm sorry you can't come to-night.
So am not I, said the younger Grayson, as,
making his acknowledgments and farewell, Harrison
pushed out of sight and re-entered the forest. The
boat touched the shore, and the brothers leaped out,
pursuing their talk, and taking out their game as they
did so.
So am not I, repeated the younger brother, gloomily:
I would see as little of that man as possible.
And why, Hugh? In what does he offend you?
was the inquiry of his companion.
I know notbut he does offend me, and I hate him,
thoroughly hate him.
And wherefore, Hugh? what has he donewhat
said? You have seen but little of him to judge. Go
with me to-morrow to the Block Housesee himtalk
with him. You will find him a noble gentleman.
And the two brothers continued the subject while
moving homeward with the spoil.
I would not see him, though I doubt not what you
say. I would rather that my impressions of him should
remain as they are.
Hugh Graysonyour perversity comes from a cause
you would blush that I should knowyou dislike him,
brother, because Bess Matthews does not.
The younger brother threw from his shoulder the
carcass of the deer which he carried, and with a
broken speech, but a fierce and fixed gesture,
confronted
the speaker.
Walter Graysonyou are my brotheryou are
my brother;but do not speak on this subject again.
I am perverseI am unreasonablebe it soI
cannot
be other than I am; and, as you love me, bear
with it while you may. But urge me no more in this
matter. I cannot like that man for many reasons, and
not the least of these is, that I cannot so readily
as yourself acknowledge his superiority, while,
perhaps
,
not less than yourself, I cannot help but know it.
My pride is to feel my independenceit is for you to
desire control, were it only for the connexion and the
sympathy which it brings to you. You are one of the
million who make tyrants. Goworship him yourself,
but do not call upon me to do likewise.
Take up the meat, brother, and be not wroth; above
all things try and remember, in order that your mood
may be kept in subjectiontry and remember our old
mother.
A few more words of sullen dialogue between them,
and the two brothers passed into a narrow pathway
leading to a cottage, where, at no great distance, they
resided.
CHAPTER VII.
Ye may not with a word define
The love that lightens o'er her face,
That makes her glance a glance divine,
Fresh caught from heaven, its native place
And in her heart, as in her eye,
A spirit lovely as serene
Makes of each charm some deity,
Well worshipp'd, though perhaps unseen.
The
soft sunset of April, of an April sky in
Carolina
,
lay beautifully over the scene that afternoon.
Imbowered in trees, with a gentle esplanade, running
down to the river, stood the pretty yet modest cottage,
in which lived the pastor of the settlement, John
Matthews, his wife, and daughter Elizabeth. The
dwelling was prettily enclosed with sheltering groves
through which, at spots here and there, peered forth
its well whitewashed veranda. The river, a few
hundred
yards in front, wound pleasantly along, making
a circuitous sweep just at that point, which left the
cottage upon something like an isthmus, and made it
a prominent object to the eye in an approach from
either end of the stream. The site had been
felicitously
chosen; and the pains taken with it had
sufficiently
improved the rude location to show how much
may be effected by art, when employed in
arranging
the toilet, and in decorating the wild beauties
of her country cousin. The house itself was rude
enoughlike those of the region generally, having
been built of logs, put together as closely as the
material
would permit, and affording only a couple of rooms
in front, to which the additional shed contributed two
more, employed as sleeping apartments. Having
shared, however, something of the whitewash which
had been employed upon the veranda, the little fabric
wore a cheerful appearance, which proved that the
pains taken with it had not been entirely thrown away
upon the coarse material of which it had been
constructed
.
We should not forget to insist upon the
porch or portico of four columns, formed of slender
pines decapitated for the purpose, which, having its
distinct roof, formed the entrance through the piazza to
the humble cottage. The clustering vines, too, hanging
fantastically over the entrance, almost forbidding
ingress
,
furnished proof enough of the presence and
agency of that sweet taste, which, lovely of itself,
has yet an added attraction when coupled with the
beauty and the purity of woman.
Gabriel Harrison, as our new acquaintance has been
pleased to style himself, was now seen emerging from
the copse which grew alongside the river, and
approaching
the cottage. Without scruple lifting the
wooden latch which secured the gate of the little
paling fence running around it, he slowly moved up
to the entrance. His approach, however, had not
been entirely unobserved. A bright pair of eyes,
and a laughing, young, even girlish face were peering
through the green leaves which almost covered it in.
As the glance met his own, the expression of sober
gravity and thoughtfulness departed from his
countenance
;
and he now seemed only the playful, wild,
thoughtless, and gentle-natured being she had been
heretofore accustomed to regard him.
Ah, Bess; dear Bessstill the same, my beauty;
still the laughing, the lovely, the star-eyed
Hush, hush, you noisy and wickednot so loud;
mother is busily engaged in her evening nap, and
that long tongue of yours will not make it sounder.
A sweet warning, Bessbut what thenif we
talk not, we are like to have a dull time of it.
And if you do, and she wakes without having her
nap out, we are like to have a cross time of it; and
so, judge for yourself which you would best like.
I'm dumb,speechless, my beauty, as a jay on a
visit; and see then what you'll lose.
What?
My fine speechesyour own praiseno more
dears, and loves, and beauties. My tongue and your
ears will entirely forget their old acquaintance; and
there will be but a single mode of keeping any of our
memories alive.
How is thatwhat mode?
An old song tells us
`The lips of the dumb may speak of love,
Though the words may die in a kiss
And'
Will you never be quiet, Gabriel?
How can I, with so much that is disquieting
near me? Quiet, indeed,why Bess, I never look
upon youay, for that matter, I never think of
you, but my heart beats, and my veins tingle, and
my pulses bound, and all is confusion in my
senses. You are my disquiet, far and nearand you
know not, dear Bess, how much I have longed, during
the last spell of absence, to be near, and again to see
you.
Oh, I heed not your flattery. Longed for me,
indeed, and so long away. Why, where have you
C 3
been all this while, and what is the craft, Gabriel,
which keeps you away?am I never to know the
secret?
Not yet, not yet, sweetest; but a little while, my
most impatient beauty; but a little while, and you shall
know all and every thing.
Shall I? but, ah! how long have you told me
soyears, I'm sure
Scarcely months, Bessyour heart is your
bookkeeper
.
Well, monthsfor months you have promised me
but a little while, and you shall know all; and here
I've told you all my secrets, as if you had a right to
know them.
Have I not?if my craft, Bess, were only my
secretif much that belongs to others did not depend
upon itif, indeed, success in its pursuit were not
greatly risked by its exposure, you should have heard
it with the same sentence which just told you how
dear you were to me. But only by secrecy can my
pursuit be successfully accomplished. Besides, Bess,
as it concerns others, the right to yield it, even to
such sweet custody as your own, is not with me.
But, Gabriel, I can surely keep it safely.
How can you, Besssince, as a dutiful child, you
are bound to let your mother share in all your
knowledge
?
She knows of our love; does she not?
Yes, yes, and she is glad to knowshe approves
of it. And so, Gabrielforgive me, but I am very
anxious
and
so you can't tell me what is the craft you
pursue? and she looked very persuasive as she spoke.
I fear me, Bess, if you once knew my craft, you
would discover that our love was all a mistake. You
would learn to unlove much faster than you ever
learned to love.
Nonsense, Gabrielyou know that is impossible.
A thousand thanks, Bess, for the assurance; but
are you suresuppose now, I may be a pedler, doing
the same business with Granger, probably his partner
only think.
That cannot beI know better than thatI'm
certain it is not so.
And why not, Beautiful.
Be done,and, Gabriel, cease calling me
nicknames
,
or I'll leave you. I won't suffer it. You make
quite too free.
Do I, Bess,well, I'm very sorrybut I can't
help it, half the time, I assure you. It's my nature
I was born so, and have been so from the cradle up.
The very first words I uttered, were so many
nicknames
,
and in calling my own papa, would you
believe
it, I could never get farther than the pap.
Obstinateincorrigible man!
Dear, delightful, mischievous woman.But, Bess,
by what are you assured I am no trader?
By many things, Gabrielby look, language,
gesture, manneryour face, your speech.All satisfy
me that you are no trader, but a gentlemanlike the
brave cavaliers that stood by King Charles.
A dangerous comparison, Bess, if your old
Puritan
sire could hear it. What! the daughter of the
grave Pastor Matthews thinking well of the cavaliers
why, Bess, let him but guess at such irreverence,
and he'll be down upon you, thirty thousand strong,
in scolds and sermons.
Hushdon't speak of papa after that fashion.
It's true, he talks hardly of the cavaliersand I think
well of those he talks ill ofso much for your
teaching
,
Gabrielyou are to blame. But he loves me;
and that's enough to make me respect his opinions,
and to love him, in spite of them.
You think he loves you, Bessand doubtlessly
he does, as who could otherwisebut, is it not strange
that he does not love you enough to desire your
happiness
?
Why, so he does.
How can that be, Bess, when he still refuses you
to me?
And are you so sure, Gabriel, that his consent
would have that effect? inquired the maiden, slowly,
half pensively, half playfully, with a look nevertheless
downcast, and a cheek that wore a blush after the
prettiest manner. Harrison passed his arm about her
person, and with a tone and countenance something
graver than usual, but full of tenderness, replied:
You do not doubt it yourself, dearest. I'm sure
you do not. Be satisfied of it, so far as a warm
affection
,
and a thought studious to unite with your own,
can give happiness to mortal. If you are not assured
by this time, no word from me can make you more so.
True, BessI am wildperhaps rash and frivolous
foolish, and in some things, headstrong and obstinate
enough; but the love for you, Bess, which I have
always felt, I have felt as a serious and absorbing
concern, predominating over all other objects of my
existence. Let me be at the wildestthe
waywardest
as
full of irregular impulse as I may be, and
your name, and the thought of you, bring me back to
myself, bind me down, and take all wilfulness from
my spirit. It is true, Bess, true, by the blessed
sunlight that gives us its smile and its promise while
passing from our sightbut this you knew before, and
only desired its re-assertion, because
Because what, Gabriel?
Because the assurance is so sweet to your ears,
that you could not have it too often repeated.
Oh, abominablethus it is, you destroy all the
grace of your pretty speeches. But, you mistake the
sex, if you suppose we care for your vows on this
subjectknowing, as we do, that you are compelled to
love us, we take the assurance for granted.
I grant you; but the case is yours also. Love is
a mutual necessity; and were it not that young hearts
are still old hypocrites, the general truth would have
long since been admitted; but
He was interrupted at this point of the dialogue,
which, in spite of all the warnings of the maiden, had
been carried on the warmth of its progress
somewhat
more loudly than was absolutely necessary,
and brought back to a perception of the error by a
voice of inquiry from within, demanding of Bess with
whom she spoke.
With Gabrielwith Captain Harrison,mother.
Well, why don't you bring him in? Have you
forgotten
your manners, Betsy?
No, mother, butcome in, Gabriel, come in: and
as she spoke she extended her hand, which he
passionately
carried to his lips, and resolutely maintained
there, in spite of all her resistance, while passing into
the entrance and before reaching the apartment. The
good old dame, a tidy, well-natured antique, received
the visiter with regard and kindness, and though
evidently
but half recovered from a sound nap, proceeded
to chatter with him and at him with all the garrulous
unscrupulosity of age. Harrison, with that playful
frankness which formed so large a portion of his
manner
,
and without any effort, had contrived long since to
make himself a friend in the mother of his sweet-heart;
and knowing her foible, he now contented himself with
provoking the conversation, prompting the choice of
material, and leaving the tongue of the old lady at her
own pleasure to pursue it: he, in the meanwhile,
contriving
that sort of chat, through the medium of looks
and glances with the daughter, so grateful in all
similar
cases to young people, and which at the same time
offered no manner of obstruction to the employment of
the mother. It was not long before Mr. Matthews,
the pastor himself, made his appearance, and the
courtesies
of his reception were duly extended by him to
the guest of his wife and daughter; but there seemed
a something of backwardness, a chilly repulsiveness
in the manner of the old gentleman, quite repugnant to
the habits of the country, and not less so to the
feelings
of Harrison, which, for a brief period, had the
effect of freezing not a little even of the frank
exuberance
of that personage himself. The old man was an
ascetica stern Presbyterianone of the
ultra-nonconformists
and
not a little annoyed at that period,
and in the new country, by the course of government,
and plan of legislation pursued by the proprietary
Vol. I. 6
lor of the province, which, in the end, brought about
a revolution in Carolina resulting in the transfer
of their colonial right and the restoration of their
charter
to the crown. The leading proprietary lords were
generally of the church of England, and with all the
bigotry of the zealot, forgetting, and in violation of their
strict pledges, given at the settlement of the colony,
and through which they made the acquisition of a
large body of their most valuable population, not to
interfere
in the popular religionthey proceeded, soon
after the colony began to flourish, to the establishment
of a regular church, and, from step to step, had at
length gone so far as actually to exclude from all
representation in the colonial assemblies, such
portions
of the country as were chiefly settled by other
sects. The region in which we find our story, shared
in this exclusion; and with a man like Matthews, a
stern, sour sticklera good man enough, but not an
overwise onewedded to old habits and prejudices,
and perhaps like a very extensive class, one, who,
preserving
forms, might with little difficulty be persuaded
to throw aside principleswith such a man, the
native
acerbity of his sect might be readily supposed to
undergo vast increase and exercise, from the political
disabilities thus warring with his religious professions.
He was a bigot himself, and with the power, would
doubtless have tyrannised after a similar fashion. The
world with him was what he could take in with his
eye, or control within the sound of his voice. He could
not be brought to understand, that climates and
conditions
should be various, and that the popular good, in a
strict reference to the mind of man, demanded that
people should everywhere differ in manner and
opinion
.
He wore clothes after a different fashion from
those who ruled, and the difference was vital; but he
perfectly agreed with those in power that there should
be a prescribed standard by which the opinions of all
persons should be regulated; and such a point as this
forms the faith for which, forgetful all the while of
propriety
,
not less than of truth, so many thousands are
ready for the stake and the sacrifice. But though as
great a bigot as any of his neighbours, Matthews yet
felt how very uncomfortable it was to be in a minority;
and the persecutions to which his sect had been
exposed
in Carolina, where they had been taught to look
for every form of indulgence, had made him not less
hostile towards the government than bitter in his
feelings
and relationship to society. To him, the manners
of Harrison,his dashing, free, unrestrainable carriage,
as it was directly in the teeth of Puritan usage, was
particularly offensive; and at this moment some newly
proposed exactions of the proprietors in England,
having
for their object something more of religious reform,
had almost determined many of the Puritans to remove
from the colony, and place themselves under the more
gentle and inviting rule of Penn, then beginning to
attract
all eyes to the singularly pacific and wonderfully
successful government of his establishment. Having
this character, and perplexed with these thoughts, old
Matthews was in no mood to look favourably upon the
suit of Harrison. For a little while after his entrance
the dialogue was strained and chilling, and Harrison
himself grew dull under its influence, while Bess looked
every now and then doubtfully, now to her father and
now to her lover, not a little heedful of the increased
sternness which lowered upon the features of the old
man. Some family duties at length demanding the
absence of the old lady, Bess took occasion to follow;
and the circumstance seemed to afford the pastor a
chance for the conversation which he desired.
Master Harrison, said he, gravely, I have just
returned from a visit to Port Royal Island, and from
thence to Charlestown.
Indeed, sirI was told you had been absent, but
knew not certainly where you had gone. How did
you travel?
By canoe, sir, to Port Royal, and then by Miller's
sloop to Charlestown.
Did you find all things well, sir, in that quarter,
and was there any thing from England?
All things were well, sir; there had been a vessel
with settlers from England.
What news, sirwhat news?
The death of her late majesty, Queen Anne, whom
God receive
Amen!but the throne was the impatient
inquiry
.
The succession?
The throne, sir, is filled by the Elector of
Hanover
Now, may I hear falsely, for I would not heed
this tale! Whatwas there no struggle for the
Stuart
no
stroke?now shame on the people so ready
for the chain; and as Harrison spoke, he rose with a
brow deeply wrinkled with thought and indignation,
and paced hurriedly over the floor.
You are fast, too fast, Master Harrison; there had
been strife, and a brief struggle, though, happily for the
nation, a successless one, to lift once more into the high
places of power that bloody and witless family
the slayers and the persecutors of the saints. But
thanks be to the God who breathed upon the forces of
the foe, and shrunk up their sinews. The strife is at
rest there; but when, oh Lord, shall the persecutions
of thy servants cease here, even in thy own untrodden
places!
The old man paused, while, without seeming to
notice
well what he had last said, Harrison continued to
pace the floor in deep meditation. At length the
pastor
again addressed him, though in a different tone and
upon a very different subject.
Master Harrison, said he, I have told thee that
I have been to Charlestownperhaps I should tell thee
that it would have been my pleasure to meet with
thee there.
I have been from Charlestown some weeks, sir,
was the somewhat hurried reply. I have had labours
upon the Ashe-poo, and even to the waters of the
Savannah
.
I doubt notI doubt not, Master Harrison, was
the sober response; thy craft carries thee far, and
thy labours are manifold; but what is that craft,
Master
Harrison? and, while I have it upon my lips, let me
say, that it was matter of strange surprise in my mind,
when I asked after thee in Charlestown, not to find any
wholesome citizen who could point out thy lodgings,
or to whom thy mere name was a thing familiar. Vainly
did I ask after theenone said for thee, Master
Harrison
is a good man and true, and his works are sound
and sightworthy.
Indeedthe savagesspoke the person addressed
with a most provoking air of indifferenceand so,
Mr. Matthews, your curiosity went without profit in
either of those places?
Entirely, sirand I would even have sought that
worthy gentleman, the Lord Craven, for his knowledge
of thee, if he had aught, but that he was gone forth
upon a journey; replied the old gentleman, with an
air of much simplicity.
That would have been going far for thy curiosity,
sirvery farand it would be lifting a poor gentleman
like myself into undeserving notice, to have sought
for him at the hands of the Governor Craven.
Thou speakest lightly of my quest, Master
Harrison
,
as, indeed, it is too much thy wont to speak of
all other things, was the grave response of Matthews;
but the subject of my inquiry was too important
to the wellbeing of my family, to be indifferent to
me.
And so, sir, there were no Harrisons in
Charlestown
none
in Port Royal?
Harrisons there were
True, true, sir said Harrison, breaking in
true, trueHarrisons there were, but none of them
the true. There was no Gabriel among the saints of
those places.
Speak not so irreverently, sir,if I may crave so
much from one who seems usually indifferent to my
desires, however regardful he may be at all times of
his own.
Not so seriously, Mr. Matthews, replied the
other
,
now changing his tone to a business and
straightforward
character. Not so seriously, sir, if you
please; you are quite too grave in this matter, by half,
and allow nothing for the ways of one who, perhaps,
is not a jot more extravagant in his than you are in
yours. Permit me to say, sir, that a little more plain
confidence in Gabriel Harrison would have saved thee
the unnecessary and unprofitable trouble thou hast
given thyself in Charlestown. I knew well enough,
and should willingly have assured thee that thy search
after Gabriel Harrison in Charlestown would be as
wild as that of the old Spaniard among the barrens
of Florida for the waters of an eternal youth. He has
neither chick nor child, nor friend nor servant, either in
Charlestown or in Port Royal, and men there may not
well answer for one whom they do not often see
unless
as the stranger. Gabriel Harrison lives not in
those places, Master Matthews.
It is not where he lives not, that I seek to know
to this thou hast spoken only, Master Harrisonwilt
thou now condescend to say where he does live, where
his name and person may be known, where his
dwelling
and his connexions may be foundwhat is his
craft, what his condition?
A different inquiry that, Mr. Matthews, and one
rather more difficult to answernow, at least. I must
say to you, sir, as I did before, when first speaking
with you on the subject of your daughter, I am of
good family and connexions, drive no servile or
dishonourable
craft, am one thou shalt not be ashamed of,
neither thou nor thy daughter; and though now
engaged
in a pursuit which makes it necessary that much
of my own concerns be kept for a time in close secrecy,
yet the day will come, and I look for it to come ere
long, when all shall be known, and thou shalt have no
reason to regret thy confidence in the stranger. For
the present, I can tell thee no more.
This will not do for me, Master Harrisonit will
not serve a father. On a promise so imperfect, I
cannot
risk the good name and the happiness of my child;
and, let me add to thee, Master Harrison, that there
are other objections which gather in my mind, hostile
to thy claim, even were these taken away.
Ha! what other objections, sirspeak.
Many, sir, nor the least of these, thy great levity
of speech and manner, which is unbecoming in one
having an immortal soul, and discreditable to one of
thy age.
My age, indeed, sirmy youth you will surely
phrase it upon suggestion, for I do not mark more than
thirty, and would have neither Bess nor yourself count
upon me for a greater supply of years.
It is unbecoming, sir, in any age, and in you shows
itself quite too frequently. Then, sir, your tone and
language, contemptuous of many things which the lover
of religion is taught to venerate, too greatly savour of
that ribald court and reign which made merry at the
work of the Creator, and the persecution of his
creatures
,
and drank from a rich cup where the wine of
drunkenness and the blood of the saints were mixed
together in most lavish profusion. You sing, sir,
mirthful
songs, and sometimes, though, perhaps, not so often,
employ a profane oath, that your speech, in the silly
thought of the youthful, may have a strong sound and
a greater emphasis
Enough, enough, good father of mine that is to be,
you have said quite enough against me, and more,
rest you thankful, than I shall ever undertake to
answer
.
One reply, however, I am free to make you.
I shall be pleased to hear you, sir.
That is gracious; and now, sir, let me say, I admit
the sometime levitythe playfulness and the
thoughtlessness
,
perhaps. I shall undertake to reform these,
when you shall satisfy me that to laugh and sing, and
seek and afford amusement, are inconsistent with my
duties either to the Creator or the creature. On this
head, permit me to say that you are the criminal, not
me. It is you, sir, and your sect, that are the true
criminals. Denying, as you do, to the young, all those
natural forms of enjoyment and amusement which the
Deity, speaking through their own nature, designed
them, you cast a gloomy despondency over all things
around you. In this way, sir, you force them upon
the necessity of seeking for less obvious and more
artificial
enjoyments, which are not often innocent, and
which are frequently ruinous and destructive. As for
my irreverence, and so forthIf it be so, it were a
grievous fault, and I am grievously sorry for it. But
I am free to say that I am not conscious of it. If
you make a saint out of a murderer, as the
Yemassee
makes a God out of the devil, whom he
worships as frequently and with more fervour than he
does any other, I am not therefore irreverent when I
doubt and deny. I do not, however, pretend, sir, to
defend myself from the charge of many errors and
some vices perhaps. I wil try and cure these as I go
on. I am not more fond of them, I honestly think,
than the rest of my neighbours; and hope, some day,
to be a better and a wiser man than I am. That I
shall never be a Puritan, however, you may be assured,
if it be only to avoid giving to my face the expression
of a pine bur. That I shall never love Cromwell the
better for having been a hypocrite as well as a
murderer
,
you may equally take for granted; and, that
my dress, unlike your own, sir, shall be fashioned
always with a due reference to my personal
becomingness
,
you and I, both, may this day safely swear for.
These are matters, Mr. Matthews, upon which you
insist with too much solemnity. I look upon them,
sir, as so many trifles, not worthy the close
consideration
of thinking men. I will convince you before
many days perhaps, that my levity does not unfit me
for businessnever interferes with my duties. I wear
it as I do my doublet; when it suits me to do so, I
throw it aside, and proceed, soul and body, to the
necessity which calls for it. Such, sir, is Gabriel
Harrisonthe person for whom you can find no
kindredno sponsoran objection, perfectly idle, sir,
when one thing is considered.
And pray, sir, said the pastor, who had been
stricken dumb by what seemed the gross irreverence
of his companion's speech, and pray, sir, what may
that be?
Why, simply sir, that your daughter is to marry
Gabriel Harrison himself, and not his kindred.
Let Gabriel Harrison rest assured, that my
daughter
does no such thing.
Cha-no-selonee
,
as the Yemassees say. We shall
see. I don't believe that. Trust not your vow,
Master
MatthewsGabriel Harrison will marry your
daughter, and make her an excellent husband, sir, in
spite of you. More than that, sir, I will for once be a
prophet among the rest, and predict that you too shall
clasp hands on the bargain.
Indeed!
Ay, indeed, sir. Look not so sourly, old man, upon
the matter. I am bent on it. You shall not destroy
your daughter's chance of happiness in denying mine.
Pardon me if my phrase is something audacious. I
have been a rover, and my words come with my
feelings
I
seldom stop to pick them. I love Bess, and
I'm sure I can make her happy. Believing this, and
believing too that you shall be satisfied after a time
with me, however you dislike my name, I shall not
suffer myself to be much troubled on the score of your
refusal. When the time comeswhen I can see my
way through some few difficulties now before me, and
when I have safely performed other duties, I shall
come to possess myself of my brideand, as I shall
then give you up my secret, I shall look to have her
at your hands.
We shall see, sir, was all the response which the
bewildered pastor uttered to the wild visiter who had
thus addressed him. The character of the dialogue,
however, did not seem so greatly to surprise him,
as one might have expected. He appeared to be
rather familiar with some of the peculiarities of his
companion, and however he might object to his
seeming
recklessness, he himself was not altogether
insensible
to the manly fearlessness which marked
Harrison's
conduct throughout. The conversation had
fairly terminated; and following his guest to the
doorway
,
the pastor heard his farewell with a half
unconscious
spirit. But he was aroused by Harrison's return.
His expression of face, no longer laughing, was now
singularly changed to a reflective gravity.
Mr. Matthews, said heone thinglet me not
forget to counsel you. There is some mischief afoot
among the Yemassees. I have reason to believe that
it has been for some time in progress. We shall not
be long, I fear, without an explosion, and must be
prepared
.
The lower Block House would be your safest
retreat in case of time being allowed you for flight; but
I pray you reject no warning, and take the first Block
House if the warning be short. I shall probably be
nigh, however, in the event of danger, and though you
like not the name of Gabriel Harrison, its owner has
some ability, and wants none of the will to do you
service.
The old man was struck, not less with the earnest
manner of the speaker, so unusual with him, than
with his language; and with something more of
deference
in his own expression, begged to know the
occasion
of his apprehensions.
I cannot well tell you now, said the other, but
there are reasons enough to render caution advisable.
Your eye has probably before this beheld the vessel
in the rivershe is a stranger, and I think an enemy.
But as we have not the means of contending with her,
we must watch her well, and do what we can by
stratagem
.
What we think, too, must be thought secretly;
but to you I may say, that I suspect an agent of the
Spaniard in that vessel, and will do my utmost to find
it out. I know that sundry of the Yemassees have
been for the first time to St. Augustine, and they have
come home burdened with gauds and gifts. These
are not given for nothing. But enoughbe on your
watchto give you more of my confidence, at this
moment, than is called for, is no part of my vocation.
In heaven's name who are you, sir? was the
earnest exclamation of the old pastor.
Gabriel Harrison, sir, was the reply, with the
most profound gravity of expression, the future
husband
of Bess Matthews.
Then, as he caught a glance of the maiden's eye
peering through a neighbouring window, he kissed his
hand to her twice and thrice, and with a hasty nod to
the wondering father, who now began to regard him
as a madman, he dashed forward through the gate, and
was soon upon the banks of the river.
CHAPTER VIII.
The nations meet in leaguea solemn league,
This is their voicethis their united pledge,
For all adventure.
Sanutee
turned away from the spot whence
Harrison
had departed, and was about to retire, when, not
finding himself followed by Ishiagaska, and perceiving
the approach of the sailor, his late opponent, and not
knowing what to expect, he again turned, facing the
two, and lifting his bow, and setting his arrow, he
prepared
himself for a renewal of the strife. But the
voice of the sailor and of Ishiagaska, at the same
moment, reached his ears in words of conciliation;
and resting himself slightly against a tree, foregoing
none of his precautions, however, with a cold
indifference
he awaited their approach. The seaman
addressed
him with all his usual bluntness, but with a
manner now very considerably changed from what it
was at their first encounter. He apologized for his
violence and for having slain the dog. Had he known
to whom it belonged, so he assured the chief, he had
not been so hasty in despatching it; and as some small
amends, he begged the Indian to do with the venison
as he thought proper, for it was now his own. During
the utterance of this uncouth apology, mixed up as it
was with numberless oaths, Sanutee looked on and
listened with contemptuous indifference. When it
was done, he simply replied
It is wellbut the white man will keep the meat,
it is not for Sanutee.
Come, come, don't be ill-favoured now, warrior.
What's done can't be undone, and more ado is too
much to do. I'm sure I'm sorry enough I killed the
dog, but how was I to know he belonged to you?
The sailor might have gone on for some time after
this fashion, had not Ishiagaska, seeing that the
reference
to his dog only the more provoked the ire of the
chief, interposed by an address to the sailor which
more readily commanded Sanutee's consideration.
The master of the big canoeis he not the chief
that comes from St. Augustine? Ishiagaska has
looked
upon the white chief in the great lodge of his
Spanish
brother.
Ay, that you have, Indian, I'll be sworn; and I
thought I knew you from the first. I am the friend of
the Spanish governor, and I come here now upon his
business.
It is good, responded Ishiagaskaand he turned
to Sanutee, with whom, for a few moments, he carried
on a conversation in their own, language, entirely
beyond the comprehension of the sailor, who
nevertheless
gave it all due attention.
Brings the master of the big canoe nothing from
our Spanish brother? Hides he no writing in his
bosom? was the inquiry of Ishiagaska, turning from
Sanutee, who seemed to have prompted the inquiry.
Writing indeednowriting to wild Indians, and
he muttered to himself the last clause, at the
conclusion
of his reply to their question. No writing, but
something that you may probably understand quite as
well. Herethis is what I have brought you. See
if you can read it.
As he spoke, he drew from his bosom a bright red
clotha strip, not over six inches in width, but of
several yards in length, worked over at little intervals
with symbols and figures of every kind and of the most
fantastic descriptionamong which were birds and
beasts, reptiles and insects, uncouthly delineated, either
in shells or beads, which, however grotesque, had yet
their signification; and under the general name of
wampum
,
among all the Indians formed a common language,
in which their treaties, whether of peace, war, or
alliance
,
were commonly effected. Each tribe, indicated
by some hieroglyphic of this sort, supposed to be
particularly emblematic of its general pursuit or
character
,
pledges itself and its people after this fashion,
and affixes to the compact agreed upon between them
a seal, which is significant of their intentions, and
as faithfully binding as the more legitimate
characters
known among the civilized. The features of
Sanutee underwent a change from the repose of
indifference
to the lively play of the warmest interest, as he
beheld the long folds of this document slowly unwind
before his eyes; and without a word hastily snatching
it from the hands of the seaman, he had nearly brought
upon himself another assault from that redoubted
worthy. But as he made a show of that sort,
Ishiagaska
interposed.
How do I know that it is for himthat treaty is
for the chiefs of the Yemassees; and blast my eyes
if any but the chiefs shall grapple it in their yellow
fingers.
It is rightit is Sanutee, the great chief of the
Yemassees; and is not Ishiagaska a chief? replied
the latter, impressively. The sailor was somewhat
pacified, and said no more; while Sanutee, who
seemed not at all to have heeded this latter movement,
went on examining each figure upon its folds in turn,
numbering them carefully upon his fingers as he did
so, and conferring upon their characters with
Ishiagaska
,
whose own curiosity was now actively at work
along with him in the examination. In that language
which from their lips is a solemn melody, they
conversed together, to the great disquiet of the seaman,
who had no less curiosity than themselves to know
Vol. I.D 7
the features of this treaty, but who understood not a
word they said.
They are here, Ishiagaska, they have heard the
speech of the true warrior, and they will stand
together. Look, this green bird is for the Estatoe;
[9]
[9]
A tribe of the Cherokees, living in what is now Pendleton
district
.
he will sing death in the sleeping ear of the pale
warrior of the English.
He is a great brave of the hills, and has long worn
the blanket of the Spaniard. It is good, was the
reply.
And this for the Cussoboeit is burnt timber.
They took the totem from the Suwannee, when they
smoked him out of his lodge. And this for the
Alatamaha, a green leaf of the summer, for the great
prophet of the Alatamaha never dies, and looks always
in youth. This tree snake stands for the Serannah;
for he watches in the thick top of the bush for the
warrior that walks blind underneath.
I have looked on this chief in battlethe hill
chief of Apalachy. It was the fight of a long day,
when we took scalps from their warriors, and slew
them with their arms about our necks. They are
bravelook, the mark of their knife is deep in the
cheek of Ishiagaska.
The hill is their
totem
. It stands, and they never
lie. This is the wolf tribe of the Cherokeeand this
the bear's. Look, the Catawba, that laughs, is here.
He speaks with the trick-tongue of the Coonee-lattee;
The mocking-bird. The Catawbas were of a generous, elastic,
and lively temperament, and until this affair, usually the friends of
the Carolinians.
he laughs, but he can strike like a true brave, and sings
his death-song with a free spirit.
For whom speaks the viper-snake, hissing from
under the bush?
For the Creek warrior with the sharp tooth, that
tears. His tooth is like an arrow, and when he tears
away the scalp of his enemy, he drinks a long drink
of his blood, that makes him strong. This is their
totem
I know them of old; they gave us six braves
when we fought with the Chickquasays.
The sailor had heard this dialogue without any of
the advantages possessed by us. It was in a dead
language to him. Becoming impatient, and desiring
to have some hand in the business, he took advantage
of a pause made by Sanutee, who now seemed to
examine
with Ishiagaska more closely the list they had
read outto suggest a more rapid progress to the rest.
Roll them out, chief; roll them out; there are many
more yet to come. Snakes, and trees, and birds, and
beasts enough to people the best
show-stall
of
Europe
.
It is good, said Sanutee, who understood in part
what had been said, and as suggested, the Yemassee
proceeded to do so, though exhibiting something less
of curiosity. The residue of the hieroglyphics were
those chiefly of tribes and nations of which he had
been previously secure. He proceeded however, as
if rather for the stranger's satisfaction than his own.
Here, said he, continuing the dialogue in his own
language with Ishiagaska, here is the Salutah
[10]
[10]
Salutah, now written Saluda, and signifying Corn river.
that
falls like the water. He is a stream from the rock.
This is the Isundiga
Isundiga, or Savannah.
that goes on his belly, and shoots
from the hollowthis is the Santee, he runs in the
long canoe, and his paddle is a cane, that catches the
tree top, and thus he goes through the dark swamps
of Serattaya
Near Nelson's ferry and Scott's lake on the
Santee.
The Chickaree stands up in the pine
and the Winyah is here in the terrapin.
I say, chief, said the sailor, pointing to the next
symbol, which was an arrow of considerable length,
and curved almost to a crescent, I say, chief, tell
us what this arrow means hereI know it stands for
some nation, but what nation? and speak now in plain
English, if you can, or in Spanish, or in French, which
I can make out, but not in that dd gibberish which
D 2
is all up side down and in and out, and no ways at all,
in my understanding.
The chief comprehended the object of the sailor,
though less from his words than his looks; and with
an elevation of head and gesture, and a pleasant
kindling
of the eye, he replied proudly:
It is the arrow, the arrow that came with the
stormit came from the Manneyto, to the brave, to
the well-beloved, the old father-chief of the Yemassee.
Ah, ha! so that's your marktotem, do you call
it?Well, its a pretty long matter to burrow in one's
ribs, and reminds me of the fellow to it, that you so
kindly intended for mine. But that's over nowso
no more of it, old chief.
Neither of the Indians appeared to heed this latter
speech of the sailor, for they seemed not exactly
to comprehend one of the symbols upon the
wampum
which now met their eyes, and called for their
closest scrutiny. They uttered their doubts and
opinions
in their own language with no little fluency;
for it is something of a popular error to suppose the
Indian that taciturn character which he is sometimes
represented. He is a great speech maker, and when
business claims him not, actually and exceeding fond
of a jest; which, by the way, is not often the purest
in its nature. The want of our language is a very
natural reason why he should be sparing of his words
when he speaks with us.
The bewilderment of the chiefs did not escape the
notice of the sailor, who immediately guessed its
occasion
.
The symbol before their eyes was that of Spain;
the high turrets, and the wide towers of its castellated
dominion, frowning in gold, and finely embroidered
upon the belt, directly below the simpler ensign of the
Yemassees. Explaining the mystery to their
satisfaction
,
the contrast between its gorgeous
imbodiments
and vaster associations of human agency and
power, necessarily influenced the imagination of the
European, while wanting every thing like force to the
Indian, to whom a lodge so vast and cheerless in its
aspect seemed rather an absurdity than any thing else;
and he could not help dilating upon the greatness and
magnificence of a people dwelling in such houses.
That's a nation for you now, chiefsthat is the
nation after all.
The Yemassee is the nation, said one of the
chiefs proudly.
Yes, perhaps so, in this part of the world, a great
nation enough; but in Europe you wouldn't be a
mouthful
a
mere drop in the bucketa wounded porpoise,
flirting about in the mighty seas that must swallow it
up. Ah! it's a great honour, chiefs, let me tell you,
when so great a king as the King of Spain condescends
to make a treaty with a wild people such as you are
here.
Understanding but little of all this, Sanutee did not
perceive its disparaging tendency, but simply pointing
to the insignia, inquired
It is the Spanish totem.
Ay, it's their signtheir armsif that's what you
mean by totem. It was a long time before the
Governor
of Saint Augustine could get it done after your
fashion, till an old squaw of the
Charriquees
[11]
[11]
Thus written for Cherokees, in many of the old state papers.
fixed it
up, and handsomely enough she has done it too. And
now, chiefs, the sooner we go to work the better. The
governor has put his hand to the treaty, he will find the
arms, and you the warriors.
The Yemassee will speak to the governor, said
Sanutee.
You will have to go to Saint Augustine, then, for
he has sent me in his place. I have brought the treaty,
and the arms are in my vessel ready for your warriors,
whenever they are ready.
Does Sanutee speak to a chief?
Ay, that he does, or my name is not Richard
Chorley. I am a sea chief, a chief of the great canoe,
and captain of as pretty a crew as ever riddled a
merchantman
.
I see not the totem of your tribe.
My tribe? said the sailor, laughinglyMy crew,
you mean. Yes, they have a totem, and as pretty a
one as any on your roll. There, look, said he, and
as he spoke, rolling up his sleeve, he displayed a huge
anchor upon his arm, done in gunpowdera badge
so much like their own, that the friendly regards of
the Indians became evidently more active in his
favour
after this exhibition.
And now, said Chorley, it is well I have some
of my marks about me, for I can easily put my
signature
to that treaty without scrawl of pen, or taking half
the trouble that it must have given the worker of these
beads. But, hear me, chiefs, I don't work for nothing;
I must have my pay, and as it don't come out of your
pockets, I look to have no refusal.
The chief of the great canoe will speak.
Yes, and first to show that I mean to act as well
as speak, here is my
totem
the
totem
of my crew or
tribe as you call it. I put it on, and trust to have fair
play out of you. As he spoke, he took from his
pocket
a small leaden anchor, such as are now-a-days
numbered
among the playthings of children, but which at
that period made no unfrequent ornament to the
seaman's
jacket. A thorn from a neighbouring branch
secured it to the wampum, and the engagement of the
sea chief was duly ratified. Having done this, he
proceeded to unfold his expectations. He claimed,
among other things, in consideration of the service of
himself and the fifteen men whom he should command
in the insurrection, the possession of all slaves who
should be taken by him from the Carolinians; and that
unless they offered resistance, they should not be slain
in the war.
I don't want better pay than that, said he, but
that I must and will have, or dn the blow I strike in
the matter.
The terms of the seaman had thus far undergone
development, when Sanutee started suddenly, and his
eyes, flushed seemingly with some new interest, were
busied in scrutinizing the little circuit of wood on the
edge of which their conversation had been carried on.
Ishiagaska betrayed a similar consciousness of an
intruder's presence, and the wampum belt was rolled
up hurriedly by one of the chiefs, while the other
maintained his watchfulness upon the brush from
whence the interruption had come. There was some
reason for the alarm, though the unpractised sense of
the white man had failed to perceive it. It was there
that our old acquaintance, Hector, despatched as a spy
upon the progress of those whom his master suspected
to be engaged in mischief, had sought concealment
while seeking his information. Unfortunately for the
black, as he crept along on hands and knees, a fallen and
somewhat decayed tree lay across his path, some of the
branches of which protruded entirely out of the cover,
and terminated within sight of the three conspirators,
upon the open plain. In crawling cautiously enough
over the body of the tree, the branches thus exposed
were agitated, and though but slightly, yet sufficiently for
the keen sight of an Indian warrior. Hector, all the
while, ignorant of the protrusion within their gaze of
the agitated members, in his anxiety to gain more of the
latter words of the sailor, so interesting to his own
colour, and a portion of which had met his ear,
incautiously
pushed forward over the tree, crawling all the
way like a snake, and seeking to shelter himself in a
little clump that interposed itself between him and those
he was approaching. As he raised his head above the
earth, he beheld the glance of Sanutee fixed upon the
very bush behind which he lay; the bow uplifted, and
his eye ranging from stem to point of the long arrow.
In a moment the negro sunk to the level of the ground;
but in doing so precipitately, disturbed still more the
branches clustering around him. The lapse of a few
moments without any assault, persuaded Hector to
believe that all danger was passed; and he was just
about to lift his head for another survey, when he felt
the entire weight of a heavy body upon his back.
While the black had lain quiet, in those few moments,
Sanutee had swept round a turn of the woods, and with
a single bound after noticing the person of the spy,
had placed his feet upon him.
Hello, now, who de debble dat? Get off, I tell
you. Wha'for you do so to Hector? Thus shouting
confusedly, the negro, taken in the very act, with a
tone of considerable indignation, addressed his
assailant
,
while struggling violently all the time at his
extrication
.
His struggles only enabled him to see his
captor
,
who, calling out to Ishiagaska, in a moment, with
his assistance, dragged forth the spy from his
unconcealing
cover. To do Hector's courage all manner of
justice, he battled violently; threatening his captors
dreadfully with the vengeance of his master. But his
efforts ceased as the hatchet of Ishiagaska gleamed
over his eyes, and he was content, save in words,
which he continued to pour forth with no little fluency,
to forego his further opposition to the efforts which
they now made to keep him down, while binding his
arms behind him with a thong of hide which
Ishiagaska
readily produced. The cupidity of Chorley
soon furnished them with a plan for getting rid of him.
Under his suggestion, driving the prisoner before them,
with the terrors of knife and hatchet, they soon reached
the edge of the river; and after some search, found the
rattlesnake's point, where the boat had been stationed in
waiting. With the assistance of the two sailors in it, the
seats were taken up, and the captive, kicking, struggling,
and threatening, though all in vain, was tumbled in;
the seats replaced above him, the seamen sitting upon
them; and every chance of a long captivity, and that
foreign slavery against which his master had
forewarned
him, in prospect before his thoughts. The
further arrangements between the chiefs and the sailor
took place on shore, out of Hector's hearing. In
a little while, it ceasedthe Yemassees took their
way up the river to Pocota-ligo, while Chorley,
returning
to his boat, bringing the deer along, which he
tumbled in upon the legs of the negro, took his seat
in the stern, and the men pulled steadily off for the
vessel, keeping nigh the opposite shore, and avoiding
that side upon which the settlements of the Carolinians
were chiefly to be found. As they pursued their way,
a voice hailed them from the banks, to which the sailor
gave no reply; but immediately changing the
direction
of the boat, put her instantly into the centre of
the stream. But the voice was known to Hector as
that of Granger, the Indian trader, and with a
desperate
effort, raising his head from the uncomfortable
place where it had been laid on a dead level with his
body, he yelled out to the trader, with his utmost
pitch of voice, vainly endeavouring through the mists
of evening, which now hung heavily around, to make
out the person to whom he spoke. A salutary blow
from the huge fist of the sailor, driven into the
uprising
face of the black, admonished him strongly
against any future imprudence, while driving him back
with all the force of a sledge-hammer to the shelter
of his old position. There was no reply that the
negro heard to his salutation; and in no long time
after, the vessel was reached, and Hector was soon
consigned to a safe quarter in the hold, usually provided
for such freight, and kept to await the arrival of as
many companions in captivity, as the present
enterprise
of the pirate captain, for such is Master Richard
Chorley, promised to procure.
CHAPTER IX.
Why goes he forth againwhat is the quest,
That from his cottage home, and the warm heart,
Blest that its warmth is his, carries him forth
By night, into the mazy solitude?
The
boats, side by side, of Sanutee and Ishiagaska,
crossed the river at a point just below Pocota-ligo. It
was there that Sanutee landedthe other chief
continued
D 3
his progress to the town. But a few words,
and those of stern resolve, passed between them at
separation; but those words were volumes. They
were the words of revolution and strife, and announced
the preparation of the people not less than of the two
chiefs, for the commencement, with brief delay, of
those terrors which were now the most prominent
images
in their minds. The night was fixed among
them for the outbreak, the several commands
arranged
,
and the intelligence brought by the sailor,
informed
them of a contemplated attack of the Spaniards
by sea upon the Carolinian settlements, while at the
same time another body was in progress over land to
coalesce with them in their operations. This latter
force could not be very distant, and it was understood
that when the scouts should return with accounts of
its approach, the signal should be given for the general
massacre.
They shall diethey shall all perish, and their
scalps shall shrivel around the long pole in the lodge
of the warrior, exclaimed Ishiagaska, fiercely, to his
brother chief in their own language. The response
of Sanutee was in a different temper, though
recognising
the same necessity.
The Yemassee must be free, said the elder
chief, solemnly, in his sonorous tonesthe Manneyto
will bring him freedomhe will take the burden from
his shoulders, and set him up against the tree by the
wayside. He will put the bow into his handshe will
strengthen him for the chase; there shall be no
pale-faces
along the path to rob him of venisonto put
blows upon his shoulders. The Yamassee shall be
free.
He shall drink blood for strength.He shall hunt
the track of the English to the sounds of the big waters;
and the war-whoop shall ring death in the ear that
sleeps, cried Ishiagaska, with a furious exultation.
Let them go, Ishiagaska, let them go from the
Yemasseelet the warrior have no stop in the chase,
when he would strike the brown deer on the edge of
the swamp. Let them leave the home of the Yemassee,
and take the big canoe over the waters, and the
tomahawk
of Sanutee shall be buriedit should drink no
blood from the English.
They will not go, exclaimed the other fiercely
there must be bloodthe white man will not go.
His teeth are in the trees, and he eats into the earth
for his own.
Thou hast said, Ishiagaskathere must be blood
they will not go. The knife of the Yemassee must
be red. Butnot yetnot yet! The moon must
sleep firstthe Yemassee is a little child till the moon
sleeps, but then
He is a strong man, with a long arrow, and a
tomahawk
like the Manneyto.
It is goodthe arrow shall fly to the heart, and
the tomahawk shall sink deep into the head. The
Yemassee shall have his lands, and his limbs shall be
free in the hunt. Thus, almost in a strain of lyric
enthusiasm, for a little while they continued, until,
having
briefly arranged for a meeting with other chiefs of
their party for the day ensuing, they separated, and the
night had well set in before Sanutee reappeared in the
cabin of his wife.
He returned gloomy and abstractedhis mind
brooding
over schemes of war and violence. He was about
to plunge his nation into all the difficulties and dangers
of a strife with the colony, still in its infancy, but even
in its infancy, powerful to the Indianswith a
people
with whom they had, hitherto, always been at
peace and on terms of the most friendly intercourse.
Sanutee felt the difficulties of this former relation
doubly to increase those which necessarily belong to
war. He had, however, well deliberated the matter,
and arrived at a determination, so fraught with peril
not only to himself but to his people, only after a
perfect
conviction of its absolute necessity. Yet such a
decision was a severe trial to a spirit framed as his
a spirit, which, as in the case of Logan, desired peace
rather than war. The misfortune with him, however,
consisted in thishe was a patriot rather than a sage,
and though lacking nothing of that wisdom which may
exist in a mind not yet entirely stripped of all warmth
all national veneration,he could not coldly calculate
chances and changes, injurious and possibly fatal to his
people, tamely to predict, without seeking also to
divert
them. At the first, misled as were the Indians
generally
,
he had been friendly to the settlershe had
cordially
welcomed themyielded the lands of his people
graciously, and when they were assailed by other
tribes, had himself gone forth in their battle even
against the Spaniards of St. Augustine, with whom he
now found it politic to enter into alliance. But his
eyes were now fully opened to his error. It is in the
nature of civilization to own an appetite for
dominion
and extended sway, which the world that is known
will always fail to satisfy. It is for her, then, to seek
and to create, and not with the Macedonian barbarian, to
weep for the triumph of the unknown. Conquest and
sway are the great leading principles of her existence,
and the savage must join in her train, or she rides
over him relentlessly in her for-ever-onward progress.
Though slow, perhaps, in her approaches, Sanutee
was sage enough at length to foresee all this, as the
inevitable
result of her progressive march. The
evidence
rose daily before his eyes in the diminution
of the gamein the frequent insults to his people,
unredressed
by their obtrusive neighboursand in the
daily approach of some new borderer in contact with
the Indian hunters, whose habits were foreign, and
whose capacities were obviously superior to theirs.
The desire for new lands, and the facility with which
the whites, in many cases, taking advantage of the
weaknesses of their chiefs, had been enabled to
procure
them, impressed Sanutee strongly with the
melancholy
prospect in reserve for the Yemassee. He,
probably, would not live to behold them landless, and
his own children might, to the last, have range enough
for the chase; but the nation itself was in the thought
of the unselfish chieftain, upon whom its general voice
had conferred the title of the well-beloved of
Manneyto
.
He threw himself upon the bearskin of his cabin,
and Matiwan stood beside him. She was not young
she was not beautiful, but her face was softly brown,
and her eye was dark, while her long black hair came
down her back with a flow of girlish luxuriance. Her
face was that of a girl, plump, and though sorrow had
made free with it, the original expression must have
been one of extreme liveliness. Even now, when she
laughed, and the beautiful white teeth glittered through
her almost purple lips, she wore all the expression
of a child. The chief loved her as a child rather than
as a wife, and she rather adored than loved the chief.
At this moment, however, as she stood before him,
robed loosely in her long white garment, and with an
apron of the soft skin of the spotted fawn, he had
neither
words nor looks for Matiwan. She brought him
a gourd filled with a simple beer common to their
people
,
and extracted from the pleasanter roots of the
forest
,
with the nature of which, all Indians, in their rude
pharmacy, are familiar. Unconsciously he drank off
the beverage, and without speaking returned the gourd
to the woman. She addressed him inquiringly at last,
The chief, Sanutee, has sent an arrow from his
bow, yet brings he no venison from the woods?
The red of his cheek grew darker, as the speech
reminded him of his loss, not only of dog, but deer;
and though the sailor had proffered him the meat,
which his pride had compelled him to reject, he could
not but feel that he had been defrauded of the spoils
which had been in reality his own, while sustaining
a severe loss beside: querulously, therefore, was the
manner of his reply:
Has Matiwan been into the tree-top to-day, for
the voice of the bird which is painted, that she must
sing with a foolish noise in the ear of Sanutee?
The woman was rebuked into silence for the
moment, but with a knowledge of his mood, she sunk
back directly behind him, upon a corner of the bear
Vol. I. 8
skin, and after a few prefatory notes, as if singing
for her own exercise and amusement, she carolled
forth in an exquisite ballad voice, one of those little
fancies of the Indians, which may be found among nearly
all the tribes from Carolina to Mexico.It recorded
the achievements of that Puck of the American forests,
the mocking-bird; and detailed the manner in which
he procured his imitative powers. The strain,
playfully
simple in the sweet language of the original,
must necessarily lose in the more frigid verse of the
translator.
THE COONEE-LATEE, OR TRICK-TONGUE.
I.
As the Coonee-latee looked forth from his leaf,
He saw below him a Yemasee chief,
In his war-paint, all so grim
Sung boldly, then, the Coonee-latee,
I, too, will seek for mine enemy,
And when the young moon grows dim,
I'll slip through the leaves, nor shake them,
I'll come on my foes, nor wake them,
And I'll take off their scalps like him.
II.
In the forest grove, where the young birds slept,
Slyly by night, through the leaves he crept
With a footstep free and bold
From bush to bush, and from tree to tree,
They lay, wherever his eye could see,
The bright, the dull, the young, and the old;
I'll cry my war-whoop, said he, at breaking
The sleep, that shall never know awaking,
And their hearts shall soon grow cold.
III.
But, as nigher and nigher, the spot he crept,
And saw that with open mouth they slept,
The thought grew strong in his brain
And from bird to bird, with a cautious tread,
He unhook'd the tongue, out of every head,
Then flew to his perch again;
And thus it is, whenever he chooses,
The tongues of all the birds he uses,
And none of them dare complain.
[12]
[12]
The grove is generally silent when the mocking-bird sings.
The song had something of the desired effect,
though still the chief said nothing. He seemed
soothed, however, and as a beautiful pet fawn bounded
friskingly into the lodge, from the enclosure which
adjoined
it, and leaped playfully upon him, as, with an
indulged habit, he encouraged its caresses; while,
also encouraged by this show, Matiwan herself drew
nigher, and her arm rested upon his shoulder. The
chief, though still silent and musing, suffered his hand
to glide over the soft skin and shrinking back of the
animal, which, still more encouraged by his caress,
now thrust its head into his bosom, while its face was
even occasionally pressed upon his own. On a
sudden
,
however, the warrior started, as his hand was
pressed upon a thick cluster of large and various
beads, which had been wound about the neck of the
playful favourite; and, as if there had been
contamination
in the touch, thrusting the now affrighted animal
away, he cried out to the shrinking woman, in a voice
of thunder:
Matiwan, the white trader has been in the lodge
of Sanutee!
No, chiefSanuteenot Grangerhe has not
been in the lodge of the chief.
The beads! Matiwanthe beads! he cried,
furiously
,
as he tore the cluster from the neck of the fawn,
and dashing them to the ground, trampled them fiercely
under his feet.
The boy,Sanuteethe boy, Occonestoga
The dog! came he to the lodge of Sanutee when
Sanutee said no! Matiwanwoman! Thy ears
have forgotten the words of the chiefof Sanutee
thine eyes have looked upon a dog.
'Tis the child of MatiwanMatiwan has no child
but Occonestoga. And she threw herself at length,
with her face to the ground, at the foot of her lord.
Speak, Matiwandarkens the dog still in the
lodge of Sanutee?
Sanutee, no! Occonestoga has gone with the chiefs
of the English, to talk in council with the Yemassee.
Hathou speakest!look, Matiwan  where
stood the sun when the chiefs of the pale-faces came?
Speak!
The sun stood high over the lodge of Matiwan,
and saw not beneath the tree top.
They come for more landsthey would have all;
but they know not that Sanutee livesthey say he
sleepsthat he has no tongue,that his people have
forgotten his voice! They shall see. As he spoke,
he pointed to the gaudy beads which lay strewed over
the floor of the cabin, and, with a bitter sarcasm of
glance and speech, thus addressed her:
What made thee, a chief of the Yemassees,
Matiwan, to sell the lands of my people to the
pale-faces
for their painted glass? They would buy thee,
and the chief, and the nationall; and with what?
With that which is not worth, save that it is like thine
eye. And thoudidst thou pray to the Manneyto to
send thee from thy people, that thou mightst carry
water for the pale-faces from the spring? Gothou
hast done wrong, Matiwan.
They put the painted glass into the hands of
Matiwan, but they asked not for lands; they gave
it to Matiwan, for she was the wife of Sanutee, the
chief.
They lied with a forked tongue. It was to buy
the lands of our people; it was to send us into the
black swamps, where the sun sleeps for ever. But I
will gowhere is the dogthe slave of the pale-faces?
where went Occonestoga with the English?
To Pocota-ligothey would see the chiefs of
Yemassee.
To buy them with the painted glass, and red cloth,
and strong water. Manneyto be with my people,
for the chiefs are slaves to the English; and they will
give the big forests of my fathers to be cut down by
the accursed axes of the pale-face. But they blind
me notthey buy not Sanutee! The knife must have
bloodthe Yemassee must have his home with the
old grave of his father. I will go to Pocota-ligo.
Sanutee, chief'tis Matiwan, the mother of
Occonestoga
that speaks; thou wilt see the young chief
thou wilt look upon the boy at Pocota-ligo. Oh!
well-beloved
of the Yemasseelook not to strike. She
sunk at his feet as she uttered the entreaty, and her
arms clung about his knees.
I would not see Occonestoga, Matiwanfor he is
thy son. Manneyto befriend thee; but thou hast
been the mother to a dog.
Thou wilt not see to strike
I would not see him! but let him not stand in the
path of Sanutee. Look, Matiwanthe knife is in my
hands, and there is death for the dog, and a curse for
the traitor, from the black swamps of
Opitchi-Manneyto
.
[13]
[13]
The evil principle of the Yemassees.
He said no more, and she, too, was speechless.
She could only raise her hands and eye, in imploring
expressions to his glance, as, seizing upon his
tomahawk
,
which he had thrown beside him upon the skin,
he rushed forth from the lodge, and took the path to
Pocota-ligo.
CHAPTER X.
Ye shall give all
The old homes of your fathers, and their graves,
To be the spoils of strangers, and go forth
A Seminole.
i. e. an exile.
The
house of council, in the town of Pocota-ligo,
was filled that night with an imposing conclave. The
gauds and the grandeurthe gilded mace, the guardian
sword, the solemn stole, the rich pomps of civilization
were wanting, it is true; but how would these have
shown in that dark and primitive assembly! A single
hallhuge and cumbrousbuilt of the unhewn trees
of the forest, composed the entire building. A single
door furnished the means of access and departure.
The floor was the native turf, here and there
concealed
by the huge bearskin of some native chief, and
they sat around, each in his place, silent, solemn, but
with the sagacious mind at work, and with features
filled with the quiet deliberateness of the sage.
Motionless like themselves, stood the torch-bearers,
twelve in number, behind themstanding, and
observant
,
and only varying their position when it became
necessary to renew with fresh materials the bright
fires of the ignited pine which they bore. These
were all the pomps of the savage councilbut the
narrow sense, alone, would object to their deficiency.
The scene is only for the stern painter of the dusky
and the sublimeit would suffer in other hands.
Huspah was at this time the superior chiefthe
reigning king, if we may apply that title legitimately
to the highest dignitary of a people with a form of
government like that of the Yemassees. He bore the
name, though in name only might he claim to be
considered
in that character. In reality, there was no
king over the nation. It was ruled by a number of
chiefs, each equal in authority, though having several
tribes for control, yet the majority of whom were
required
to coalesce in any leading national measures.
These chiefs were elective, and from these the superior,
or presiding chief, was duly chosen; all of these
without exception were accountable to the nation,
though such accountability was rather the result of
popular impulse than of any other more legitimate or
customary regulation. It occurred sometimes,
however
,
that a favourite ruler, presuming upon his strength
with the people, ventured beyond the prescribed
boundary, and transcended the conceded privileges of
his station; but such occurrences were not frequent,
and when the case did happen, the offender was most
commonly made to suffer the unmeasured penalties
always consequent upon any outbreak of popular
indignation
.
As in the practices of more civilized
communities
,
securing the mercenaries, a chief has been
known to enter into treaties, unsanctioned by his
brother chiefs; and, forming a party resolute to sustain
him, has brought about a civil war in the nation, and,
perhaps, the secession from the great body of many of
its tribes. Of this sort was the case of the celebrated
Creek chief, Mackintoshwhose summary execution
in Georgia, but a few years ago, by the indignant
portion of his nation, disapproving of the treaty which
he had made with the whites for the sale of lands,
resulted in the emigration of a large minority of that
people to the west.
Among the Yemassees, Huspah, the oldest chief,
was tacitly placed at the head of his caste, and these
formed the nobility of the nation. This elevation
was nominal, simply complimentary in its character,
and without any advantages not shared in common
with the other chiefs. The honour was solely given to
past achievements; for at this time, Huspah, advanced
in years and greatly enfeebled, was almost in his
second infancy. The true power of the nation rested
in Sanuteehis position was of all others the most
enviable, as upon him the eyes of the populace
generally
turned in all matters of trying and important
character; and his brother chiefs were usually
compelled
to yield to the popular will as it was supposed
to be expressed through the lips of one styled by
general consent, the well-beloved of the nation. A
superiority so enviable with the people had the
unavoidable
effect of subtracting from the favourable
estimate put upon him by his brother chiefs; and the
feelings of jealous dislike which many of them
entertained
towards him, had not been entirely concealed
from the favourite himself. This was shown in various
forms, and particularly in the fact that he was most
generally in a minority, no ways desirable at any time,
but more particularly annoying to the patriotic mind of
Sanutee at the present moment, as he plainly foresaw
the evil consequences to the people of this hostility on
the part of the chiefs to himself. The suggestions
which he made in council were usually met with
decided opposition by a regularly combined party,
and it was only necessary to identify with his name
the contemplated measure, to rally against it sufficient
opposition for its defeat in council. The nation, it is
true, did him justice, but, to his thought, there was
nothing grateful in the strife.
Under this state of things at home, it may be readily
understood why the hostility of Sanutee to the
fastapproaching
English, should find little sympathy with
the majority of those around him. Accordingly, we
find, that as the jealousy of the favourite grew more
and more hostile to the intruders, they became, for
this very reason, more and more favoured by the party
most envious of his position. No one knew better
than Sanutee the true nature of this difference. He
was a far superior politician to those around him, and
had long since foreseen the sort of warfare he would be
compelled to wage with his associates when aiming at
the point to which at this moment every feeling of his
soul and every energy of his mind was devoted. It
was this knowledge that chiefly determined upon the
conspiracythe plan of which, perfectly unknown
to the people, was only intrusted to the bosom of a
few chiefs having like feelings with himself. These
difficulties of his situation grew more fully obvious to
his mind, as, full of evil auguries from the visit of the
English commissioners, he took the lonely path from
his own lodge to the council-house of Pocota-ligo.
He arrived just in season. As he feared, the rival
chiefs had taken advantage of his absence to give
audience to the commissioners of treaty from the
Carolinians, charged with the power to purchase from
the Yemassees a large additional tract of land, which,
if sold to the whites, would bring their settlements
directly upon the borders of Pocota-ligo itself. The
whites had proceeded, as was usual in such cases, to
administer bribes, of one sort or another, in the shape
of presents, to all such persons, chiefs, or people, as
were most influential and seemed most able to serve
them. In this manner had all in that assembly been
appealed to. Huspah, an old and drowsy Indian,
tottering with palsy from side to side of the skin upon
which he sat, was half smothered in the wide folds
of a huge scarlet cloak which the commissioners had
flung over his shoulders. Dresses of various shapes,
colours, and decorations, such as might be held most
imposing to the Indian eye, had been given to each
in the assembly, and put on as soon as received.
In addition to these, other gifts, such as hatchets,
knives, beads, &c. had been made to minister to the
craving poverty of the people, so that before the arrival
of Sanutee, the minds of the greater number had been
prepared for a very liberal indulgence of any claim or
proffer which the commissioners had to make.
Sanutee entered abruptly, followed by Ishiagaska,
who, like himself, had just had intelligence of the
council. There was a visible start in the assembly
as the old patriot came forward, full into the centre of
the circle,surveying, almost analyzing every feature,
and sternly dwelling in his glance upon the three
commissioners
,
who sat a little apart from the chiefs, upon
a sort of mat to themselves. Another mat held the
presents which remained unappropriated and had been
reserved for such chiefs, Ishiagaska and Sanutee
among them, as had not been present in the first
distribution
.
The survey of Sanutee, and the silence which
followed his first appearance within the circle, lasted
not long: abruptly, and with a voice of strong but
restrained
emotion, addressing no one in particular, but
with a glance almost exclusively given to the
commissioners
,
he at length exclaimed as follows, in his
own strong language:Who came to the lodge of
Sanutee to say that the chiefs were in council? Is
not Sanutee a chief?the Yemassees call him so, or he
dreams. Is he not the well-beloved of the Yemassees,
or have his brothers taken from him the totem of his
tribe? Look, chiefs, is the broad arrow of Yemassee
gone from the shoulder of Sanutee? and as he spoke,
throwing the loose hunting shirt open to the shoulder,
he displayed to the gaze of all, the curved arrow
which is the badge of the Yemassees. A general
silence in the assembly succeeded this speechnone of
them caring to answer for an omission equally
chargeable
upon all. The eye of the chief lowered
scornfully
as it swept the circle, taking in each face with its
glance; then, throwing from his arm the thick
bearskin
which he carried, upon a vacant spot in the circle,
he took his seat with the slow and sufficient dignity of
a Roman senator, speaking as he descended.
It is wellSanutee is here in the councilhe is a
chief of the Yemassees. He has ears for the words
of the English.
Granger, the trader and interpreter, who stood
behind the commissioners, signified to them the
willingness
conveyed in the last words of Sanutee, to hear
what they had to say, and Sir Edmund Bellingerthen
newly created a landgrave, one of the titles of
Carolinian
nobilitythe head of the deputation, arose
accordingly, and addressing himself to the new comer,
rather than to the assembly, proceeded to renew those
pledges and protestations which he had already uttered
to the rest. His speech was immediately interpreted
by Granger, who, residing in Pocota-ligo, was
familiar
with their language.
Chiefs of the Yemassee, said Sir Edmund
Bellinger
we
come from your English brothers, and we
bring peace with this belt of wampum. They have
told us to say to you that one house covers the English
and the Yemassee. There is no strife between us
we are like the children of one father, and to prove
their faith they have sent us with words of good-will
and friendship, and to you, Sanutee, as the
well-beloved
chief of the Yemassee, they send this coat
which they have worn close to their hearts, and which
they would have you wear in like manner, in proof of
the love that is between us.
Thus saying, the chief of the deputation presented,
through the medium of Granger, a rich but gaudy
cloak, such as had already been given to Huspah;
but putting the interpreter aside and rejecting the gift,
Sanutee sternly replied
Our English brother is good, but Sanutee asks not
for the cloak. Does Sanutee complain of the cold?
Granger rendered this, and Bellinger addressed him
in reply
The chief Sanutee will not reject the gift of his
English brother.
Does the white chief come to the great council of
the Yemassees as a fur trader? Would he have skins
for his coat? was the reply.
No, Sanuteethe English chief is a great chief,
and does not barter for skins.
A great chief?he came to the Yemassee a little
child, and we took him into our lodges. We gave him
meat and water
We know this, Sanutee. But the Yemassee went
on without heeding the interruption.
We helped him with a staff as he tottered through
the thick wood.
True, Sanutee.
We showed him how to trap the beaver,
[14]
[14]
The beaver, originally taken in Carolina, is now extinct.
and to
hunt the deerwe made him a lodge for his woman;
and we sent our young men on the war-path against his
enemy.
We have not forgotten, we have denied none of the
services, Sanutee, which yourself and people have done
for us, said the deputy.
And now he sends us a coat! and as the chief
uttered this unlooked-for anti-climax, his eye glared
scornfully around upon the subservient portion of the
assembly. Somewhat mortified with the tenour of the
sentence which the interpreter in the meantime had
repeated to him, Sir Edmund Bellinger would have
answered the refractory chief
No, but, Sanutee
Without heeding or seeming to hear him, the old
warrior went on
He sends good words to the Yemassee, he gives
him painted glass, and makes him blind with a water
which is poisonhis shot rings over our forestswe
hide from his long knife in the cold swamp, while
the copper snake creeps over us as we sleep.
As soon as the deputy comprehended this speech,
he replied
You do us wrong, Sanutee,you have nothing to
fear from the English.
Without waiting for the aid of the interpreter, the
chief, who had acquired a considerable knowledge of
the simpler portions of the language, and to whom this
sentence was clear enough, immediately and
indignantly
exclaimed in his ownaddressing the chiefs,
rather than replying to the Englishman.
Fear,Sanutee has no fear of the Englishhe
fears not the Manneyto. He only fears that his people
may go blind with the English poison drink,that the
great chiefs of the Yemassee may sell him for a slave
to the English, to plant his maize and to be beaten
with a stick. But let the ears of the chiefs hear the
voice of Sanuteethe Yemassee shall not be the slave
of the pale-face.
There is no reason for this fear, Sanuteethe
English have always been the friends of your people,
said the chief of the deputation.
Would the English have more land from the
Yemassee
?
Let him speak, Grangerput the words of
Sanutee in his ear. Why does he not speak?
Granger did as directed, and Sir Edmund replied:
The English do want to buy some of the land of
your people
Did not Sanutee say? And the coat is for the land,
quickly exclaimed the old chief, speaking this time in
the English language.
No, Sanutee, was the replythe coat is a free
gift from the English. They ask for nothing in return.
But we would buy your land with other thingswe
would buy on the same terms with that which we bought
from the Cassique of Combahee.
The Cassique of Combahee is a doghe sells the
grave of his father. I will not sell the land of my
people
.
The Yemassee loves the old trees, and the smooth
waters where he was born, and where the bones of the
old warriors lie buried. I speak to you, chiefsit is
the voice of Sanutee. Hear his tongueit has no
forklook on his face, it does not show lies. These
are scars of battle, when I stood up for my people.
There is a name for these scarsthey do not lie.
Hear me, then.
Our ears watch, was the general response, as he
made his address to the council.
It is good.Chiefs of the Yemassee, now hear.
Why comes the English to the lodge of our people?
Why comes he with a red coat to the chiefwhy brings
he beads and paints for the eye of a little boy? Why
brings he the strong water for the young man? Why
makes he long speeches, full of smooth wordswhy
does he call us brother? He wants our lands. But
we have no lands to sell. The lands came from our
fathersthey must go to our children. They do not
belong to us to sellthey belong to our children to
keep. We have sold too much land, and the old
turkey
,
before the sun sinks behind the trees, can fly over
all the land that is ours. Shall the turkey have more
land in a day than the Yemassee has for his children?
Speak for the Yemassee, chiefs of the broad-arrow
speak for the Yemasseespeak Ishiagaskaspeak
Cholucullaspeak, thou friend of Manneyto, whose
words are true as the sun, and whose wisdom comes
swifter than the lightningspeak, prophetspeak
Enoree-Mattee
speak
for the Yemassee.
To the high-priest, or rather the great prophet of
the nation, the latter portion of the speech of Sanutee
had been addressed. He was a cold, dark, stern
looking
man, gaudily arrayed in a flowing garment of red,
a present from the whites at an early period, while a
fillet around his head, of cloth stuck with the richest
feathers, formed a distinguishing feature of dress from
any of the rest. His voice, next to that of Sanutee,
was potential among the Indians; and the chief well
knew, in appealing to him, Choluculla and Ishiagaska,
Vol. I.E 9
that he was secure of these, if of none other in the
council.
Enoree-Mattee is the great prophet of Manneyto
he will not sell the lands of Yemassee.
'Tis wellspeak, Ishiagaskaspeak, Choluculla
exclaimed Sanutee.
They replied in the same moment:
The English shall have no land from the Yemassee.
It is the voice of Ishiagaskait is the voice of
Choluculla
.
It is the voice of Sanuteeit is the voice of the
prophetit is the voice of the Manneyto himself,
cried Sanutee, with a tone of thunder, and with a
solemn
emphasis of manner that seemed to set at rest all
further controversy on the subject. But the voices
which had thus spoken were all that spoke on this
side of the question. The English had not been
inactive
heretofore, and what with the influence gained
from their numerous presents and promises to the other
chiefs, and the no less influential dislike and jealousy
which the latter entertained for the few more
controlling
spirits taking the stand just narrated, the
minds of the greater number had been well prepared
to make any treaty which might be required of them,
trusting to their own influence somewhat, but more
to the attractions of the gewgaws given in return for
their lands, to make their peace with the great body of
the people in the event of their dissatisfaction.
Accordingly
,
Sanutee had scarcely taken his seat, when
one of the most hostile among them, a brave but
dishonest
chief, now arose, and addressing himself chiefly
to Sanutee, thus furnished much of the feeling and
answer for the rest:
Does Sanutee speak for the Yemasseeand where
are the other chiefs of the broad-arrow? Where are
Metatchee and Huspahwhere is Oonalatchie, where
is Jarratayare they not here? It is gone from me
when they sung the death-song, and went afar to the
blessed valley of Manneyto. They are not gone
they fivethey have voices and can speak for the
Yemassee
.
Sanutee may say, Ishiagaska may say, the
prophet may saybut they say not for Manneywanto.
There are brave chiefs of the Yemassee, yet we hear
only Sanutee. Sanutee! cha! cha! I am hereI
Manneywanto. I speak for the trade with our English
brother. The Yemassee will sell the land to their
brothers. He was followed by another and another,
all in the affirmative.
Metatchee will trade with the English. The
English
is the brother to Yemassee.
Oonalatchie will sell the land to the English
brothers
.
And so on in succession, all but the four first
speakers
,
the assembled chiefs proceeded to sanction the
proposed treaty, the terms of which had been submitted
to them before. To the declaration of each,
equivalent
as it was to the vote given in our assemblies,
Sanutee had but a single speech.
It is well! It is well! And he listened to the
votes in succession approving of the trade, until,
rising from a corner of the apartment in which, lying
prostrate, he had till then been out of the sight of the
assembly and entirely concealed from the eye of
Sanutee
,
a tall young warrior, pushing aside the
torch-bearers
,
staggered forth into the ring. He had
evidently
been much intoxicated, though now recovering
from its effects; and, but for the swollen face and the
watery eye, the uncertain and now undignified carriage,
he might well have been considered a fine specimen of
savage symmetry and manly beauty. When his voice,
declaring also for the barter, struck upon the ear of the
old chief, he started round as if an arrow had suddenly
gone into his heartthen remained still, silently
contemplating
the speaker, who, in a stupid and
incoherent
manner, proceeded to eulogize the English as the
true friends and dear brothers of the Yemassees.
Granger, the trader and interpreter, beholding the
fingers
of Sanutee gripe the handle of his tomahawk,
whispered
in the ears of Sir Edmund Bellinger
Now would I not be Occonestoga for the world.
E 2
Sanutee will tomahawk him before the stupid youth
can get out of the way.
Before the person addressed could reply to the
interpreter
,
his prediction was in part, and, but for the ready
presence of the Englishman, would have been wholly,
verified. Scarcely had the young chief finished his
maudlin speech, than, with a horrible grin, seemingly
of laughter, Sanutee leaped forward, and with uplifted
arm and descending blow, would have driven the
hatchet deep into the scull of the only half-conscious
youth, when Sir Edmund seized the arm of the fierce
old man in time to defeat the effort.
Wouldst thou slay thy own son, Sanutee?
He is thy slavehe is not the son of Sanutee.
Thou hast made him a dog with thy poison water, till
he would sell thee his own mother to carry water for
thy women. Hold me not, EnglishmanI will strike
the slaveI will strike thee too, thou that art his
master
;
and with a fury and strength which required the
restraining power of half a dozen, he laboured to effect
his object. They succeeded, however, in keeping
him back, until the besotted youth had been safely
hurried
from the apartment; when, silenced and stilled by
the strong reaction of his excitement, the old chief
sunk down again upon his bearskin seat in a stupor,
until the parchment conveying the terms of the treaty,
with pens and ink, provided by Granger for their
signatures
,
was handed to Huspah, for his own and the
marks of the chiefs. Sanutee looked on with some
watchfulness, but moved not until one of the attendants
brought in the skin of a dog filled with earth and
tightly secured with thongs, giving it the appearance of
a sack. Taking this sack in his hands, Huspah, who
had been half asleep during the proceedings, now arose,
and repeating the words of general concurrence in the
sale of the lands, proceeded to the completion of the
treaty by conveying the sack which held some of the
soil to the hands of the commissioners. But Sanutee
again rushed forward; and seizing the sack from the
proffering hand of Huspah, he hurled it to the ground,
trampled it under foot, and poured forth, as he did so,
an appeal to the patriotism of the chiefs, in a strain of
eloquence in his own wild language which we should
utterly despair to render into ours. He implored
them, holding as they did the destinies of the nation
in their hands, to forbear its sacrifice. He compared
the wide forests of their fathers, in value, with the
paltry
gifts for which they were required to give them up.
He dwelt upon the limited province, even now, which
had been left them for the chase; spoke of the daily
incursions and injuries of the whites, and with those
bold forms of phrase and figure known among all
primitive
people, with whom metaphor and personification
supply the deficiency and make up for the poverty of
language, he implored them not to yield up the bones
of their fathers, nor admit the stranger to contact with
the sacred town, given them by the Manneyto, and
solemnly dedicated to his service. But he spoke in
vain; he addressed ears more impenetrable than those
of the adder. They had been bought and sold, and
they had no scruple to sell their country. He was
supported by the few who had spoken with him against
the trade, but what availed patriotism against numbers?
They were unheeded, and beholding the contract
effected
which gave up an immense body of their best
lands for a strange assortment of hatchets, knives,
blankets, brads, beads, and other commodities of like
character, Sanutee, followed by his three friends, rushed
forth precipitately, and with a desperate purpose, from
the traitorous assembly.
CHAPTER XI.
A vengeance for the traitors; vengeance deep
As is their treasoncurses loud, and long,
Surpassing their own infamy and guilt.
But
the Well-Beloved was not disposed to yield up
the territory of his forefathers without farther struggle.
Though governed by chiefs, the Yemassees were yet
something of a republic, and the appeal of the old
patriot now lay with the people. He was much better
acquainted with the popular feeling than those who
had so far sacrificed it; and though maddened with
indignation, he was yet sufficiently cool to determine
the most effectual course for the attainment of his
object. Not suspecting his design, the remaining
chiefs continued in council, in deliberations of one
sort or another, probably in adjusting the mode of
distributing their spoils; while the English
commissioners
,
having succeeded in their object, retired for
the night to the dwelling of Granger, the Indian trader
a Scotch adventurer, who had been permitted to take up
his abode in the village, and from his quiet,
unobtrusive
,
and conciliatory habits, had contrived to secure
much of the respect and good regard of the
Yemassees
.
Sanutee, meanwhile, dividing his proposed
undertaking with his three companions, Enoree-Mattee
the prophet, Ishiagaska, and Choluculla, all of whom
were privy to the meditated insurrection, went from
lodge to lodge of the most influential and forward of
the Yemassees. Nor did he confine himself to these.
The rash, the thoughtless, the ignorantall were
aroused by his eloquence. To each of these he
detailed the recent proceedings of council, and, in his
own vehement manner, explained the evil
consequences
to the people of such a treaty; taking care to
shape his information to the mind or mood of each
particular individual to whom he spoke. To one, he
painted the growing insolence of the whites, increasing
with their increasing strength, almost too great,
already, for any control or management from them.
To another, he described the ancient glories of his
nation, rapidly departing in the subservience with
which their chiefs acknowledged the influence, and
truckled to the desires of the English. To a third,
he deplored the loss of the noble forests of his
forefathers
,
hewn down by the axe, to make way for the
bald fields of the settler; despoiled of game, and
leaving the means of life utterly problematical to the
hunter. In this way, with a speech accommodated to
every feeling and understanding, he went over the
town. To all, he dwelt with Indian emphasis upon
the sacrilegious appropriation of the old burial-places
of the Yemasseeone of which, a huge tumulus upon
the edge of the river, lay almost in their sight, and
traces of which survive to this day, in melancholy
attestation
of their past history. The effect of these
representations
of
these appealscoming from one so
well beloved, and so highly esteemed for wisdom and
love of country, as Sanutee, was that of a moral
earthquake; and his soul triumphed with hope, as he
beheld them rushing onwards to the gathering crowd,
and shouting furiously, as they bared the knife, and
shook the tomahawk in airSangarrah, Sangarrah-me,
YemasseeSangarrah, Sangarrah-me, Yemassee
the bloody war-cry of the nation. To overthrow the
power of the chiefs, there was but one mode; and the
impelling directions of Sanutee and the three
coadjutors
already mentioned, drove by concert the infuriated
mob to the house of council, where the chiefs were
still in session.
It is Huspah, that has sold the Yemassee to be a
woman, was the cry of oneSangarrah-mehe
shall die.
He hath cut off the legs of our children, so that
they walk no longerhe hath given away our lands to
the pale-facesSangarrah-mehe shall die!
They shall all diehave they not planted corn
in the bosom of my mother?cried another,
referring
,
figuratively, to the supposed use which the
English
would make of the lands they had bought; and,
furiously aroused, they struck their hatchets against
the house of council, commanding the chiefs within
to come forth, and deliver themselves up to their
vengeance
.
But, warned of their danger, the beleaguered
rulers had carefully secured the entrance; and
trusting
that the popular ebullition would soon be quieted,
they fondly hoped to maintain their position until such
period. But the obstacle thus offered to the progress
of the mob, only served the more greatly to inflame it;
and a hundred hands were busy in procuring piles of
fuel, with which to fire the building. The torches
were soon brought, the blaze kindled at different
points, and but little was now wanting to the
conflagration
which must have consumed all within or
driven them forth upon the weapons of the besiegers;
when, all of a sudden, Sanutee made his appearance,
and with a single word arrested the movement.
Manneyto, Manneyto exclaimed the old chief,
with the utmost powers of his voice, and the solemn
adjuration reached to the remotest incendiary and
arrested the application of the torch. Every eye was
turned upon him, curious to ascertain the occasion of an
exclamation so much at variance with the purpose of
their gathering, and so utterly unlooked-for from lips
which had principally instigated it. But the glance
of Sanutee indicated a mind unconscious of the effect
which it had produced. His eye was fixed upon
another object, which seemed to exercise a fascinating
influence upon him. His hands were outstretched, his
lips parted, as it were, in amazement and awe, and his
whole attitude was that of devotion. The eyes of
the assembly followed the direction of his, and every
bosom thrilled with the wildest throes of natural
superstition
,
as they beheld Enoree-Mattee the prophet,
writhing upon the ground at a little distance in the
most horrible convulsions. The glare of the torches
around him showed the angry distortions of every
feature. His eyes were protruded, as if bursting from
their socketshis tongue hung from his widely
distended
jaws, covered with foamwhile his hands and
legs seemed doubled up, like a knotted band of snakes,
huddling in uncouth sports in midsummer.
Opitchi-ManneytoOpitchi-Manneytohere are
arrowswe burn arrows to thee; we burn red
feathers
to thee, Opitchi-Manneytowas the universal
cry of deprecatory prayer and promise, which the
assembled mass sent up to their evil deity, whose
presence
and power they supposed themselves to behold,
in the agonized workings of their prophet. A yell of
savage terror then burst from the lips of the inspired
priest, and rising from the ground, as one relieved, but
pregnant with a sacred fury, he waved his hand towards
the council-house, and rushed headlong into the crowd,
with a sort of anthem, which, as it was immediately
chorused by the mass, must have been usual to such
occasions.
The arrows
The feathers
The dried scalps, and the teeth,
The teeth from slaughtered enemies
Where are theywhere are they?
We burn them for thee,black spirit
We burn them for thee, Opitchi-Manneyto
Leave us, leave us, black spirit.
The crowd sung forth this imploring deprecation of
the demon's wrath; and then, as if something more
relieved, Enoree-Mattee uttered of himself
I hear thee, Opitchi-Manneyto
Thy words are in my ears,
They are words for the Yemassee;
And the prophet shall speak them
Leave us, leave us, black spirit.
Leave us, leave us, black spirit. Go to thy red
home, Opitchi-Manneytolet us hear the words of
the prophetwe give ear to Enoree-Mattee.
Thus called upon, the prophet advanced to the side
of Sanutee, who had all this while preserved an
attitude
E 3
of the profoundest devotion. He came forward,
with all the look of inspiration, and his words were
poured forth in an uncouth rhythm, which was doubtless
the highest pitch of lyric poetry among them.
Let the Yemassee have ears,
For Opitchi-Manneyto
'Tis Opitchi-Manneyto,
Not the prophet, now that speaks,
Hear Opitchi-Manneyto.
In my agony, he came,
And he hurl'd me to the ground;
Dragged me through the twisted bush,
Put his hand upon my throat,
Breathed his fire into my mouth
That Opitchi-Manneyto.
And he said to me in wrath,
Listen, what he said to me;
Hear the prophet, Yemassees
For he spoke to me in wrath;
He was angry with my sons,
For he saw them bent to slay,
Bent to strike the council-chiefs,
And he would not have them slain,
That Opitchi-Manneyto.
As the prophet finished the line that seemed to
deny them the revenge which they had promised
themselves
upon their chiefs, the assembled multitude
murmured
audibly, and Sanutee, than whom no better
politician lived in the nation, knowing well that the
show of concession is the best mode of execution
among the million, came forward, and seemed to
address
the prophet, while his speech was evidently
meant for them.
Wherefore, Enoree-Mattee, should
Opitchi-Manneyto
save the false chiefs who have robbed their
people
?
Shall we not have their bloodshall we not
hang their scalps in the treeshall we not bury their
heads in the mud? Wherefore this strange word from
Opitchi-Manneytowherefore would he save the
traitors
?
It is the well-belovedit is the well-beloved of
Manneytospeak, prophet, to Sanutee, was the
general
cry; and the howl, which at that moment had been
universal, was succeeded by the hush and awful
stillness
of the grave. The prophet was not slow to answer
for the demon, in the style of his previous harangue.
'Tis Opitchi-Manneyto,
Not the prophet now that speaks,
Give him ear then, Yemassee,
Hear Opitchi-Manneyto.
Says Opitchi-Manneyto,
Wherefore are my slaves so few
Not for me the gallant chief,
Slaughtered by the Yemassee
Blest, the slaughtered chief must go,
To the happy home that lies
In the bosom of the hills,
Where the game is never less,
Though the hunter always slays
Where the plum-groves always bloom,
And the hunter never sleeps.
Says Opitchi-Manneyto
Wherefore are my slaves so few?
Shall the Yemassee give death
Says Opitchi-Manneyto
To the traitor, to the slave,
Who would sell the Yemassee
Who would sell his father's bones,
And behold the green corn grow
From his wife's and mother's breast.
Death is for the gallant chief,
Says Opitchi-Manneyto.
Life is for the traitor slave,
But a life that none may know
With a shame that all may see.
Thus, Opitchi-Manneyto,
To his sons, the Yemassee
Take the traitor chiefs, says he,
Make them slaves, to wait on me.
Bid Malatchie take the chiefs,
He, the executioner
Take the chiefs and bind them down,
Cut the totem from each arm,
So that none may know the slaves,
Not their fathers, not their mothers
Children, wives, that none may know
Not the tribes that look upon,
Not the young men of their own,
Not the people, not the chiefs
Not the good Manneyto know.
Thus Opitchi-Manneyto,
Make these traitors slaves for me:
Then the blessed valley lost,
And the friends and chiefs they knew,
None shall know them, all shall flee,
Make them slaves to wait on me
Hear Opitchi-Manneyto,
Thus, his prophet speaks for him,
To the mighty Yemassee.
The will of the evil deity thus conveyed to the
Indians
by the prophet, carried with it a refinement in
the art of punishment to which civilization has not
often
attained. According to the pneumatology of the
Yemassees, the depriving the criminal of life did not
confer degradation or shame; for his burial
ceremonies
were precisely such as were allotted to those
dying
in the very sanctity and fullest odour of favourable
public opinion. But this was not the case when the
totem or badge of his tribe had been removed from
that portion of his person where it had been the
custom
of the people to
tatoo
it; for without this totem,
no other nation could recognise them, their own
resolutely
refused to do it, and, at their death, the great
Manneyto would reject them from the plum-groves
and the happy valley, when the fierce
Opitchi-Manneyto
,
the evil demon, whom they invoked with as
much, if not more earnestness than the good, was
always
secure of his prey. A solemn awe succeeded
for a moment this awful annunciation among the crowd;
duly exaggerated by the long and painful howl of
agony
with which the doomed traitors within the
council-house
,
who had been listening, were made conscious
of its complete purport. Then came a shout of
triumphant
revenge from those without, who now, with
minds duly directed to the new design, were as
resolute
to preserve the lives of the chiefs as they had
before
been anxious to destroy them. Encircling the
council-house
closely in order to prevent their escape, they
determined patiently to adopt such measures as should
best secure them as prisoners. The policy of
Sanutee
,
for it will scarcely need that we point to him as
the true deviser of the present scheme, was an
admirable
one in considering the Indian character.To
overthrow the chiefs properly, and at the same time to
discourage communication with the English, it was
better to degrade than to destroy them. The
populace
may sympathize with the victim whose blood they
have shed, for death in all countries goes far to cancel
the memory of offence; but they seldom restore to
their estimation the individual they have themselves
degraded. The mob, in this respect, seems to be duly
conscious of the hangman filthiness of its own fingers.
CHAPTER XII.
This makes of thee a master, me a slave,
And I destroy it; we are equal now.
A not
less exciting scene was now going on within
the council-chamber. There, all was confusion and
despair. The shock of such a doom as that which the
chiefs had heard pronounced by the people, under the
influence of the prophet, came upon them like a bolt
of thunder. For a moment it paralyzed with its terrors
the hearts of those who had no fear of death. The
mere loss of life is always an event of triumph with the
brave of the Indians, and for the due ennobling of which,
his song of past victories and achievements, carefully
chronicled by a memory which has scarcely any other
employment, is shouted forth in the most acute
physical
agony, with a spirit which nothing can bend or
conquer. But to deprive him of this memoryto
eradicate all the marks of his achievementsto take
from him the only credential by which he operates
among his fellows and claims a place in the ranks of
the illustrious deadwas a refinement upon the
terrors
of punishment, which, unfrequently practised,
was held as a terror, intended to paralyze, as in the
present instance, every thing of moral courage which
10
the victim might possess. For a moment such was
its effect in the assembly of the chiefs. The solitary
howl of despair which their unanimous voices sent up
as the first intimation of the decree met their ears,
was succeeded by the deepest silence, while they
threw themselves upon their faces, and the
torch-bearers
,
burying their torches in the clay floor of the
building, with something of that hate and horror which
seemed to distinguish the body of the Indians without,
rushed forth from the apartment and joined with the
assembled people. Their departure aroused the
despairing
inmates, and while one of them carefully
again closed the entrance before the watchful mass
without could avail themselves of the opening, the rest
prepared themselves with a renewed courage to
deliberate
upon their situation.
There is death for Manneywanto, exclaimed that
fierce warrior and chiefhe will not lose the arrow
of his tribe. I will go forth to the hatchet. I will
lift my arm, and strike so that they shall slay.
Let them put the knife to the heart of Oonalatchie,
cried anotherbut not to the arrow upon his
shoulder. He will go forth with Manneywanto.
The determination of the whole was soon made.
Huspah, the superior but superannuated chief,
tottering
in advance, and singing mournfully the song of
death with which the Indian always prepares for its
approach
.
The song became general with the victims, and
with drawn knives and ready hatchets, they threw wide
the entrance, and rushing forth with a fury duly
heightened
by the utter hopelessness of escape, they struck
desperately on all sides among the hundreds by whom
they were beleagnered. But they had been waited and
prepared for, and forbearing to strike in return, and
freely risking their own lives, the Indians were content
to bear them down by the force of numbers. The
more feeble among them fell under the pressure. Of
these was Huspah the king, whom the crowd
immediately
dragged from the press, and in spite of the
exertions of Sanutee, who desired the observance of
some formalities which marked the ceremony, they
fiercely cut away the flesh of the arm bearing the
insignia, while his shrieks of despair and defiance,
reaching the ears of his comrades, still struggling,
heightened their desperation and made their arrest
the more difficult. But the strife was in a little time
over. The crowd triumphed, and the chiefs, still living
and unhurt, saving only a few bruises which were
unavoidable
in the affray, were all secured but
Manneywanto
.
That powerful and ferocious chief manfully
battled with a skill and strength that knew no
abatement
from its exercise, and seemed only heightened by
the opposition. A friendly hand, at length, whose
stroke he blessed, encountered him in the crowd and
severed his scull with a hatchet. He was the only
individual of the traitors by whom the vengeance of the
Indians was defrauded; not another of the clan proved
fortunate in his desperation. The survivers were all
securely taken, and, carefully bound with thongs, were
borne away to the great tumulus, upon which the
doom was to be put in execution. In an hour after
they were expatriated men, flying desperately to
the forests, homeless, nationless, outcasts from God and
man, yet destined to live. It is remarkable that in all
this time, suicide never entered the thoughts of the
victims. It forms no part of the Indian's philosophy,
and the Roman might have won a lesson from the
Yemassee, in this respect, which would have ennobled
his Catos.
Meanwhile the deputation of the Carolinians lay at
the house of Granger, full of apprehensions for their
common safety. Nor was Granger himself less so. He
felt assured of the danger, and only relied upon the
interposition of Sanutee, which he knew to be
all-powerful
,
and which, looking on the outbreak of the
people as the result of their own impulse, he saw no
reason to imagine would be denied on the present
occasion. From their place of retreat, which lay on
the skirts of the town and nigh the river, the embassy
could hear the outcries and clamours of the Indians
without being acquainted with particulars; and when
at length they beheld the flames ascending from the
house of council, which, when they had seized upon
the chiefs, the rioters had fired, believing the chiefs
consumed in the conflagration, they gave themselves
up for lost. They did not doubt that the fury which
had sacrificed so many and such influential persons
would scarcely be satisfied to allow of their escape;
and firmly impressed with the conviction that their
trial was at hand, Sir Edmund Bellinger drew his
sword, and, followed by the rest of the deputation,
prepared
for a conflict in which they had but one hope,
and that lay in selling the life dearly, which seemed
so certainly forfeited.
In this mood of mind they waited the coming of the
storm, nor were they long kept in suspense. Having
beheld the fearful doom carried into effect, and seen
their ancient rulers scourged out of the town, the
revolutionists rushed headlong, and with an appetite
for blood duly heightened by the little they had seen,
to the dwelling of the trader--vowing as they hurried
along, to their infernal deity, Opitchi-Manneyto, an
increase
of slaves in the persons of the Englishmen,
whom they proposed to sacrifice by fire. On their
way, mistaking one of their own people who had
dressed himself somewhat after the fashion of the
English, in a dress which had been discarded by some
white man, they dashed him to the earth, trampled and
nearly tore him into pieces before discovering the
mistake. In such a temper, they appeared before the
dwelling of the trader, and with loud shouts demanded
their prey.
Determined upon stout resistance to the last, the
commissioners had barricadoed the little dwelling as
well as they could; and doubtless, for a small space of
time, would have made it tenable; but fortunately for
them, just as the furious savages were about to apply
the fatal torch to the building, the appearance of
Enoree-Mattee
and Sanutee, spared them an issue which
could have only terminated in their murder. Sanutee
had his game to play, and though perfectly indifferent
as to the fate of the commissioners, yet, as his hope in
the forthcoming insurrection lay in taking the
Carolinians
by surprise, it was his policy to impress
confidence
rather than distrust upon them. He aimed now
to divest the embassy of all suspicion, and to confine
the show of indignation made by the Yemassees,
entirely
to the chiefs who had so abused their power.
Addressing the mob, he controlled it in his own
manner
,
and telling them that they wanted nothing from the
English but the treaty which had so fraudulently been
entered into by their chiefs, he engaged to them to
effect
its restoration, along with the skin of earth, which,
completing the bargain, was equivalent in their
estimation
,
not less to legal right than to actual possession.
After some demur, Granger admitted the chief, who came
alone to the presence of the deputation, the chairman
of which thus sternly addressed him:
Are the English dogs, said Sir Edmund Bellinger,
that thy people hunt them with cries and fire?
Wherefore is this, Sanutee?
The English have the lands of my people, and
therefore my people hunt them. The bad chiefs who
sold the land as chiefs of the Yemassee, are chiefs
no longer.
Thou hast slain them? inquired Sir Edmund.
No, but they are deaddead to Sanuteedead to
the Yemasseedead to Manneyto. They are dogs
the English have slaves in the woods.
But their acts are good with us, and the English
will protect them, Sanutee, and will punish their
enemies
.
Beware, chiefI tell thee there is danger for
thy people.
It is good. Does the white chief hear my people?
They cry for blood. They would drink it from thy
heart, but Sanutee is the friend of the English. They
shall touch thee not, to harm.
Thou hast said well, Sanutee, and I expected no
less from thee; but why do they not go? Why do they
still surround our dwelling?
They wait for the wampumthey would tear the
skin which carries the land of the Yemassee; and the
chief, as he spoke, pointed to the treaty and the sack
of earth which lay by the side of Bellinger. He
proceeded
to tell them that they should be secure when
these were re-delivered to the Indians. But with the
commissioners it was a point of honour not to restore
the treaty which they had obtained from the rulers
de
facto
of the peoplecertainly, not to a lawless mob;
and regarding only the high trust of which he had
charge, the speech of the chief commissioner was
instantaneous
:
Never, Sanutee, neveronly with my blood. Go
you have my answer. We shall fight to the last,
and our blood be upon the heads of your people. They
will pay dearly for every drop of it they spill.
It is well said Sanutee, It is well: Sanutee
will go back to his people, and the knife of the
Yemassee
will dig for his land in the heart of the English.
He left the house, and with gloomy resignation,
Bellinger
,
with the other commissioners and Granger,
prepared
for the coming storm with all their philosophy.
In a few moments the anticipated commotion began.
The populace, but a little before silent and patient, now
chafed and roared like a stormy ocean, and the fierce
cry of Sangarrah-me, the cry for blood, went up from a
thousand voices. The torches were brought forward,
and the deputies, firm and fearless enough, saw no hope
even of a chance for the use of their weapons. The
two subordinates, with Granger, looked imploringly to
Bellinger, but the stern chief paced the apartment
unbendingly
,
though seemingly well aware of all the
dangers of their situation. At that moment the wife of
Grangera tall, fine looking woman, of much
masculine
beauty, appeared from an inner apartment, and
before she had been observed by either of the
commissioners
,
seizing upon the little skin of earth and the
parchment at the same moment, without a word, she
threw open the door, and cried out to Sanutee to receive
them. This was all done in an instant, and before the
stern commissioner could see or interfere, the deposites,
placed in the grasp of the savages, were torn into a
thousand pieces.
Woman, how darest thou do this!was the first
sentence of Bellinger to the person who had thus yielded
up his trust. But she fearlessly confronted him
My life is precious to me, my lord, though you
may be regardless of yours. The treaty is nothing
now to the Yemassees, who have destroyed their chiefs
on account of it. To have kept it would have done
no good, but must have been destructive to us all.
Sanutee
will keep his word, and our lives are now saved.
It was evident that she was right, and Bellinger was
wise enough to see it. He said nothing farther, glad,
perhaps, that the responsibility of the trust had been
thus removed from himand, true to his word,
Sanutee
now reappeared among them. The crowd was
pacified by his exhortations rather than by the
concession
,
and the storm was rapidly subsiding. A
little delay followed, in which the commissioners were
busy in making preparations for their departure, and
waiting, under Sanutee's suggestion, the disappearance
of the people, which he assured them would take place
soon. The clamour having subsided, they prepared
to go forth under the protection and presence of the
old chief, which the proud Sir Edmund Bellinger
indignantly
,
but in vain, refused. Seeing that Granger
and his wife remained, Sanutee turned suddenly upon
him, and in a low tone, unheard by the commissioners,
asked why he did not prepare to go also. He
answered
by avowing his willingness still to remain in
Pocota-ligo as before, for the purposes of trade.
GoSanutee is good friend to Granger, and to his
woman. Go allthere is fire and a knife in the hand
of the Yemassees, and they will drink a deep draught
from the heart of the pale-faces. If Granger will not
go from Yemassee, look, the hatchet of Sanutee is
ready; and he raised it as he spokeSanutee will
save Granger from the fire-death.
This is the last service which the Indian warrior
may do his friend, and Granger understood the extent
of his danger from this proffer, meant as a kindness
on the part of the old chief. He needed no second
exhortation to a remove, and though the hope of gain
and a prosperous trade had encouraged him hitherto
to risk every thing in his present residence, the love
of life proved stronger; for he well knew that
Sanutee
seldom spoke without reason. Packing up,
therefore
,
with the aid of his wife, the little remaining stock
in trade which he possessed, and which a couple of
good-sized bundles readily comprised, they took their
way along with the commissioners, and, guided by
Sanutee, soon reached the river. Choosing for them
a double canoe, the old chief saw them safely
embarked
.
Taking the paddles into their own hands, the
midnight wayfarers descended the stream on their way
towards the Block House, while, surrounded by a small
group of his people, Sanutee watched their slow
progress
from the banks.
CHAPTER XIII.
And merrily, through the long summer day,
The southern boatman winds his pliant horn,
As sweeping with the long pole down his streams,
He cheers the lazy hours, and speeds them on.
The
fugitives reached the Block House in safety,
and found the few hours of repose which they could
snatch between the time of their midnight escape and
daylight, highly grateful from the fatigues which they
had undergone. The upper apartments were
appropriately
divided between the commissioners and
Granger, who, with his wife, instead of seeking sleep
on their arrival, proceeded with all the usage of the
trader, to attend, first, to the proper safety and
arrangement
of his stock in trade; which, consisting of a
few unsold goods, of a description adapted to the wants
of that region, and some small bundles of furs,
intrinsically
of little value, were yet to the selfish
tradesman
of paramount importance.
It was early sunrise on the morning following the
wild events narrated in our last chapter, when Gabriel
Harrison, of whom we have seen little for some time
past, appeared on the edge of the little brow of hill,
known as the Chief's Bluff, which immediately
overlooked
the Pocota-ligo river. In the distance, some ten
or twelve miles, unseen, lay the Indian village or town
of the same name. Immediately before him, say one
or two miles above, in the broadest part of the stream,
rested motionless as the hill upon which he stood, the
sharp clipper-built vessel, which has already called
for some of our attention, and which at this moment
seemed to attract no small portion of his. Sheltered
by the branches of a single tree, which arose from
the centre of the bluff, Harrison continued the
scrutiny
,
with here and there a soliloquizing remark, until
interrupted by the presence of the commissioners,
who, with Granger, now came towards him from the
Block House.
Ha, Sir Edmundgentlemenhow fares it, and
when came you from Pocota-ligo? was the
salutation
of Harrison to the deputation.
At midnight, my lordat midnight, and in a hurry;
we had the nation upon us. There has been a
commotion
,
and by this time, I doubt not, the Yemassees
have cut the throats of all the chiefs friendly to our
proposed treaty.
Indeed, but this is worse and worse. I feared
something, and warned the assembly against this
movement. But their cursed desire to possess the lands
must precipitate all the dangers I have been looking
for. I told them that the Yemassees were
discontented
,
and that the utmost care must be taken not to
goad them too greatly. I saw this in the sullenness of
old Sanutee himself, and they have given wings to the
mischief by their imprudence. But how was it, Sir
Edmund? let us have particulars.
The circumstances, as already narrated, were soon
told, and the countenance of Harrison bespoke the
full thoughts in his bosom. Turning to Granger, at
length he addressed the trader inquiringly:
Can you say nothing more than thiswhat have
you learned touching Ishiagaska? Was it as I feared?
Had he been to St. Augustine?
He had, my lord,
HarrisonHarrisonCaptain Harrison,
impatiently
exclaimed the person addressedforget not
that here I have no other title. Go on.
Ishiagaska, sir, and old Choluculla, both of them
have been to St. Augustine, and but a week ago returned,
loaded with presents.
Ay, ay, the storm gathers, and we must look to it,
gentlemen commissioners. This matter hurries it
onward
.
They were making their preparations fast
enough before, and they will now see no reason in this
to pause. Yet you say that Sanutee saved you.
He did, and seemed friendly enough.
Said he aught of disapproval to their proceedings?
made he any professions of regard to the English?
He said little, but that was friendly, and his
interposition
for our safety
Was his policy. He is a cunning savage, but I
see through him. He does not wish to alarm us, for
they can only conquer by disarming our caution; and
this is my greatest fear. Our people are so venturous
that they refuse to believe any evidence short of actual
demonstration, and every day finds them thrusting their
heads and shoulders farther and farther into the mouth
of the enemy, and without the chance of support from
their friends. They will grow wise at a fearful price,
or I am greatly deceived.
But what do you propose, my lord, if you look for
an insurrection near at hand? asked Sir Edmund
Bellinger.
I might answer you readily enough, Sir Edmund,
by asking you wherefore I am here. But please
style me Harrison, and if that be too abrupt in its
expression, Master or Captain Gabriel Harrison. It
is something of my game to see for myself the
difficulties
and the dangers at hand, and for this reason I
now play the spy. Here, I am perfectly unknown,
save to one or two;except as the captain of a little
troop, whose confidence I secured in the affair with
your Coosaws and Ashepoos, and which I imbodied on
that occasion. Still they only know me as Captain
Harrison, and somehow or other, they are well enough
content with me in that character.
And think you this insurrection nigh at hand?
Nay, Sir Edmund, that is the question, and it is
exceedingly important to know. Our borderers are
not willing to come out, unless for serious cause, and
to call them out prematurely would not only tax the
colony beyond its resources, but would dismiss the
present rulers of the people, with curses both loud and
deep, to the unambitious retreats of home and fireside.
They are turbulent enough now, and this matter of
religion, which our lords proprietors in England, the
bigoted old Granville in particular, seem so willing
with all their usual tyranny to meddle with, has
completely
maddened these same people, in whose watery
county of Granville we now stand.
And what do you propose to do?
Why, surely, to gain what information we can,
before calling the people to arms. To make them
cautious, is all that we can do now. The evidence
which I have of this approaching insurrection, though
enough for suspicion, will scarcely be considered
enough for action; and I must spy myself, and engage
others in the work, so as to keep pace with their
movements. They must be watched closely,ay,
and in every quarter, Sir Edmund, for let me tell you,
that in your own barony of Ashepoo, they are quite
as devilishly inclined as here. They are excited all
around us.
But I have seen nothing of all this, was the reply
of the landgrave. The Ashepoos, what are left of
them, seem quiet enough in my neighbourhood.
To be sure they are, in the presence of Sir
Edmund Bellinger, the immediate authority of the
English in their country. But did you strip yourself
of your authority, as I have done, for I am just from
that very quarter; put on the dress, and some of the
slashing and bilbo swagger of a drunken captain from
the Low Countries, to whom a pot of sour ale was the
supreme of felicity, they had shown you more of their
true nature. Some of my evidence would amuse you.
For example, I crossed the river last night to the
house of Tamaita, an old squaw who tells fortunes
in the very centre of Terrapin swamp, where she is
surrounded by as damnable an assemblage of living
alligators, as would have made happy all the
necromancers
of the past ages, she told me my fortune,
which she had ready at my hand, and which, if true,
will certainly make me a convert to her philosophy.
But, with her predictions, she gave me a great deal of
advice, probably with the view to their being more
perfectly verified. Among other things, she promised
me a great deal of lightning, a promise which you
would naturally enough suppose, meant nothing more
than one of our summer afternoon thunder storms,
which, by the way, are terrible enough.
What else should she mean?
Her lightning signified the arrows of the
Yemassees
.
In this way, they figure the rapidity and the
danger attending the flight of their long shafts. The
promise tallied well with the counsel of Sanutee, who
advised me yesterday to be off in the big canoe.
Which advice you declineyou propose still to
continue here, my lordCaptain Harrison, I mean,
replied Sir Edmund.
Of God's surety, I will, Sir Edmund. Can I else
now? I must watch this movement as well as I can,
and make our people generally do so, or the tomahawk
and fire will sweep them off in a single night. Apart
from that, you know this sort of adventure is a pleasure
to me, and there is a something of personal interest in
some of my journeyings, which I delight to see ripen.
Bellinger smiled, and Harrison continued with an air
of the most perfect business.
But go on, gentlementhe sooner, the better.
Make the best of your way to Charlestown, but trust
not to cross the land as you came. Keep from the
woods, for the journey that way is a slow one, and if
things turn out as I fear, they will swarm before long
with enemies, even to the gates of Charlestown. Do
me grace to place these despatches safely with their
proper trusts. The assembly will read these in secret.
This to the lieutenant-governor, who will act upon it
immediately. Despatch now, gentlemenI have hired
boat, which Granger will procure for you from
Grimstead
.
The commissioners were soon provided, and took
their departure at once for the city. Granger, after
this, returned to the conference with Harrison at the
Chief's Bluff, where the latter continued to linger.
Have you seen Hector? asked the latter.
I have not, sir.
Indeed. Strange! He had a charge from me
yesterday to take the track of a sea-faring fellow,
whom I encountered, and of whom I had suspicions
after that, he was to cross, and give you intelligence
of my being here.
I have seen nothing of him.
The blockhead has plunged into trap then, I doubt
not. Confound him, for a dull beast. To be absent at
this time, when I so much want him.
While Harrison thus vented his anger and disquiet,
Granger, suddenly recollecting that he was called
to the afternoon before, by one in a boat, as he was
proceeding rapidly to join the commissioners in
Pocota-ligo
,
though without knowing the voice or
hearing
it repeated, now related the circumstance, and
at once satisfied the person he addressed of the
correctness
of his apprehensions.
Hahe is then in that sailor's clutches. But
he shall disgorge him. I'll not lose Hector, on any
terms. He's the very prince of body servants, and
Vol. I.F 11
loves me, I verily believe, as I do my mistress. He
must not suffer. Look forth, Granger, you have sharp
eyeslook forth, and say what you think of the
craft, lying there at the Broad-bend.
I have watched her, sir, for the last hour, but can't
say for certain what to think. It is easier to say what
she is not, than what she is.
That will dosay what she is not, and I can
readily
satisfy myself as to what she is.
She has no coloursher paint's fresh, put on since
she's been in these waters. She is not a Spaniard,
sir, nor is she English, that's certain.
Well, what next, Sagacity?
The trader paused a few moments, as if to think,
then, with an assured manner, and without seeming
to annex any great importance to the communication
which he made, he dryly replied
Why, sir, she's neither one thing nor another in
look, but a mixture of all. Now, when that's the case
in the look of a vessel, it's a sign that the crew is a
mixture, and that there is no one person regulating.
It's left to them to please their taste in most things,
and so that paint seems put on as if Dutch, and French,
Spanish, and Portuguese, and English, all had some
hand in it. There's yellow and black, red and green,
and all colours, I make out, where no one nation would
employ more than one or two of them.
Well, what do you infer from all that?
I think, sir, she's a pirate, or what's no better, a
Spanish guarda-costa.
The devil you do, and Hector is in her jaws. But
what other reasons have you for this opinion?
What is she doing herehaving no intercourse
with the peoplekeeping off from the landing
showing
no colours, and yet armed to the teeth? If there
be nothing wrong, sir, why this concealment and
distance
?
You jump readily and with some reason to a
conclusion
,
Granger, and you may be right. Now hear
my thought. That vessel comes from Saint Augustine,
and brings arms to the Yemassees, and urges on this
very insurrection of which you had a taste last night.
Very likely, and she may be a pirate too. They
are thick about the coast.
Ay, Granger, as the contents of some of your
packages might tell if they had tongues, said
Harrison
,
with a smile.
God forbid, captain, exclaimed the trader, with a
simple gravity, which rose into honest dignity as he
continuedI can show bills for all my goods, from
worthy citizens in Charlestown and elsewhere.
No matter, I charge you not. But you may be
right. To be a pirate and a Spaniard are not such
distinct matters, and now I think with you, the
probability
is, she is both. But what I mean to say,
Granger
,
is thisthat now she comes here with no piratical
intent, but to serve other and perhaps worse purposes
else, what keeps her from plundering the shore?
The best reason in the world, sir; it's a long reach
she must go through before she safely keels the sea.
It's slow work to get from the bay of the Broad, and a
wind takes its pleasure in coming to fill up a sail in this
crooked water. Let them once do what they came for,
and make the coast, then look out for the good
merchantmen
who find their way into the Gulf of Mexico.
Well, whether Spaniard or pirate, or Dutch
Flyaway
,
we must get Hector out of her jaws, if it's only
to keep him a gentleman. Andbut stay, she drops
a boat. Do you make out who comes in it?
Two men pull
Certain. Who again, Mercury?
A bluff, stout fellow, sits astern, wears a blue jacket,
and
A gold chain?
He does, sir, with thick-hanging shining buttons.
The same. That's Hercules.
Who, sir?
Hercules or Ajax, I don't remember which. I
gave him one or other, or both names yesterday, and
shall probably find another for him to-day, for I must
have Hector. He shapes for the shoredoes he?
F 2
Yes, sir; and, from his present course, he will
make the Parson's landing.
Ha! say you so, most worthy traderwe shall
be at the meeting.Yes, muttered the speaker,
rather to himself than to his companionwe shall
be at the meeting! He must not look upon my pretty
Bess without seeing the good fortune which the fates
yield her, in the person of her lover. We shall be
there, Granger; and, not to be unprovided with the
means for effecting the escape of Hector, let us call
up some of our choice spiritssome of the Green
Forestersthey know the signal of their captain, and,
thanks to fortune, I left enough for the purpose at the
smithy of Dick Grimstead. Come, man of wares and
merchandisesbe packing.
Leading the way from the hill, Harrison, followed
by Granger, descended to the level forest about a mile
off, in the immediate rear of the Block House, and
placing his hunting horn to his lips, he sounded it
thrice with a deep clear note, which called up a dozen
echoes from every dell in the surrounding woods.
The sounds had scarcely ceased to reverberate, before
they were replied to, in a long and mellow roll, from
one, seemingly a perfect master of the instrument, who,
even after the response had been given, poured forth a
generous blast, followed by a warbling succession of
cadences, melting away at last into a silence which
the ear, having carefully treasured up the preceding
notes, almost refused to acknowledge. From another
point in the woods, a corresponding strain thrice
repeated
,
followed soon after the first, and announced an
understanding among the parties, to which the
instrument
had been made ably subservient.
These are my Green Jackets, Granger, you have
made money out of that colour, my Plutusmy own
green jacket boys, true as steel, and swift as an Indian
arrow. Come, bury deeper in the thick woods, where,
in half an hour, you may see a dozen of the same
colour at the gathering.
CHAPTER XIV.
I know thee, though the world's strife on thy brow
Hath beaten strangely. Altered to the eye,
Methinks I look upon the self-same man,
With nature all unchanged.
The
boat from the unknown vessel reached the
point jutting out into the river, in front of the dwelling
of the old pastor; and the seaman, already more than
once introduced to our notice, leaving the two men in
charge of it, took his way to the habitation in question.
The old man received the stranger with all the
hospitalities
of the region, and ushered him into the
presence of his family with due courtesy, though as a
stranger. The seaman seemed evidently to constrain
himself while surveying the features of the inmates,
which he did with some curiosity; and had Harrison
been present, he might have remarked, with some
dissatisfaction
,
the long, earnest, and admiring gaze
which, in this survey, the beautiful features of Bess
Matthews were made to undergo, to her own evident
disquiet. After some little chat, with that bluff, free,
hearty manner which is the happy characteristic of
the seafaring man, the stranger contrived to remove
much of the unfavourable impression which his gross
and impudent cast of face had otherwise made, and in
reply to the natural inquiry of the pastor to that effect,
he gave a brief account of the nature of his pursuits
in that quarter,and though a close and scrutinizing
mind might have picked out no small number of flaws
in the yarn which he spun, yet to the unsophisticated
sense of the little family, the story was straight
forward
and clear enough. The trade in furs and skins
usually carried on with the Indians was well known
to be exceedingly valuable in many of the European
markets, and with this object the seaman accounted
for his presence in a part of the world, not often
honoured with the visit of a vessel of so much
pretension
as that which he commanded. From one thing to
another, with a fluent, dashing sort of speech, he went
onnow telling of his own, and now commenting
on their adventures, and, bating an occasional oath,
which invariably puckered up the features of the old
Puritan, he contrived to make himself sufficiently
agreeable, and after a very passable fashion. Bessy
did not, it is true, incline the ear after the manner of
Desdemona to her Blackamoor, but in the anecdote,
hurried and rash, which every now and then enriched
the rambling speech of their guest, either in the tale
of his own, or of the achievement of others, she found
much, in spite of herself, to enlist her curiosity and
command her attention. Nor was he less influenced
by her presence than she by his narrative. Though
spoken generally, much of his conversation was
seemingly addressed in especial to the maiden. With
this object, he sprinkled his story full of the wonders
of the West Indies, with all of which he appeared
familiar
spoke
of its luscious fruits and balmy climates
its groves of lemon and of orangeits dark-eyed
beauties, and innumerous productions of animate and
vegetable life. Then of its gold and jewels, the ease
of their attainment, and all that sort of thing, which
the vulgar mind would be apt to suppose exceedingly
attractive and overcoming to the weak one. Having
said enough as he thought, fairly and fully to dazzle
the imagination of the girland secure now of a
favourable estimate of himself, he drew from his
bosom a little casket, containing a rich gold chain of
Moorish filigree work, arabesque wrought, and
probably
a spoil of Grenada, and pressed it on her
acceptance
.
His manner was so assured, that her refusal
to do so called for the open expression of his
astonishment
.
And wherefore notyoung lady? The chain is
not unbecoming for the neck, though that be indeed
the whitest. Now, the girls of Spain, with a skin
nothing to be compared with yours, they wear them
thick as grape vines. Come, nowdon't be shy and
foolish. The chain is rich, and worth a deal of money.
Let me lock it now. You will look like a queen in
ita queen of all the Indies could not look more so.
But the sailor blundered grossly. Bess Matthews
was a thinking, feeling woman, and he addressed her
as a child. She had now recovered from the interest
which she had shown while he narrated adventures
which excited her imagination, and set her fancy in
glow, conjuring up and putting into activity many of
those imaged dreams which the young romancer has
so ready at all times in thoughtand she soon
convinced
him that he had greatly mistaken her, when he
was so willing to transfer to himself the attention
which she had simply yielded to his stories. He now
almost shrunk at the gentle but lofty tone in which
she reiterated her refusal to accept the proffered
ornament
.
But the next moment with visible vexation, to
the astonishment of the old pastor, he thus addressed
him:
Why, Matthews, you have made your daughter as
great a saint as yourself. Ha! I see you stagger.
Didn't know me, eh! Didn't remember your old parish
acquaintance, Dick Chorley.
The pastor looked at him with some interest, but
with more seeming commiseration.
And are you little Richard?
Little, indeedthat's a good one. I was once
little, and little enough, when you knew me,but I am
big enough now, John Matthews, to have myself
righted when wrong is done me. It is not now, that
the parish beadle can flog little Dick Chorley. Not
now, by God!and it's been a sore sorrow with some
of them, I think, that it ever was the case.
Well Richard, I'm glad to find you so much better
off in the world, and with a better disposition to work
for yourself honestly, than in old times, said the
pastor.
Hark ye, Matthewsno more of that. That's as
it may be. Perhaps I'm betterperhaps I'm not. It's
none of your business either one way or the other;
and to look back too closely into old time doings, ain't
a friend's part, I'm thinking. Blast me! old man, but
you had nearly made me forget myself; and I wouldn't
like to say rough things to you or any of yours, for
I can't but remember you were always more kind to
me than the rest, and if I had minded you I had done
better. But what's done can't be undone, and the least
said is soonest mended.
I meant not to speak harshly, Richard, when I
spoke of the past, said the pastor, mildly, but the
exile finds it sweet to remember, even those things
which were sorrows in his own land. I find it so with
me; and though to speak plainly, Richard, I would
rather not see to know you as of old, yet the
recognition
of your person, for a moment, gave me a
sentiment of pleasure.
And why should it notand why should it not?
Blast me, old man, but you don't think I'm the same
ragged urchin that the parish fed and floggedthat
broke his master's head, and was the laughing stock,
and the scapegoat of every rascality in the shire?no,
no. The case is changed now, and if I'm no better,
I'm at least an abler man; and that stands for right
and morality all the world over. I'm doing well in the
world, Matthewsdrive a good tradeown half in as
handsome a clipper as over swum like a gull in the
blue waters of the gulf; and, if the world will let me,
I shall probably in little time be as goodthat is
to say as rich a manas any of them. If they won't,
they must look out for themselves, that's all.
One thing pleases me, at least, Richard, said the
pastor, gravely, and that is to find your pursuits such
that you need not be ashamed of them. This should
give you an honest pride, as it certainly yields me
pleasure.
There was rather more of inquiry than of remark
in this observation, and Chorley saw it.
Ay, ay, if it pleases you I'm satisfied. You are
a good judge of what's right, and can say. For my
part, I make it a rule to boast nothing of my virtue.
It takes the polish off a good action, to turn it over too
often in one's mouth.
There was a satirical chuckle following the speech
of the sailor which the pastor did not seem to relish.
It seemed to sneer at the joint homilies which they
had been uttering. The dialogue was changed by the
pastor.
And where is your mother now, Richard?
Ask the parish church-yardit has one grave
more, that I can swear for, than when you left it; and,
though I'm bad at grammar, I could read the old
woman's
name upon the stick at the head. When she
died I came offI couldn't stand it then, though I
stood it well enough before. They have not seen me
since, nor I themand there's no love lost between us.
If I ever go back, it will be to see the old beadle and
that grave stick.
I hope you harbour no malice, Richard, against the
man for doing his duty?
His duty?
Yes, his duty. He was the officer of the law, and
compelled to do what he did. Wherefore then would
you go back to see him simply, and then, so strangely
associated with your mother's grave?
Ha! that's it. He broke her heart by his
treatment
to me, and I would break his scull upon her grave
as a satisfaction to both of us. I did wrong when a boy,
that's like enough, for older people did wrong daily about
me, but was my public disgrace to cure me of my
wrong? They put me in the stocks, then expected me
to be a good citizen. Wise enough. I tell you what,
Matthews, I've seen something more of the world than
you, though you've seen more years than I; and mark
my word, whenever a man becomes a bad man, a thief,
an outlaw, or a murderer, his neighbours have to thank
themselves for three fourths of the teachings that have
made him so. But this is enough on this talk. Let
F 3
us say something now of yourselfand first, how do
you like this part of the world?
As well as can be expected. I am indifferent to
any other, and I have quiet here, which I had not
always
in the turbulent changes of England. My family
too are satisfied, and their contentment makes the
greater part of mine.
You'd find it better and pleasanter in Florida. I
drive a good business there with the Spaniard. I'm
rather one myself now, and carry his flag, though I
trade chiefly on my own log.
The dialogue was here broken in upon by the
entrance
of Harrison, who, in spite of the cold courtesies
of the pastor, and the downcast reserve in the eyes of
Bess Matthews, yet joined the little group with the
composure of one perfectly satisfied of the most cordial
reception.
CHAPTER XV.
Thou shalt disgorge thy prey, give up thy spoil,
And yield thee prisoner. The time is short,
Make thy speech fitting.
To the green wood with Harrison and the trader.
We have heard the merry horn responding freely to
that of the former. You shall see them, said he to
Grangerbrave fellows and true, and sufficient for my
purpose. I can rely upon Grimstead, the smith, and
his brother, certainly, for I left them but a couple of
hours ago at the smithy. Theirs was the first answer
we heard. I know not from whom comes the second,
but I look for Wat Grayson from that quarter, and
sure enough, he is here. Ha! Grayson, you are true
and in time, as usual. I give you welcome, for I want
your arm.
And at your service, captain, to strike deer or
enemy
,
for fight or labour. Ha! Grangerbut you have
forgotten my knife, which I've sorely wanted.
It is here, at the Block House, ready for you.
Good! Well captain, what's the service now?
I'm ready, you see, and glad that you feel able to count
so free upon Wat Grayson.
You shall soon see, Grayson. I wait but for a
few more of the boys, to tell you our work; and in
order not to waste more time, wind your horn, and let
the men come freely.
The horn was wound, and but a few seconds had
elapsed when a distinct reply from two other quarters
acknowledged the potent summons. In a few moments
the sturdy blacksmith, Grimstead, followed by his
younger brother, burst into the little area, which was
the usual point of assemblage. A moment after, a
bustling little body, known as Dr. Nichols, the only
medical man in that region, also entered the ring,
mounted upon the little ambling pony, or tacky, from
the marsha sturdy little animal in much use, though
of repute infinitely below its merits.
Ha! doctorour worthy Esculapiushow fares
it? You come in time, for we look to have some bones
for your setting before long, exclaimed Harrison,
addressing
him.
Captain Harrison, responded the little
professional
,
with a most imposing manner, it gives me
pleasure at any moment to do my country service. I
am proud that my poor ability may be called into
exercise
,
though I should rather have you invoke my
personal
than professional offices.
We shall need both, doctor, most probably. We
must first risk our bones before the surgeon may hope
to handle them; and in doing so, have no scruple that
he should risk his along with ours.
And wherefore, may I ask, Captain Harrison?
Simply, doctor, that he may be taught a due
lesson
of sympathy by his own hurts, which shall make
him tender of ours. But we are slow. Who have
we here to count on for a brush?
Count on Dick Grimstead, captain, and you may
put down Tom with him, but not as doctors.I'm not
for the doctoring, captain.
Irreverend fellow! muttered Nichols.
Harrison laughed, and proceeded to enumerate and
arrange his men, who now, with himself and Granger,
amounted to seven. He himself carried pistols, and
the short German rifle already described. The rest
had generally either the clumsy muskets of the time,
or the tomahawk, an instrument almost as formidable,
and certainly quite as necessary in the forests. Some
of them were dressed in the uniform of the
green-jackets
,
the corps which had been raised by Harrison
in the Coosaw war, and which he commanded. Though
ignorant entirely of his character and pursuits, yet his
successful heading of them in that sudden insurrection,
at a moment of great emergency, not less than the free,
affable, and forward manner which characterized him,
had endeared him to them generally; and, unlike the
pastor, they were content with this amount of their
knowledge of one whom they had learned not less to
love than to obey.
Harrison looked round upon his boys, as he called
them, not heeding sundry efforts which Nichols made
to command his attention. Suddenly addressing
Grayson
,
he asked
Where's Murray?
Sick, captainon the flat of his back, or I had
brought him with me. He lies sick at Joe Gibbons'
up by Bates', where he's been running up a new house
for Gibbons.
He must come from that, Grayson. It is too far
from the Block House for any of them, and for a sick
man, it will be hopeless, if there should be war. He
is not safe there, Grayson, you must move him.
That's impossible, captain. He can't move, he's
down flat with the fever.
Then you must bring him off on your shoulders, or
get a cart, for he is not safe where he is. I think so
at least, for the Indians are at work, and we shall,
before
very long, have the war-whoop ringing in our ears.
We must clear the borders, or the Yemassees will do
it for us.
And I'm ready, captain, as soon as they, exclaimed
Grayson; and that's the notion of more than Wat
Grayson. The boys, generally, long for something to
do; and, as we go up the river, the Indians get too
monstrous
impudent to be borne with much longer.
True, Graysonbut we must wait their pleasure.
I only give you my suspicions, and they amount to
nothing so long as the Yemassees profess peace.
Oh, hang their professions, captain, say I. I don't
see why we should wait on them to begin the brush,
seeing it must be begun. There's nothing like a dash
forward, when you see you have to go. That's my
notion; and, say but the word, we'll catch the weazel
asleep when he thinks to catch us. All our boys are
ready for it, and a ring of the horn round Alligator
Swamp will bring a dozen; and by night we could
have Dick Mason, and Spragg, and Baynton, who have
gone up to the new clearing upon the fork of
Tuliffinee
.
It is well, said Harrisonwell that you should
be ready, but it is for the assembly to make war and
peace,not for us. We can only provide for our
defence
in case of assault, and against it I want to
prepare
you, for I greatly apprehend it. But, in the
meantime
,
I have another job for execution.
Nichols now finding a favourable moment, in his
usual swelling manner, addressed Harrison and the
company:
Captain Harrison, understand me. I protest my
willingness to volunteer in any matter for the good of
the people. It is the part of the true patriot to die for
the people, and I'm willing when the time comes.
Prepare the block, unsheath the sword, and provide
the executioner,and I, Constantine Maximilian
Nichols
,
medical doctor, well assured that in my death I
shall save my country, will freely yield up my poor
life, even as the noble Decius of old, for the securing
12
of so great a blessing for my people. But, captain, it
must be clear to my mind that the necessity is such,
the end to be attained is of so great moment, and the
means to be employed are warranted by the laws, in
letter and in spirit. Speak therefore, captain, the
design
before us. Let me hear your purposelet my
mind examine into its bearings and its tendencies, and
I will then declare myself.
Harrison, who knew the weak point of the speaker,
with singular composure preserved his gravity, while
the foresters laughed aloud.
Come with us, Constantine Maximilianyour own
mind shall judge.
He led the party to the Chief's Bluff, and from the
eminence he pointed out to them at a little distance
below, where lay the boat of the schooner, one of the
seamen rambling upon the land at a little distance from
it, while the other lay in its bottom.
Now, Constantine, said he, behold those men. I
want them secured, bound hand and foot, and kept
until
further orders.
Show me, Captain Harrison, that the peace of the
country, the lives of my fellow-countrymen, or the
liberties
of the people depend upon the measure, and I
am ready to yield up my life in the attainment of your
object. Until you do this, captain, I decline; and
must, furthermore, lift up my voice in adjuration to
those about me, against acting as you counsel, doing
this great wrong to the men whom you have singled
out for bondage, depriving them of their liberties, and
possibly their lives.
You are scrupulous, doctor, and we shall have to
do without you. We shall certainly secure those two
men, though we meditate nothing against the liberties
of the people.
I shall warn them by my voice of your design
upon them, was the dogged resolve of the doctor.
Of God's surety, if you dare, Nichols, I shall
tumble
you headlong from the bluff, sternly responded
Harrison; and the patriot, to whom the declamation was
enough of glory, shrunk back, in little, behind the
rest, with whom the leader found no difficulty. He
proceeded,
Those men must be securedthey are but two,
and you are five. They are without arms, so that all
you may look for in the affair, will be a black eye or
bloody nose. This will trouble neither of you much,
though less ready than Constantine Maximilian to die
for the people. Tumble the dogs into the sand and
rope thembut do them no more damage than is
necessary for that.
Who are they, captain? asked Grayson.
Nay, I know not, but they come from that vessel,
and what she is I know not. One thing is certain,
however, and hence my proceeding: In that vessel
they have safely put away my black fellow, Hector.
The devil they havethe kidnappers.
Ay have they, and unless I get him out, they will
have him in the Cuba market, and heaven knows how
many more beside him, in twenty days, and we have
no vessel to contend with them. There is but one
way to give them a taste of what they may expect.
You secure these lads, and when you have done so,
bring them to Parson Matthews, sound your horn, and
I shall then do my share of the duty.
Leaving them to the performance of this task,
Harrison
went forward to the cottage of the pastor; while,
headed by Grayson, the whole party, Nichols not
excepted
,
went down the bluff, and came by a circuitous
route upon the seamen. One of them slept in the boat
and was secured without any difficulty. His opening
eyes found himself closely grappled by a couple of sturdy
woodsmen, and he did not even venture to cry aloud,
warned as he had been against such a measure, by
the judicious elevation of a tomahawk above his head.
The other took to his heels on seeing the capture of
his companion, but stood no manner of chance with
the fleet-footed foresters. He was soon caught, and
Constantine Maximilian Nichols was the most adroit
of the party in bandaging up the arms of both. The
truth is, the doctor was not content with one
profession
only. He aimed at popular favour. His speeches
were framed solely with that end, and he accordingly
prated for ever, as is the familiar custom always among
the cunning, about those rights of man for which he
cared but little. He was not judicious in his
declamation
,
however,he professed quite too largely; and, in
addition to this misfortune, it grew into a faith among
his neighbours, that, while his forms of speech were
full of bloodshed and sacrifice, the heart of the doctor
was benevolently indifferent to all the circumstances
and the joys of strife. But the prisoners were now
secured, and, under close guard, were marched
agreeably
to arrangement, to the cottage of the pastor.
CHAPTER XVI.
'Tis the rash hand that rights on the wild sea,
Or in the desertviolence is law,
And reason, where the civil hand is weak
Our hope is in it now.
The
entrance of Harrison, alone, into the cottage of
the pastor, put a stop to the dialogue which had been
going on between himself and the seaman. The
reception
which the host gave the new comer, was
simply and coldly courteousthat of his lady was
more grateful, but still constrained, and Bess, she
feared to look up at all, lest all eyes should see
how much better her reception would have been.
Harrison saw all this, but the behaviour of the pastor
seemed to have no effect upon him. He rattled on in
his usual manner, though with something of loftiness
still, which appeared to intimate its character of
condescension
.
Mr. Matthews, it gives me pleasure to find you
wellbetter, I think, than when I had the pleasure to
see you last. You see, I tax your courtesies, though
you could find no relatives of mine in Charlestown
willing to extend you theirs. But the time will come,
sir, and your next visit may be more fruitful. Ah!
Mrs. Matthews, growing young again, surely. Do you
know I hold this climate to be the most delightful in the
world,a perfect seat of health and youth, in which
the old Spaniard, John Ponce, of Leon, would certainly
have come nigher the blessed fountain he sought, than
he ever could have done in Florida. And you, Bess
Miss Matthews I meanstill sweet, charming as ever.
Ah! Mrs. Matthews, you are thrice fortunatealways
blessed. Your years are all so many summersfor
Providence leaves to your household, in all seasons,
one flower that compensates for all the rest.
And thus, half playful, half serious, Harrison
severally
addressed all in the apartment, the sailor
excepted
.
That worthy looked on, and listened with no
little astonishment.
Dd easy to be sure, he half muttered to
himself
.
Harrison, without distinguishing the words,
heard the sounds, and readily comprehending their
tenour from the look which accompanied them, he
turned as playfully to the speaker as he had done to
all the rest.
And you, my old Herculesyou here too?I left
you in other company, when last we met, and am
really not sorry that you got off without the long
arrow of the Yemassee. Pray, how came you so
fortunate? Few men here would have killed the dog
of an Indian, without looking for the loss of his
scalp, and a broken head in requital. Give us your
secret, Hercules.
Look ye, young one, my name, as I told you
before, is not Hercules
Not Hercules,indeed!then it must be Ajax
Ajax or Agamemnon. Well, you have your choice,
for you look any of them so well, that one or other of
these I must call you. I could not well understand
you by any other.
It seemed the policy of Harrison, or so he appeared
to think, to provoke the person he addressed into
something like precipitance, suspecting him, as he
did, of a secret and unfriendly object; and finding him
a choleric and rash person, he aimed so to arouse his
passion, as to disarm his caution and defeat his
judgment
;
but, though Chorley exhibited indignation
enough, yet having his own object, and wishing at
that time to appear as amiable as possible, in the
presence
of those who knew him as a different character
in childhood, he moderated duly his anger to his
situation
and desires. Still, his reply was fierce enough,
and much of it muttered in an under tone, heard only
by the pastor and him he addressed.
Hark ye, sir, I don't know what you may be, and
don't much care; but blast my heart, if you don't mind
your eyes, I'll take your ears off, and slit your tongue,
or I'm no man. I won't suffer any man to speak to me
in this manner.
You won'tand you'll take my ears off and slit
my tongue. Why, Hercules, you're decidedly
dangerous
.
But I shall not tax your services so far.
Shall have them, though, by Gd, whether you
will or not. You are not two to one now, youngster,
and shan't swing to-day at my cost, as you did
yesterday
.
Pshawdon't put on your clouds and thunder
now, old Jupiteryou look, for all the world, at this
moment like a pirate, and must certainly frighten the
ladies should they dare to look on you.
Chorley started visibly, fierce yet agitated, while
the close, dark, penetrating eye of Harrison was fixed
sternly upon his own. Before he could recover in
time for a reply in the same by-play mannerfor the
dialogue between the two had been carried on in under
toneHarrison went on, resuming that playfulness
of speech and look from which he had in the last few
remarks not a little departed.
Don't mean to offend, Hercules, far from it. But
really, when I spoke, your face did wear a most
Blifustier
[15]
[15]
Blifustier
was one of the names conferred by the Dutch, by
which the early bucaniers of America were known.
expression, such an one as Black Beard
himself might have put on while sacking a
merchantman
,
and sending her crew on the plank.
My name, young man, as I told you before, began
the sailor, with a look and tone of forbearance and
meekness that greatly awakened the sympathies of the
pastor, to whom the playful persecution of Harrison
had been any thing but gratefulmy name is
But his tormentor interrupted him
Is Jupiter Ammon, I knowgive yourself no
manner of trouble, I beg you.
Master Harrison, said the pastor, gravely, this is
my guest, and so are you, and as such, permit me to say
that mutual respect is due to my house and presence,
if not to one another. The name of this gentleman
is Chorley, Master Richard Chorley, whose parents I
knew in England as well as himself.
Ha! Chorleyyou knew him in EnglandMaster
Chorley, your servant,Hercules no longer. You will
be pleased to forgive my merriment, which is scarce
worth your cloud and thunder storm. Chorley, did you
sayChorley, a good namethe name of a trader
upon the Spanish Islands. Said I right? inquired
the speaker, who appeared to muse somewhat
abstractedly
over his recent accession of intelligence while
addressing the seaman. The latter sulkily assented.
Your craft lies in the river, and you come for
trade. You have goods, Master Chorleyfine stuffs
for a lady's wear, and jewelshave you not jewels
such as would not do discredit to a neck, white, soft
a glimpse, such as we sometimes have through these
blessed skies, of a pure, glorious heaven smiling and
wooing beyond them. Have you no such befitting
gaudsno highly wrought gem and ornamentin the
shape of cross and chain, which a sharp master of
trade may have picked up, lying at watch sungly
among the little Islands of the Gulf?
And if I have? sullenly responded the seaman.
I will buy, HerculesMaster Chorley I should
sayI would buy such a jewela rich chain, or the
cross which the Spaniard worships. Wouldst thou
wear such a chain of my gift, sweet Bessit would
fit, because so far below, thy neck in its richness.
Would take my purchase, Miss Mathews? He
looked tenderly to her eyes as he spoke, and the
seaman, watching their mutual glance, with a
curiosity
which became malignant, soon discovered their
secret, if so it may be called. Before his
daughter
could speak, the old pastor sternly answered for
her in the negative. His feelings had grown more and
more uncompromising and resentful at every word of
the previous dialogue. In his eyes the cool
composure
of Harrison was the superb of audacity,
particularly
as, in the previous interview, he thought he had
said and done enough to discourage the pretensions of
any suiterand one so utterly unknown to him as the
present. Not that there was not much in all that he
knew of the person in question, to confound and
distract
his judgment. In their intercourse, and in all
known intercourse, he had always proved brave,
sensible
,
and generous. He had taken the lead among
the volunteers, a short time previous, in defeating a
superior Spanish force and driving them in disgrace
from a meditated attack on Port Royal Island and
Edisto. For this service he had received from the
men he had then commanded, an application for the
permanent
continuance of his authorityan application
neither declined nor accepted. They knew him,
however
,
only as Gabriel Harrison, a man singularly
compounded
of daring bravery, cool reflection, and
good-humoured
vivacity, and knowing this they cared for
little more information. The farther mystery,
knowing
so much, was criminal in the eyes of the pastor,
who had better reasons than the volunteers for desiring
a greater share of confidence; and though really,
when he could calmly reflect on the subject,
uninfluenced
by his prejudices of Puritanism, pleased with
the individual, a sense of what he considered his duty
compelled him to frown upon pretensions so perfectly
vague yet so confidently urged as those of his visiter.
The course of the dialogue just narrated contributed
still more to disapprove Harrison in the old man's
estimation.
My daughter wears no such idle vanities, Master
Harrison, said he, and least of all should she be
expected to receive them from hands of which we
know nothing.
Oh, ho! exclaimed Chorley, now in his turn
enjoying
himself at the expense of his adversaryOh,
hosits the wind in that quarter of your sail, young
master?
Well, Hercules, what do you laugh at? I will buy
your chain, though the lady may or may not take it.
You buy no chain of me, I think, replied the
otherunless you buy this, which I would have
placed myself, as a free gift, upon the neck of the
young lady, before you came.
You place it upon Bessy's neck,indeed. Why
Bully-boy, what put that extravagant notion into your
head? exclaimed Harrison scornfully aloud.
And why not, master; why not, I pray you?
inquired
the seaman, at the same time not seeking to
suppress his pique.
Why notindeedbut will you sell your chain?
Ay, that will I, but at a price something beyond
your mark. What will you give now?
Put like a traderGranger himself could not have
said it with more grace. I will give at that
moment
a distinct blast of the horn, reverberating through
the hall, announced to Harrison the success and
approach of his party. Fixing his eye upon the
person he addressed, and turning full upon him, he
replied
I have the price at handa fitting price, and one
that you seem already to have counted on. What say
you then to my black fellow, Hectorhe is a fine
servant, and as you have already stowed him away
safely in your hold, I suppose you will not hesitate to
ask for him three hundred pieces in the Cuba
market
something
more than the value of your chain.
The seaman looked not less astounded than did the
pastor and his family, at this unlooked-for charge.
Where, Master Harrison, did you say? inquired
Matthews.
In the hold of this worthy fur and amber trader's
vesselsafe, locked up, and ready for the Spaniard.
It's a dd lie, exclaimed the ferocious
seaman
,
recovering from his momentary stupor.
Bah, Herculessee you fool written in my face,
that you suppose oaths go further with me than words?
You are young, my Hercules, very young, to think
so,then, as the accused person proceeded to swear
and swagger, Harrison turned to the ladies who had
been silent and astonished auditorsMrs. Matthews,
and you Bess,take your chambers, please you, for a
while. This business may be unpleasant, and not
suited to your presence.
But Captain Harrisonmy son, said the old lady,
affectionately.
Gabriel,dear Gabriel, murmured the young one.
No violence, gentlemen,for heaven's sake,
gentlemen
,
said the host.
Harrison kissed his hands playfully to the mother
and daughter, as, leading them to an inner door, he
begged them to have no apprehension.
There is no cause of fearbe not alarmed.
Hercules
and myself would only determine the value of
Hector, without unnecessary witnesses. Go now, and
fear not.
Having dismissed the ladies, Harrison turned
immediately
to Chorley, and putting his hand with the
utmost deliberation upon his shoulder, thus addressed
him
Hark ye, Hercules, you can't have Hector for
nothing. The fellow's in prime ordernot old, and
still activebesides he's the most trust-worthy slave I
own, and loves me like a brother. It goes against me
to part with him, but if you are determined to have
him, you must give me an equivalent.
The seaman, with many oaths, denied having him.
Spare your breath, man, said the other,
impetuously
I
know you have him. Your swearing
makes none of your lies true, and you waste them on
me. Give up Hector, then
And what if I say no? fiercely replied the
seaman
.
Then I keep Hercules! was the response of Harrison.
We shall see that, exclaimed the kidnapperand
drawing his cutlass, he approached the door of the
cottage, in the way of which Harrison stood calmly.
As he approached, the latter drew forth a pistol from
his bosom, coolly cocked and presented it with one
hand, while with the other raising his horn to his lips
he replied to the previous signal. In another moment
the door was thrown open, and Granger, with two of the
foresters, appeared, well armed, and destroying any
thought of an equal struggle, which might originally
have entered the mind of Chorley. The three new
comers ranged themselves around the apartment, so
as to encircle the seaman.
Captain Harrison, interposed the pastorthis
violence in my house
I deeply regret, Mr. Matthews, was the reply,
but it is here necessary.
It is taking the laws into your own hands, sir.
I know it, sir, and will answer to the laws for
taking Hector from the unlawful hands of this
kidnapper
.
Stand aside, sir, if you please, while we
secure our prisoner. Well, Hercules, are you ready
for terms now?
Nothing daunted, Chorley held forth defiance, and
with a fierce oath, lifting his cutlass, he resolutely
endeavoured
to advance. But the extension of his arm
for the employment of his weapon, with his enemies
so near, was of itself a disadvantage. The sword had
scarcely obtained a partial elevation, when the iron
muscles of Dick Grimstead fixed the uplifted arm as
firmly as if the vice of the worthy blacksmith had
taken the grasp instead of his fingers. In another
moment he was tumbled upon his back, and spite of
every effort at release, the huge frame of Grimstead
maintained him in that humiliating position.
You see, Herculesobstinacy won't serve you
here. I must have Hector, or I shall see the colour
of every drop of blood in your body. I swear it, of
God's surety. Listen, thenhere are materials for
writing. You are a commanderyou shall forward
despatches to your men for the delivery of my
snowball
.
Hector I must have.
I will write nothingmy men are in the boat,
they will soon be upon you, and by all the devils, I will
mark you for this.
Give up your hope, Bully-boy,and be less
obdurate
.
I have taken care to secure your men and boat,
as comfortably as yourself. You shall see that I
speak truth. Winding his horn as he spoke, the rest
of the foresters appeared under the conduct of Nichols,
who, strange to say, was now the most active
conspirator
seemingly of the party; and with them the two
seamen well secured by cords. Ushering his
prisoners
forward, the worthy Constantine etc., seeing
Harrison
about to speak, hastily interrupted him
The great object of action, captainthe great
object of human actionMr. Matthews, I am your
servantthe great object, Captain Harrison, of human
action, as I have said before, is, or should be, the
pursuit
of human happiness. The great aim of human
study is properly to determine upon the true nature of
human action. Human reason being the only mode,
in the exercise of which, we can possibly arrive at
the various courses which human action is to take, it
follows, in direct sequence, that the Supreme Arbiter
in matters of moral, or I should rather say human
propriety
,
is the universal reason
Quod erat demonstrandum, gravely interrupted
Harrison.
Your approval is grateful, Captain Harrisonvery
grateful, sirbut I beg that you will not interrupt me.
Harrison bowed, and the doctor proceeded:
Referring to just principles, and the true standard,
which,Master Matthews this may be of moment to
you, and I beg your particular attentionI hold to be
human reason,for the government, the wellbeing of
human society, I have determinedbeing thereto
induced
simply by a consideration of the good of the
peopleto lead them forth, for the captivity of these
evil-minded men, who, without the fear of God in their
eyes, and instigated by the devil, have feloniously
kidnapped
and entrapped and are about to carry away one
of the lawful subjects of our king, whom Fate
preserve
.I
say subject, for though it does not appear
that black has ever been employed, as a colour
distinguishing
the subjects of our master, the King of
Great Britain, yet, as subject to his will, and the
control
of his subjects, and more than all, as speaking in
the proper form of the English language, a little
interpolated
here and there, it may be well to recognise
as legitimately forming a feature of the said language,
which by all writers is held to be of a compound
substance
,
not unlike, morally speaking, the sort of rock,
which the geologists designate as pudding-stone
poundedand to speak professionally, indigestibly
compounded
I
say, then, and I call you, our pastor, and
you, Captain Harrison, and, I say, Richard Grimstead,
albeit you are not of a craft or profession which I may
venture to style liberal, you too may be a witness,
and you will all of you here assembled take upon you
to witness for me, that in leading forth these brave
men to the assault upon and captivity of these
nefarious
kidnappers, rescue or no rescue, at this moment
my prisoners, that, from the first and immutable
principles
which I have laid down, I could have been
governed only by a patriotic desire for the good of the
people. For, as it is plain that the man who
kidnaps
a subject has clearly none of those moral
restraints
which should keep him from kidnapping
subjects
,
and as it is equally clear that subjects should
Vol. I.G 13
not be liable to abduction or kidnapping, so does it
follow, as a direct sequence, that the duty of the good
citizen is to prevent such nefarious practices. I fear
not now the investigation of the people, for having
been governed in what I have done simply by a
regard
for their good and safety, I yield me to their
judgment
,
satisfied of justice, yet not shrinking, in their
cause, from the martyrdom which they sometimes
inflict.
The speaker paused, breathless, and looked round
very complacently upon the assemblythe persons
of which, his speech had variously affected. Some
laughed, knowing the man; but one or two looked
profound
,
and of these, at a future day, he had secured the
suffrages. Harrison suffered nothing of risibility to
appear upon his features, composing the muscles of
which, he turned to the patriot,
Gravely and conclusively argued, doctor, and with
propriety, for the responsibility was a weighty one of
this bold measure, which your regard for popular
freedom
has persuaded you to adopt. I did not myself
think that so much could be said in favour of the
proceeding; the benefits of which we shall now
proceed
to reap. And now, Hercules, he continued,
addressing
the still prostrate seaman, you see the case
is hopeless, and there is but one way of effecting your
liberty. Writehere are the materials; command
that Hector be restored without stroke or strife, for of
God's surety, every touch of the whip upon the back
of my slave, shall call for a corresponding dozen upon
your own. Your seamen shall bear the despatch, and
they shall return with the negro. I shall place a watch,
and if more than these leave the vessel, it will be
a signal which shall sound your death-warrant, for
that moment, of God's surety, shall you hang. Let
him rise, Grimstead, but keep his sword, and
tomahawk
him if he stir.
Chorley saw that the case was hopeless on other
terms, and wrote as he was required. Sullenly
affixing
the signature, he handed it fiercely to Harrison,
who coolly read over its contents.
So your name is really not Hercules, after all,
he spoke with his usual careless mannerbut
Chorley
?
Is it enough? sullenly asked the seaman.
Ay, Bully-boy, if your men obey it. I shall only
take the liberty of putting a small addition to the
paper, apprizing them of the prospect in reserve for
yourself, if they steer awkwardly. A little hint to
them, speaking as he wrote, of new arms for their
captainswinging bough, rope pendant,and so forth.
In an hour and the men returned, bringing the bone
of contention, the now half frantic Hector, along with
them. Chorley was instantly released, and swearing
vengeance for the indignity which he had suffered,
immediately took his way to the vessel, followed by
his men. Unarmed, he could do nothing with the
stronger force of Harrison, but his fierce spirit only
determined upon a reckoning doubly terrible from the
present restraint upon it.
Keep cool, Hercules; this attempt to kidnap our
slaves will tell hardly against you when going round
Port Royal Island. The battery there may make
your passage uncomfortable.
You shall suffer for this, young one, or my name's
not
Hercules! well, wellsee that you keep a close
reckoning, for I am not so sure that Richard Chorley
is not as great a sea-shark as Steed Bonnett himself.
The seaman started fiercely, as the speaker thus
compared him with one of the most notorious pirates
of the time and region, but a sense of caution
restrained
him from any more decided expression of his
anger. With a word of parting to the pastor, and a
sullen repetition of a general threat to the rest, he
was soon in his boat and upon the way to his vessel.
G 2
CHAPTER XVII.
Have the keen eye awakesleep not, but hold
A perilous watch to-night. There is an hour
Shall come, will try the stoutest of ye all.
I say
it again, Captain Harrisonfortunate is it
for mankind, fortunate and thrice happyMr. Matthews
you will be pleased to respond to the sentimentthrice
fortunate, I say, is it for mankindRichard Grimstead,
this idea is one highly important to your class, and you
will give it every attentionthrice fortunate for
mankind
that there are some spirits in the world, some
noble spirits, whom no fear, no danger, not even the
dread of death, can discourage or deter in their labours
for the good of the people. Who nobly array
themselves
against injustice, who lift up the banners of
truth, and, filled to overflowing with the love of their
fellows, who yield up nothing of man's right to
exaction
and tyranny, but, shouting their defiance to the
last, fear not to embrace the stake of martyrdom in the
perpetuation of an immortal principle. Yes, captain
what,will you not hear?Mr. Matthews, venerable
sirMaster Grayson, Master Walter Grayson, I say
and you, Richard Grimsteadwill nobody hear?thus
it is,the blind and insensible mass!they take the
safety and the service, but forget the benefactor. It is
enough to make the patriot renounce his nature, and
leave them to their fate.
You had better go now, doctor, and see poor
Murray
,
instead of standing here making speeches about
nothing. Talk of the good of the people, indeed, and
leave the sick man without physic till this time of day.
You are right in that, Master Grayson, though
scarcely respectful. It concerns the popular welfare,
certainly, that men should not fall victims to disease;
but you must understand, Master Grayson, that even
to this broad and general principle, there are some
obvious
exceptions. One may and must, now and then,
be sacrificed for the good of manythough to confess
a truth, this can scarcely be an admitted principle, if
such a sacrifice may tend in any way to affect the
paramount
question of the soul's immortal peace or pain.
I have strong doubts whether a man should be hung at
all. For, if it happen that he be a bad man, to hang
him is to precipitate him into that awful abiding place,
to which each successive generation has contributed a
new assortment of dooms and demons; and if he should
have seen the error of his ways, and repented, he
ceases to be a bad man, and should not be hung at all.
But, poor Murray, as you remind me, ought to be
physickedthese cursed fevers hang on a man, as that
sooty-lipped fellow Grimstead says, in a speech,
uncouth
as himself, like `death to a dead negro.' The
only God to be worshipped in this region, take my
word for it, Master Grayson, is that heathen god,
Mercury
.
He is the true friend of the people, and as such
I worship him. Captain Harrisonthe man is deaf.
Ah, Mr. Matthewsdeaf, too! Farewell, Master
Grayson, or do you ride towards Gibbons'? He turns
a deaf ear also. Human naturehuman nature! I
do hate to ride by myself.
And with these words, in obvious dissatisfactionfor
Doctor Constantine Maximilian Nichols stood alone
he left the house and moved off to the wood where his
little tacky stood in waiting. By this time the
foresters
generally had also left the old pastor's cottage.
Giving them instructions to meet him at the Block
House, Harrison alone lingered behind with the old
Puritan, to whom the preceding events had somehow
or other been productive of much sore disquietude.
He had shown his disapprobation at various stages of
their occurrence; and even now, when the restoration
of Hector, more than ever, showed the propriety, or
policy at least, of the course which had been pursued,
the old man seemed still to maintain a decided
hostility
to the steps which Harrison had taken for the
recovery of his property. Having once determined
against the individual himself, the pastor was one of
those dogged and self-satisfied persons who can never
bring themselves to the dismissal of a prejudice; who
never permit themselves to approve of any thing done
by the obnoxious person, and who studiously seek, in
reference to him, every possible occasion for
discontent
and censure. In such a mood he addressed
Harrison
when the rest had departed:
This violence, Master Harrison, said he, might
do in a condition of war and civil commotion; but while
there are laws for the protection of the people and for
the punishment of the aggressor, the resort to measures
like that which I have this day witnessed, I hold to be
highly indecorous and criminal.
Mr. Matthews, you talk of laws, as if that pirate
fellow could be brought to justice by a sheriff.
And why should he not, Master Harrison?
My good sir, for the very best reason in the world,
if you will but open your eyes, and take off some few
of the scales which you delight to wear. Because,
in that vessel, carrying guns and men enough to serve
them, he could safely bid defiance to all the sheriffs
you could muster. Let the wind but serve, and he
could be off, carrying you along with him if he so
thought proper, and at this moment nothing we could
do could stop him. There is no defending Port Royal,
and that is its misfortune. You must always call the
force from Charlestown which could do so, and at this
time there is not a single armed vessel in that port.
No sirnothing but manuvering now for that fellow,
and we must manage still more adroitly before we get
our own terms out of him.
Why sirwhere's the battery at Port Royal?
Pshaw, Mr. Matthewsa mere fly in the face of
the wind. The battery at Port Royal, indeed, which
the Spaniards have twice already taken at noonday,
and which they would have tumbled into nothing, but
for Captain Godfrey and myself, as you should
remember
,
for your own chance and that of your family were
narrow enough. A good wind, sir, would carry this
Blifustier beyond the fort before three guns could be
brought to bear upon her.
Well, Master Harrison, even if this be the case, I
should rather the guilty should escape than that
self-constituted
judges should take into their own hands the
administration of justice and the law.
Indeed, Master Pastor, but you are too merciful by
half; and Hector, if he heard you now, would have
few thanks for a charity, which would pack him off to
the Cuba plantations for the benefit of your bully-boy
acquaintance. No, no. I shall always hold and
recover
my property by the strong arm, when other
means are wanting.
And pray, sir, what security have the people, that
you, unknown to them as you are, may not employ the
same arm to do them injustice, while proposing justice
for yourself?
That is what Nichols would call the popular
argument
,
and for which he would give you thanks, while
using it against you. But, in truth, this is the coil,
and amounts to neither more nor less than this, that all
power is subject to abuse. I do not contend for the
regular practice of that which I only employ in a last
necessity. But, of this enough,I am in no mood for
hair splitting and arguing about trifling irregularities,
when the chance is that there are far more serious
difficulties before us. Hear me, then, Mr. Matthews,
on a subject more important to yourself. You are
here, residing on the borders of a savage nation, with
an interest scarcely worth your consideration, and
certainly
no engrossing object. Your purpose is the good
of those around you, and with that object you suffer
privations here, to which your family are not much
accustomed. I have an interest in your welfare,
and
The lips of the pastor curled contemptuously into a
smile. Harrison proceeded:
I understand that expression, sir; and, contenting
myself with referring you for a commentary upon it to
the sacred profession of your pursuit, I freely forgive
it. The pastor's cheek grew crimson, while the
other continued:
You are here, sir, as I have said, upon the Indian
borders. There is little real affinity between you.
The entire white population thus situated, and
stretching
for thirty miles towards the coast in this direction,
does not exceed nine hundred, men, women, and
children
.
You live remotely from each otherthere is
but little concert between you, and, bating an
occasional
musket, or sword, the hatchet and the knife are
the only weapons which your houses generally furnish.
The Indians are fretful and becoming insolent
Let me interrupt you, Master Harrison. I believe
not that; and so far as my experience goes, the
Yemassees
were never more peaceable than at this
moment
.
Pardon me, sir, if I say, you know little of the
Indians
,
and are quite too guileless yourself to
comprehend
the least portion of their deceitful character.
Are you aware, sir, of the insurrection which took
place in Pocota-lgo last night?
I am notwhat insurrection?
The chiefs, deposed by the people, and by this
time probably destroyed for selling their lands
yesterday
to the commissioners.
Ah! I could have said the why and the
wherefore
,
without your speech. This but proves, Captain
Harrison, that we may, if we please, provoke them by
our persecutions into insurrections. Why do we thus
seek to rob them of their landswhen, oh! Father of
mercies, when shall there be but one flock of all
classes and colours, all tribes and nations, of thy
people
,
and thy blessed Son, our Saviour, the good and
guiding shepherd thereof?
The prayer is a just one, and the blessing
desirable
;
but, while I concur with your sentiment, I am not
willing to agree with you that our desire to procure
their lands is at all inconsistent with the prayer.
Until
they shall adopt our pursuits, or we theirs, we can
never form the one community for which your prayer
is sent up; and so long as the hunting lands are
abundant
,
the seductions of that mode of life will always
baffle the approach of civilization among the Indians.
But this is not the matter between us now. Your
smile of contempt, just now, when I spoke of my
regard
for your family, does not discourage me from
repeating
the profession. I esteem your family, and a
yet stronger sentiment attaches me to one of its
members
.
Feeling thus towards you and it, and convinced,
as I am, that there is danger at hand from the Indians,
I entreat that you will remove at once into a close
neighbourhood with our people. Go to Port Royal,
where the means of escape are greater to
Charlestown
,or,
why not go to Charlestown itself?
And see your family, coolly spoke the pastor.
It will be yours before long, and you will probably
then know them, said the other with equal coolness.
But let not this matter affect the conviction in your
mind, which is strong in mine. There is a near
danger
to be apprehended from the Indians.
I apprehend none, Captain Harrison. The
Indians
have always borne themselves peaceably towards
me and towards all the settlerstowards all who have
carried them the words of peace. To me they have
been more. They have listened patiently to my
teachings
,
and the eyes of some of them, under the blessed
influence
of the Saviour, have been opened to the light.
Be not deceived, Mr. Matthews. The Indian
upon
whom you would most rely, would be the very first
to carry your scalp as a choice trimming for his
mocquasin
.
Be advised, sirI know more of this people
than yourself. I know what they are when excited
and arouseddeception with them is the legitimate
morality of a true warrior. Nor will they, when once
at war, discriminate between the good neighbour, like
yourself, and the wild borderer who encroaches upon
their hunting grounds and carries off their spoil.
I fear not, sirI know all the chiefs, and feel just
G 3
as secure here, guarded by the watchful Providence,
as I possibly could do, in the crowded city, fenced in
by mightiest walls.
This confidence is rashness, sir, since it rejects a
precaution which can do no harm, and offers but little
inconvenience. Where is the necessity for your
remaining
here, where there is so little to attract, and
so few ties to bind? Leave the spot, sir, at least until
the storm is over-blown which I now see impending.
You are prophetic, Master Harrison, but as I see
no storm impending, you will suffer me to remain.
You seem also to forget that in remaining in this
region
,
which you say has few ties for me and mine, I
am complying with a solemn duty, undertaken in cool
deliberation, and which I would not, if I could, avoid.
I am here, as you know, the agent of a noble Christian
charity of England, as a missionary to the heathen.
And nothing inconsistent with your duty to leave
the spot for a season, in which, in the event of a war,
you could pursue no such mission. Leave it for a
season, only.
Master Harrison, once for all, permit me to choose
for myself, not only where to live, but who shall be
my adviser and companion. I owe you thanks for
your professed interest in me and mine; but it seems
to me there is but little delicacy in thus giving us your
presence, when my thoughts on the subject of my
daughter
and your claim, have been so clearly expressed.
The violence of your course to-day, sir, let me add, is
enough to strengthen my previous determination on
that subject.
Your determination, Mr. Matthews, seems fixed,
indeed, to be wrong-headed and obstinate. You have
dwelt greatly upon my violence to this sea-bear; yet,
or I greatly mistake my man, you will come to wish it
had been greater. But ask your own good sense
whether that violence exceeded in degree the amount
necessary to secure the restoration of my slave? I
did only what I thought essential to that end, though
something provoked to more. But this asideif you
will not hear counsel, and determine to remain in this
place, at least let me implore you to observe every
precaution, and be ready to resort to the Block House
with the first alarm. Be ready in your defence, and
keep a careful watch. Let your nightbolts be well
shot. I too, sir, will be something watchful for you.
I cannot think of letting you sacrifice, by your
ill-judged
obstinacy, one, dear enough to me, at least, to
make me bear with the discourtesies which come with
such an ill grace from her sire.
Thus speaking, Harrison left the cottage abruptly,
leaving the old gentleman, standing, somewhat
dissatisfied
with his own conduct, in the middle of the
floor.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Thou killest me with a word when thou dost say
She loves him. Better thou hadst slain me first;
Thou hadst not half so wrong'd me then as now,
For now,
I live to perish
.
Hector
met his master at the door of the cottage
with tidings from the daughter which somewhat
compensated
for the harsh treatment of the father. She
had consented to their meeting that afternoon in the
old grove of oaks, well known even to this day in that
neighbourhood, for its depth and beauty of shadow, and
its sweet fitness for all the purposes of love.
Somewhat
more satisfied, therefore, he took his way to the
Block House, where the foresters awaited him.
They met in consultation, and the duties before
Harrison were manifold. He told the party around
him all that it was necessary they should know, in
order to ensure proper precautions; and having
persuaded
them of the necessity of this labour, he found
no difficulty in procuring their aid in putting the Block
House in better trim for the reception of the enemy. To
do this, they went over the fabric together. The pickets
forming an area or yard on two of its sides, having been
made of the resinous pine of the country, were generally
in good preservation. The gate securing the entrance
was gone, however, and called for immediate attention.
The door of the Block House itselffor it had but
onehad also been taken away, and the necessity was
equally great of its restoration. The lower story of
the fortress consisted of but a single apartment, in
which no repairs were needed. The upper story was
divided into two rooms, and reached by a laddera
single ladder serving both divisions, and transferable
to each place of access when their ascent was
desirable
.
One of these apartments, built more securely
than the other, and pierced with a single small window,
had been meant as the retreat of the women and
children
,
and was now in the possession of Granger, the
trader, and his wife. His small stock in trade, his
furs, blankets, knives, beads, hatchets, etc., were
strewn confusedly over the clapboard floor. These
were the articles most wanted by the Indians.
Fire-arms
it had been the policy of the English to keep
from them as much as possible. Still, the intercourse
between them had been such that this desire was not
always practicable. Many of their principal persons
had contrived to procure them, either from the English
tradesmen themselves, or from the Spaniards of St.
Augustine, with whom of late the Yemassees had
grown exceedingly intimate; and though, from their
infrequent use, not perfectly masters of the weapon,
they were still sufficiently familiar with it to
increase
the odds already in their favour on the score
of numbers. Apart from this, the musket is but little
if any thing superior to the bow and arrow in the
American forests. It inspires with more terror, and is
therefore more useful; but it is not a whit more fatal.
Once discharged, the musket is of little avail. The
Indian then rushes forward, and the bayonet becomes
innocuous, for the striking and sure distance for
the tomahawk in his hands is beyond the reach of its
thrust. The tomahawk, with little practice, in any
hand, can inflict a severe if not a fatal wound at twelve
paces, and beyond ordinary pistol certainty. As long
as his quiver lastssay twelve or fifteen arrows
the bow in the close woods is superior to the musket
in the grasp of an Indian, requiring only the little time
necessary after the discharge of one, in fixing another
arrow upon the elastic sinew. The musket too, in the
hands of the Englishman, and according to his practice,
is a sightless weapon. He fires in line, and without
aim. The Anglo-American, therefore, has generally
adopted the rifle. The eye of the Indian regulates
every shaft from his bow with a rapidity given him by
repeated and hourly practice from his childhood, and
he learns to take the same aim at his enemy which he
would take at the smallest bird among his forests.
But to return.
Harrison, with Grimstead, the smith, Grayson,
Granger, and the rest, looked carefully to all the
defences
of the fortress, employing them generally in the
repairs considered necessary, nor withholding his own
efforts in restoring the broken timber or the maimed
shutter. The tools of the carpenter were as familiar
as the weapon of warfare to the hand of the American
woodsman, and the aid of the smith soon put things in
train for a stout defence of the fabric, in the event of
any necessity. This having been done, the whole
party assembled in Granger's apartment to partake of
the frugal meal which the hands of the trader's wife
had prepared for them. We have seen the bold step
taken by this woman in delivering up to the
Yemassees
the treaty which conveyed their lands to the
Carolinians, by which, though she had risked the
displeasure
of Sir Edmund Bellinger, whom the point
of honour would have rendered obstinate, she had
certainly saved the lives of the party. She was a
tall, masculine, and well-made woman; of a
sanguine
complexion, with deeply sunken, dark eyes,
hair black as a coal and cut short like that of a man.
14
There was a stern something in her glance which
repelled
;
and though gentle and even humble in her
usual speech, there were moments when her tone was
that of reckless defiance, and when her manner was
any thing but conciliatory. Her look was always grave,
even sombre, and no one saw her smile. She thus
preserved her own and commanded the respect of
others, in a sphere of life to which respect, or in very
moderate degree, is not often conceded; and though
now she did not sit at the board upon which the
humble
meal had been placed, her presence restrained
the idle remark which the wild life of most of those
assembled around it, would be well apt to instigate and
occasion. At dinner Hector was examined as to his
detention on board of the schooner. He told the
story of his capture as already given, and though
the poor fellow had in reality heard nothing, or very
little, of the conversation between the sailor and the
Indians, yet the clear narrative which he gave,
descriptive
of the free intercourse between the parties, and
the presence of the belt of wampum, were proofs strong
as holy writ, conclusive to the mind of Harrison of
the suspicion he had already entertained.
And what of the schoonerwhat did you see
there, Hector?
Gun, mosserbig gun, little gunlong sword,
little sword, and hatchets plenty for Injins.
What sort of men?
Ebery sort, mosser, English, Dutch, French,
Spanish,ugly little men wid big whiskers, and long
black hair, and face nebber see water.
This was information enough, and with some further
deliberation the parties separated, each in the
performance
of some duty which by previous arrangement had
been assigned him. An hour after the separation, and
Walter Grayson arrived at the landing upon the river,
a few hundred yards from the cottage where he lived,
in time to see his brother, who was just about to put
off with several bundles of skins in a small boat towards
the vessel of the supposed Indian trader. The manner
of the latter was cold, and his tone rather stern and
ungracious.
I have waited for you some hours, Walter Grayson,
said he, standing upon the banks, and throwing a bundle
into the bottom of the boat.
I could come no sooner, Hugh; I have been busy
in assisting the captain.
The captainwill you never be a freeman,
Walter
will
you always be a water-carrier for a
master
?
Why do you seek and serve this swaggerer, as
if you had lost every jot of manly independence?
Not so fast, Hugh,and my very good younger
brothernot so fast. I have not served him, more than
I have served you and all of us, by what I have done this
morning.He then went on to tell his brother of the
occurrences of the day. The other seemed much
astonished
,
and there was something of chagrin manifest
in his astonishmentso much so indeed, that Walter
could not help asking him if he regretted that
Harrison
should get his own again.
Nonot so, brother,but the truth is, I was about
to take my skins to this same trader for sale and
barter
,
and my purpose is something staggered by your
intelligence.
Well, I don't know but it should stagger you; and
I certainly shouldn't advise you, for the man who
comes to smuggle and kidnap will scarcely heed
smaller matters of trade.
I must goI want every thing, even powder and
lead.
Well, that's a good want with you, Hugh, for if
you had none, you'd be better willing to work at home.
I will not go into the field,said the other,
haughtily
and impatiently. It will do for you, to take the
mule's labour, who are so willing to be at the beck and
call of every swaggering upstart, but I will not. No!
Let me rather go with the Indians, and take up with
them, and dress in their skins, and disfigure myself
with their savage paint; but I will neither dig nor hew
when I can do otherwise.
Ay, when you can do otherwise, Hugh Grayson
I am willing. But do not deceive yourself, young
brother of mine. I know, if you do not, why the
labours of the field, which I must go through with, are
your dislike. I know why you will rather drive the
woods, day after day, in the Indian fashion, along with
Chiparee or Occonestoga and with no better company,
for now and then a buck or doe, in preference to more
regular employment and a more certain subsistence.
And why is it then, Walterlet me have the benefit
of your knowledge.
Ay, I know and so do you, Hugh, and shame, I
say, on the false pride which regards the toil of your
own father, and the labours of your own brother, as
degrading. Ay, you blush, and well you may, Hugh
Grayson. It is the trutha truth I have never spoken
in your ears before, and should not have spoken now
but for the freedom and frequency with which you, my
younger brother, and for whom I have toiled when he
could not toil for himself, presume to speak of my
conduct
as slavish. Now examine your own, and know
that as I am independent, I am not slavishyou can
tell for yourself whether you owe as little to me, as I
to you and to all other persons. When you have
answered
this question, Hugh, you can find a better
application
than you have yet made of that same word
`slave.'
The cheek of the hearer grew pale and crimson,
alternately, at the reproach of the speaker, whose eye
watched him with not a little of that sternness of
glance, which heretofore had filled his own. At one
moment, the collected fury of his look seemed to
threaten violence, but, as if consideration came
opportunely
,
he turned aside, and after a few moments' pause,
replied in a thick, broken tone of voice:
You have said well, my elder brother and my
better. Your reproach is justI am a dependanta
beggarone who should acknowledge, if he has not
craved for, charity. I say itand I feel it, and the
sooner I requite the obligation the better. I will go to
this trader, and sell my skins if I can, kidnapper or
pirate though he be. I will go to him, and beg him to
buy, which I might not have done but for your speech.
You have said harshly, Walter Grayson, very harshly,
but truly, andI thank you, I thank you, believe me
I thank you for the lesson.
As he moved away, the elder brother turned quick
upon him, and with an ebullition of feeling which did
not impair his manliness, he grappled his hand
Hugh, boy, I was harsh and foolish, but you
wrought me to it. I love you, brotherlove you as if
you were my own son, and do not repent me of any
thing I have done for you, which, were it to be done
over again, I should rejoice to do. But when you
speak in such harsh language of men whom you know
I love, you provoke me, particularly when I see and
know that you do them injustice. Now, Captain
Harrison
,
let me tell you
I would not hear, Walternothing, I pray you, of
that man!
And why not?Ah, Hughey, put down this bad
spiritthis impatient spirit, which will not let you
sleep; for even in your sleep it speaks out, and I have
heard it.
Ha! and the other started, and laid his hand on
the arm of his brotherthou hast heard what?
What I will not saynot even to you, but enough,
Hugh, to satisfy me, that your dislike to Harrison
springs from an unbecoming feeling.
Name it.
Jealousy!I have already hinted as much, and
now I tell you that your love for Bess Matthews, and
her love for him, are the cause of your hate to
Harrison
.
You mean not to say she loves him.
I do, Hughhonestly I believe it.
And as the elder brother replied, the other dashed
down his hand, which, on putting the question, he had
taken, and rushed off, with a feeling of desperation, to
the boat. In a moment, seated centrally within it, he
had left the banks; and the little flap oar was plied from
hand to hand with a rapidity and vigour more than
half derived from the violent boiling of the feverish
blood within his veins. With a glance of sympathy
and of genuine feeling, Walter Grayson surveyed his
progress for a while, then turned away to the cottage
and to other occupations.
In a little while, the younger brother, with his small
cargo, approached the vessel, and was instantly hailed
by a gruff voice from within.
Throw me a rope, was the cry of Grayson.
For whatwhat the devil should make us throw
you a ropewho are youwhat do you want? was
the reply. The speaker, who was no other than our
old acquaintance Chorley, appearing at the same
moment, and looking down at the visiter.
You buy furs and skins, captainI have both, and
here is a bag of amber, fresh gathered, and the drops
are large.
[16]
[16]
Amber, in Carolina, was supposed to exist in such quantities, at an
early period in its history, that among the laws and constitution made
by the celebrated John Locke for the Province, we find one,
regulating
its distribution among the eight lords proprietors. At present
we have no evidence of its fruitfulness in that quarter, and the
probability
is, that in the sanguine spirit of the time, the notion was
entertained from the few specimens occasionally found and worn by
the Indians.
I want powder for them, and shotsome
knives and hatchets.
You get none from me, blast me.
What, wherefore are you here, if not for trade?
was the involuntary question of Grayson. The
seaman
,
still desirous of preserving appearances as much
as possible, found it necessary to control his mood,
which the previous circumstances of the morning
were not altogether calculated to soften greatly. He
replied therefore evasively.
Ay, to be sure I come for trade, but can't you wait
till I haul up to the landing? I am afraid there's not
water enough for me to do so now, for the stream
shoals here, as I can tell by my soundings, too greatly
for the risk; but to-morrowcome to-morrow, and I'll
trade with you for such things as you want.
And whether you haul to the landing or not, why
not trade on board to-day? Let me bring my skins up;
throw me a rope, and we shall soon trade. I want but
few things, and they will require no long search; you
can easily say if you have them.
But this was pressing the point too far upon Chorley's
good-nature. The seaman swore indignantly at the
pertinacity of his visiter, and pouring forth a broadside
of oaths, bade him tack ship and trouble him no longer.
Be off now, young one, before I send you a supply
of lead not so much to your liking. If you don't take
this chance and put about, you'll never catch stays
again. I'll send a shot through your timber-trunk and
scuttle her at once.
The fierce spirit of Grayson ill brooked such
treatment
,
but he had no remedy save in words. He did not
scruple to denounce the seaman as a low churl and
an illnatured ruffian. Coolly then, and with the utmost
deliberation, paddling himself round, with a disappointed
heart, he made once more for the cottage landing.
CHAPTER XIX.
The hunters are upon theekeep thy pace,
Nor falter, lest the arrow strike thy back,
And the foe trample on thy prostrate form.
It
was about the noon of the same day, when the
son of Sanutee, the outcast and exiled Occonestoga,
escaping from his father's assault and flying from the
place of council as already narrated, appeared on the
banks of the river nearly opposite the denser
settlement
of the whites, and several miles below
Pocota-ligo
.
But the avenger had followed hard upon his
footsteps, and he had suffered terribly in his flight. His
whole appearance was that of the extremest wretched
ness. His dress was torn by the thorns of many a
thicket in which he had been compelled to crawl for
shelter. His skin had been lacerated, and the brakes
and creeks through which he had to plough and plunge,
had left the tribute of their mud and mire on every inch
of his person. Nor had the trials of his mind been
less. Previous drunkenness, the want of food and
extreme
fatigue (for, circuitously doubling from his
pursuers
,
he had run nearly the whole night, scarcely able
to rest for a moment), contributed duly to the
miserable
figure which he made. His eyes were swollen
his cheeks sunken, and there was a wo-begone
feebleness
and utter
abandon
about his whole appearance
He had been completely sobered by the hunt made
after him; and the instinct of life, for he knew nothing
of the peculiar nature of the doom in reserve for him,
had effectually called all his faculties into exercise.
When hurried from the council-house by Sir
Edmund
Bellinger, to save him from the anger of his
father, he had taken the way under a filial and natural
influence to the lodge of Matiwan. And she cheered
and would have cherished him, could that have been
done consistently with her duty to her lord. What she
could do, however, she did; and though deeply sorrowing
over his prostituted manhood, she could not at the same
time forget that he was her son. But in her cabin he
was not permitted to linger long. Watchful for the
return
of Sanutee, Matiwan was soon apprized of the
approach of the pursuers. The people, collected to
avenge themselves upon the chiefs, were not likely to
suffer the escape of one, who, like Occonestoga, had
done so much to subject them, as they thought, to the
dominion of the English. A party of them, accordingly,
hearing of his flight and readily conceiving its
direction
,
took the same route; and, but for the mother's
watchfulness, he had then shared the doom of the
other chiefs. But she heard their coming and sent
him on his way; not so soon, however, as to make
his start in advance of them a matter of very great
importance to his flight. They were close upon his
heels, and when he cowered silently in the brake, they
took their way directly beside him. When he lay
stretched alongside of the fallen tree they stepped over
his body, and when, seeking a beaten path in his
tortuous
course, he dared to look around him, the waving
pine torches which they carried, flamed before his
eyes.
I will burn feathers, thou shalt have arrows,
Opitchi-Manneyto
.
Be not wroth with the young chief
of Yemassee. Make the eyes blind that hunt after
him for blood. Thou shalt have arrows and feathers,
Opitchi-Manneytoa bright fire of arrows and
feathers
!
Thus, as he lay beneath the branches of a fallen
tree around which his pursuers were winding, the
young warrior uttered the common form of deprecation
and prayer to the evil deity of his people, in the
language
of the nation. But he did not despair, though
he prayed. Though now easily inebriated and
extremely
dissolute in that respect, Occonestoga was a
gallant and a very skilful partisan even in the
estimation
of the Indians. He had been one of the most
promising of all their youth, when first made a chief,
after a great battle with the Savannahs, against whom
he first distinguished himself. This exceeding promise
at first, made the mortification of his subsequent fall
more exquisitely painful to Sanutee, who was proud
and ambitious. Nor was Occonestoga himself utterly
insensible to his degradation. When sober, his
humiliation
and shame were scarcely less poignant than that of
his father; but, unhappily, the seduction of strong drink,
he had never been able to withstand. He was easily
persuaded and as easily overcome. He had thus gone
on for some time; and, with this object, had sought
daily communication with the lower classes of the
white settlers, from whom alone liquor could be
obtained
.
For this vile reward he had condescended to
the performance of various services for the whites, held
degrading by his own people; until, at length, but for his
father's great influence, which necessarily restrained
the popular feeling on the subject of the son's conduct,
he had long since been thrust from any consideration
or authority among them. Originally, he had been
highly popular. His courage had been greatly admired,
and admirably consorted with the strength and beauty
of his person. Even now, bloated and blasted as he
was, there was something highly prepossessing in his
general appearance. He was tall and graceful, broad
and full across the breast, and straight as an arrow.
But the soul was debased, and if it were possible at
all, in the thought of an Indian, for a moment to meditate
the commission of suicide, there was that in the
countenance
and expression of Occonestoga, as he rose
from the morass, on the diversion from his track of
the pursuers, almost to warrant the belief that his
detestation
of life had driven him to such a determination.
But on he went, pressing rapidly forward, while the
hunters were baffled in rounding a dense brake through
which in his desperation he had dared to go. He
was beyond them, but they were between him and the
river; and for the white settlements, his coursethe
only course in which he hoped for safetywas bent.
Day came, and still the shouts of the pursuers, and
occasionally a sight of them, warned him into increased
activitya necessity greatly at variance with the
fatigue
he had already undergone. In addition to this,
his flight had taken him completely out of his
contemplated
route. To recover and regain it was now his object.
Boldly striking across the path of his hunters,
Occonestoga
darted along the bed of a branch which ran
parallel with the course he aimed to take. He lay
still as they approachedhe heard their retreating
footsteps, and again he set forward. But the ear and
the sense of the Indian are as keen as his own arrow,
and the pursuers were not long misled. They retrieved
their error, and turned with the fugitive; but the
instinct
of preservation was still active, and momentary
success gave him a new stimulant to exertion. At
length, when almost despairing and exhausted, his eyes
beheld and his feet gained the bank of the river, still
ahead of his enemy; and grateful, but exhausted, he
lay for a few moments stretched upon the sands, and
gazing upon the quiet waters before him. He was not
long suffered to remain in peace. A shout arrested his
attention, and he started to his feet to behold two of his
pursuers emerging at a little distance from the forest.
To be hunted thus like a dog was a pang, and previous
fatigue and a strong impulse of desperation persuaded
him that death were far preferable to the miserable and
outcast life which he led. So feeling, in that one
moment
of despair, he threw open the folds of his hunting
shirt, and placing his hand upon his breast, cried
out to them to shoot. But the bow was unlifted, the
arrow undrawn, and to his surprise the men who had
pursued him as he thought for his blood, now refused
what they had desired. They increased their efforts
to take, but not to destroy him. The circumstance
surprised him; and with a renewal of his thought
came a renewed disposition to escape. Without
further
word, and with the instantaneous action of his
reason, he plunged forward into the river, and diving
down like an otter, reserved his breath until, arising, he
lay in the very centre of the stream. But he arose
enfeebled and overcomethe feeling of despair grew
with his weakness, and turning a look of defiance upon
the two Indians who still stood in doubt watching his
progress from the banks which they had now gained, he
raised himself breast high with a sudden effort from the
water, and once more challenged their arrows to his
breast, which, with one hand, he struck with a fierce
violence
,
the action of defiance and despair. As they saw
the action, one of them, as if in compliance with the
demand, lifted his bow, but the other the next instant
struck it down. Half amazed and wondering at what
he saw, and now almost overcome by his effort, the
sinking Occonestoga gave a single shout of derision, and
ceased all further effort. The waters bore him down.
Once, and once only, his hand was struck out as if in
the act of swimming, while his head was buried; and
then the river closed over him. The brave but
desponding warrior sunk hopelessly, just as the little
skiff of Hugh Grayson, returning from his interview
with Chorley, which we have already narrated, darted
over the small circle in the stream which still bubbled
and broke where the young Indian had gone down.
The whole scene had been witnessed by him, and he
had urged every sinew in approaching. His voice, as
he called aloud to Occonestoga, whom he well knew,
had been unheard by the drowning and despairing man.
But still he came in time, for, as his little boat whirled
about under the direction of his paddle and around the
spot, the long black hair suddenly grew visible above
the water, and in the next moment was firmly clutched
in the grasp of the Carolinian. With difficulty he
sustained
the head above the surface, still holding on by the
hair. The banks were not distant, and the little paddle
which he employed was susceptible of use by one
hand. Though thus encumbered, he was soon
enabled
to get within his depth. This done, he jumped
from the boat, and by very great effort bore the
unconscious victim to the land. A shout from the
Indians on the opposite bank, attested their own interest
in the result; and they were lost in the forest just at
the moment when returning consciousness on the part
of Occonestoga, had rewarded Grayson for the efforts he
had made and still continued making for his recovery.
Thou art better now, Occonestoga, art thou not?
was the inquiry of his preserver.
Feathers and arrows for thee, Opitchi-Manneyto,
in his own language, muttered the savage, his mind
recurring to the previous pursuit. The youth continued
his services without pressing him for speech, and his
exhaustion had been so great that he could do little if
any thing for himself. Unlashing his bow and quiver,
which had been tied securely to his back, and unloosing
the belt about his body, Grayson still further contributed
to his relief. At length he grew conscious and
sufficiently
restored to converse freely with his preserver;
and though still gloomy and depressed, Occonestoga
returned him thanks in his own way for the assistance
which had been given him.
Thou wilt go with me to my cabin, Occonestoga?
No! Occonestoga is a dog. The woods for
Occonestoga
.
He must seek arrows and feathers for
Opitchi-Manneyto
,
who came to him in the swamp.
The youth pressed him farther, but finding him
obdurate, and knowing well the inflexible character of
the Indian, he gave up the hope of persuading him to
his habitation. They separated at length after the delay
of an hour,Grayson again in his canoe, and
Occonestoga
plunging into the woods in the direction of the
Block House.
CHAPTER XX.
Thus nature, with an attribute most strange,
Clothes even the reptile. Desolate would be
The danger, were there not, in our own thoughts,
Something to win us to it.
The
afternoon of that day was one of those clear,
sweet, balmy afternoons, such as make of the spring
season in the south, a holyday term of nature. All
was life, animated life and freshness. The month of
April, in that region, is, indeed,
the time,
When the merry birds do chime
Airy wood-notes wild and free,
In secluded bower and tree.
Season of fantastic change,
Sweet, familiar, wild, and strange
Time of promise, when the leaf
Has a tear of pleasant grief,
When the winds, by nature coy,
Do both cold and heat alloy,
Nor to either will dispense
Their delighting preference.
The day had been gratefully warm; and, promising
an early summer, there was a prolific show of foliage
throughout the forest. The twittering of a thousand
Vol. I.H
various birds, and the occasional warble of that Puck
of the American forests, the mockerthe
Coonee-latee
,
or Trick-tongue of the Yemasseestogether
with the gleesome murmur of zephyr and brook, gave
to the scene an aspect of wooing and seductive
repose, that could not fail to win the sense into a
most happy unconsciousness. The old oaken grove
which Bess Matthews, in compliance with the prayer
of her lover, now approached, was delightfully
conceived
for such an occasion. All things within it
seemed to breathe of love. The murmur of the
brooklet, the song of the bird, the hum of the zephyr
in the tree-top, had each a corresponding burden. The
Providence surely has its purpose in associating only
with the woods those gentle and beautiful influences
which are without use or object to the obtuse sense,
and can only be felt and valued by a spirit of
corresponding
gentleness and beauty. The scene itself, to
the eye, was of like character. The rich green of the
leavesthe deep crimson of the wild flowerthe
gemmed and floral-knotted long grass that carpeted the
paththe deep, solemn shadows of evening, and the
trees through which the now declining sun was enabled
only here and there to sprinkle a few drops from his
golden censerall gave power to that spell of quiet,
which, by divesting the mind of its associations of
every-day
and busy life, throws it back upon its early and
unsophisticated naturerestoring that time in the elder
and better condition of humanity, when, unchanged by
conventional influences, the whole business of life
seems to have been the worship of high spirits, and
the exercise of living, holy, and generous affections.
The scene and time had a strong influence over the
maiden, as she slowly took her way to the place of
meeting. Bess Matthews, indeed, was singularly
susceptible of such influences. She was a girl of
heart, a wild hearta thing of the forest,gentle as
its innocentest flowers, quite as lovely, and if, unlike
them, the creature of a less fleeting life, one, at least,
whose youth and freshness might almost persuade us
to regard her as never having been in existence for a
longer season. She was also a girl of thought and
intellectsomething too, of a dreamer:one to whom
a song brought a sentimentthe sentiment an emotion,
and that in turn seeking an altar which called for all
the worship of her spirit. She had in her own heart
a far sweeter song than that which she occasionally
murmured from her lips. She felt all the poetry, all
the truth of the sceneits passion, its inspiration,
and, with a holy sympathy for all of nature's beautiful,
the associated feeling of admiration for all that was
noble, awakened in her mind a sentiment, and in her
heart an emotion, that led her, not less to the most
careful
forbearance to tread upon the humblest flower, than
to a feeling little short of reverence in the
contemplation
of the gigantic tree. It was her faith with one
of the greatest of modern poets, that the daisy
enjoyed
its existence; and that, too, in a degree of
exquisite
perception, duly according with its loveliness
of look and delicacy of structure. This innate
principle
of regard for the beautiful forest idiots, as we may
call its leaves and flowers, was duly heightened, we
may add, by the soft passion of love then prevailing
in her bosom for Gabriel Harrison. She loved him
as she found in him the strength of the tree well
combined with the softness of the flower. Her heart
and fancy at once united in the recognition of his claims
upon her affections; and, however unknown in other
respects, she loved him deeply and devotedly for
what she knew. Beyond what she sawbeyond
the knowledge gathered from his uttered sentiments,
and the free grace of his mannerhis manliness, and,
at the same time, his forbearance,he was scarcely
less a mystery to her than to her father, to whom
mystery
had far less of recommendation. But the secret,
so he had assured her, would be soon explained; and
she was satisfied to believe in the assurance. She
certainly
longed for the time to come; and we shall be
doing no discredit to her sense of maidenly delicacy
when we say, that she longed for the development not
H 2
so much because she desired the satisfaction of her
curiosity, as because the objections of her sire, so
Harrison had assured her, would then certainly be
removed
,
and their union would immediately follow.
He is not come, she murmured, half disappointed,
as the old grove of oaks with all its religious solemnity
of shadow lay before her. She took her seat at the
foot of a tree, the growth of a century, whose thick
and knotted roots, started from their sheltering earth,
shot even above the long grass around them, and
ran in irregular sweeps for a considerable distance
upon the surface. Here she sat not long, for her
mind grew impatient and confused with the various
thoughts crowding upon itsweet thoughts it may be,
for she thought of himalmost of him, only, whom
she loved, and of the long hours of happy enjoyment
which the future had in store. Then came the fears,
following fast upon the hopes, as the shadows follow
the sunlight. The doubts of existencethe brevity
and the fluctuations of life; these are the
contemplations
even of happy love, and these beset and saddened
her; till, starting up in that dreamy confusion which
the scene not less than the subject of her musings had
inspired, she glided among the old trees, scarce
conscious
of her movement.
He does not comehe does not come, she
murmured
,
as she stood contemplating the thick copse
spreading before her, and forming the barrier which
terminated the beautiful range of oaks which
constituted
the grove. How beautiful was the green and
garniture
of that little copse of wood. The leaves were
thick, and the grass around lay folded over and over in
bunches, with here and there a wild flower, gleaming
from its green and making of it a beautiful carpet of
the richest and most various texture. A small tree
rose from the centre of a clump around which a wild
grape gadded luxuriantly; and, with an incoherent
sense of what she saw, she lingered before the little
cluster, seeming to survey that which she had no
thought for at the moment. Things grew indistinct to
her wandering eyethe thought was turned inward
and the musing spirit denying the governing sense
to the external agents and conductors, they failed duly
to appreciate the forms that rose, and floated, and glided
before them. In this way, the leaf detached made no
impression upon the sight that was yet bent upon it;
she saw not the bird, though it whirled, untroubled by a
fear, in wanton circles around her headand the
black-snake, with the rapidity of an arrow, darted over
her path without arousing a single terror in the form
that otherwise would have shivered but at its
appearance
.
And yet, though thus indistinct were all things
around her to the musing mind of the maiden, her eye
was singularly impressed with one object, peering out
at intervals from the little bush beneath it. She saw
or thought she saw, at moments, through the bright
green of the leaves, a star-like glance, a small bright
ray, subtile, sharp, beautifulan eye of the leaf itself,
darting the most searching looks into her own. Now
the leaves shook and the vines waved elastically and
in beautiful forms before her, but the star-like eye was
there, bright and gorgeous, and still glancing up to her
own. How beautifulhow strange, did it appear to
the maiden. She watched it still with a dreaming
sense, but with a spirit strangely attracted by its beauty
with a feeling in which awe and admiration were
equally commingled. She could have bent forward to
pluck the gem-like thing from the bosom of the leaf in
which it seemed to grow, and from which it gleamed
so brilliantly; but once, as she approached, she heard
a shrill scream from the tree above hersuch a scream
as the mock-bird makes, when, angrily, it raises its
dusky crest, and flaps its wings furiously against its
slender sides. Such a scream seemed like a warning,
and though yet unawakened to full consciousness, it
repelled her approach. More than once, in her survey
of this strange object, had she heard that shrill note,
and still had it carried to her ear the same note of
warning, and to her mind the same vague
consciousness
of an evil presence. But the star-like eye was yet
upon her owna small, bright eye, quick like that of a
bird, now steady in its place and observant seemingly
only of hers, now darting forward with all the
clustering
leaves about it, and shooting up towards her, as if
wooing her to seize. At another moment, riveted
to the vine which lay around it, it would whirl round
and round, dazzlingly bright and beautiful, even as a
torch, waving hurriedly by night in the hands of some
playful boy;but, in all this time, the glance was never
taken from her ownthere it grew, fixeda very
principle
of light,and such a lighta subtile, burning,
piercing, fascinating light, such as gathers in vapour
above the old grave, and binds us as we lookshooting,
darting directly into her own, dazzling her gaze,
defeating
its sense of discrimination, and confusing strangely
that of perception. She felt dizzy, for, as she looked,
a cloud of colours, bright, gay, various colours, floated
and hung like so much drapery around the single
object that had so secured her attention and
spellbound
her feet. Her limbs felt momently more and
more insecureher blood grew cold, and she seemed
to feel the gradual freeze of vein by vein, throughout
her person. At that moment a rustling was heard in
the branches of the tree beside her, and the bird, which
had repeatedly uttered a single cry, as it were of
warning, above her, flew away from his station with a
scream more piercing than ever. This movement had
the effect, for which it really seemed intended, of
bringing
back to her a portion of the consciousness she
seemed so totally to have been deprived of before. She
strove to move from before the beautiful but terrible
presence, but for a while she strove in vain. The
rich, star-like glance still riveted her own, and the
subtle fascination kept her bound. The mental
energies
,
however, with the moment of their greatest trial,
now gathered suddenly to her aid; and, with a desperate
effort, but with a feeling still of most annoying
uncertainty
and dread, she succeeded partially in the attempt,
and leaned backward against the neighbouring tree,
feeble, tottering, and depending upon it for that support
which her own limbs almost entirely denied her. With
her movement, however, came the full development
of the powerful spell and dreadful mystery before her.
As her feet receded, though but a single pace, to the
tree against which she now rested, the audibly
articulated
ring, like that of a watch when wound up
with the verge broken, announced the nature of that
splendid yet dangerous presence, in the form of the
monstrous rattlesnake, now, but a few feet before her,
lying coiled at the bottom of a beautiful shrub, with
which, to her dreaming eye, many of its own glorious
hues had been associated. She was conscious enough
to discriminate and to perceive, but terror had denied
her the strength necessary to fly from her dreadful
enemy. There still the eye glared beautifully bright
and piercing upon her own; and, seemingly in a
spirit of sport, he slowly unwound himself from his
coil, then immediately, the next moment, again gathered
himself into its muscular massesthe rattle still
slightly ringing at intervals, and giving forth that
paralyzing
sound, which, once heard, is remembered for
ever. The reptile all this while appeared to be
conscious
of, and to sport with, while seeking to excite
her terrors. Now, with its flat head, distended mouth,
and curving neck, would it dart forward its long
form towards her,its fatal teeth, unfolding on either
side of its jaws, seeming to threaten her with
instantaneous
death, while its powerful eye shot forth
glances of that fatal power of fascination, malignantly
bright, which, by paralyzing with a novel form of
terror and of beauty, may readily account for the
spell it possesses of binding the feet of the timid, and
denying to fear even the privilege of flight. Then,
the next moment, recovering quickly, it would resume
its folds, and with arching neck, which now glittered
like a bar of brazed copper, and fixed eye, continue,
calmly as it were, to contemplate the victim of its
secreted venomthe pendulous rattle still ringing the
death-note as if to prepare the conscious mind for the
fate which is at hand. Its various folds were now
completethe coil forming a series of knotsthe
muscles, now and then, rising rigidly into a hill, now
corded down by the pressure of another of its folds
into a valley. Thesesuddenly unclasping, in the
general
effort to strike its enemy, give it that degree of
impetus
which enables it to make its stroke as fatal,
at the full extent of its own length, as when, suddenly
invaded, its head is simply elevated and the blow given.
The glance of Bess Matthews at this moment upon
her enemy, assured her that the sport of the deadly
reptile was about to cease. She could not now
mistake
the fearful expression of its eye. She strove to
scream, but her voice died away in her throat. Her
lips were sealedshe sought to fly, but her limbs were
palsiedshe had nothing left of life but its
consciousness
;
and in despair of escape, with a single scream,
forced from her by the accumulated agony, she sunk
down upon the grass before her enemyher eyes,
however, still open, and still looking upon those
which he directed for ever upon them. She saw him
approachnow advancing, now recedingnow
swelling
in every part with something of anger, while his
neck was arched beautifully like that of a wild horse
underthe curb; until, at length, tired as it were of play,
like the cat with its victim, she saw the neck growing
larger and becoming completely bronzed when about
to strikethe huge jaws unclosing almost directly
above her, the long tubulated fang, charged with venom,
protruding from the cavernous mouthand she saw no
more! Insensibility came to her aid, and she lay
almost lifeless under the very folds of the monster. In
that moment the copse partedand an arrow, piercing
him through and through the neck, bore his head
forward
to the ground, alongside of the maiden, while his
spiral extremities, now unfolding in his own agony,
were actually, in part, resting upon her person. The
arrow came from the fugitive Occonestoga, who had
fortunately reached the spot, in season, on his way to
the Block House. He rushed from the copse, as the
snake fell, and, with a stick, fearlessly approached him
where he lay writhing upon the grass. Seeing him
advance, the courageous reptile made an effort to
regain his coil, while shaking the fearful rattle
violently
at every evolution which he took for that
purpose
;
but the arrow, completely passing through his
neck, opposed an unyielding obstacle to the endeavour;
and finding it hopeless, and seeing the new enemy
about to assault him, with something of the spirit of
the white man under like circumstances, he turned
recklessly round, and striking his charged fangs, so
that they were riveted in the wound they made, into
a susceptible part of his own body, he threw himself
over upon his back with a single convulsion, and,
a moment after, lay dead upon the person of the
maiden.
[17]
[17]
The power of the rattlesnake to fascinate, is a frequent faith
among the superstitious of the southern country-people. Of this
capacity in reference to birds and insects, frogs, and the smaller
reptiles
,
there is indeed little question. Its power over persons is not so
well authenticated, although numberless instances of this sort are
given by persons of very excellent veracity. The above is almost
literally
worded after a verbal narrative furnished the author by an old
lady, who never dreamed, herself, of doubting the narration. It is more
than probable, indeed, that the mind of a timid person, coming
suddenly
upon a reptile so highly venomous, would for a time be
paralyzed
by its consciousness of danger, sufficiently so to defeat exertion
for a while, and deny escape. The authorities for this superstition
are, however, quite sufficient for the romancer, and in a work like the
present, we need no other.
CHAPTER XXI.
Come with me; thou shalt hear of my resolve,
Then hasten to thy labour.
Without
giving more than a single glance to the
maiden, Occonestoga approached the snake, and,
drawing
his knife, prepared to cut away the rattles, always
a favourite Indian ornament, which terminated his
H 3
elongated folds. He approached his victim with a
deportment the most respectful, and, after the manner
of his people, gravely, and in the utmost good faith,
apologized in well set terms, in his own language, for
the liberty he had already taken, and that which he
was then about to take. He protested the necessity
he had been under in destroying it; and urging his
desire to possess the excellent and only evidence
of his own prowess in conquering so great a warrior,
which the latter carried at his tail, he proceeded to cut
away the rattles with as much tenderness as could
have been shown by the most considerate operator,
divesting a fellow-creature, still living, of his limbs.
A proceeding like this, so amusing as it would seem
to us, is readily accounted for, when we consider the
prevailing sentiment among the Indians in reference to
the rattlesnake. With them he is held the gentleman,
the noblemanthe very prince of snakes. His
attributes
are devoutly esteemed among them, and many of
their own habits derive their existence from models
furnished by his peculiarities. He is brave, will never
fly from an enemy, and for this they honour him. If
approached, he holds his ground and is never
unwilling
for the combat.He does not begin the affray,
and is content to defend himself against invasion. He
will not strike without due warning of his intention,
and when he strikes, the blow of his weapon is fatal.
It is highly probable, indeed, that even the war-whoop
with which the Indians preface their own onset, has
been borrowed from the rattling warning of this fatal,
but honourable enemy.
[18]
[18]
This respect of the Indians for the rattlesnake, leading most
usually to much forbearance when they encountered him, neces
sarily resulted in the greater longevity of this snake than of any
other. In some cases, they have been found so overgrown from
this indulgence, as to be capable of swallowing entire a good-sized
fawn. An instance of this description has been related by the
early settlers of South Carolina, and, well authenticated, is to be
found on record. The movements of the rattlesnake are usually
very slow, and the circumstance of his taking prey so agile as the
fawn, would be something in favour of an extensive fascinating
faculty. That he takes birds with some such influence there is no
sort of question.
Many minutes had not elapsed before the operation
was completed, and the Indian became the possessor
of the desired trophy. The snake had thirteen rattles,
and a button, or bastard rattle; it was therefore
fourteen
years oldas it acquires the button during its
first year, and each succeeding year yields it a new
rattle
.
As he drew the body of the serpent from that of
Bess Matthews, her eyes unclosed, though but for an
instant. The first object in her gaze was the swollen
and distorted reptile, which the Indian was just then
removing from her person. Her terror was aroused
anew, and with a single shriek she again closed her
eyes in utter unconsciousness. At that moment,
Harrison
darted down the path. That single shriek had
given wings to his movement, and rushing forward and
beholding her clasped in the arms of Occonestoga,
who, at her cry, had come to her support, and had
raised her partially from the groundhe sprang fiercely
upon him, tore her from his hold, and sustaining her
with one hand, wielded his hatchet fiercely in the
other above his own head, while directing its edge
down upon that of the Indian. Occonestoga looked
up indifferently, almost scornfully, and without
exhibiting
any desire or making any show for his own defence
or protection. This exhibition of recklessness
arrested
the blow of Harrison, who now addressed him
in tones of anxious inquiry:
Speak, what is thisspeak, Occonestoga, or I
strike.
Strike, Harrison!the hatchet is good for
Occonestoga
.
He has a death-song that is good. He can
die like a man.
What hast thou done with the maidentell me,
Occonestoga, ere I hew thee down like a dog.
Occonestoga is a dog. Sanutee, the father of
Occonestoga
,
says he is the dog of the English. There
is no fork in the tongue of Sanutee. The war-rattle
put his eye on the girl of the pale-face, and she cried.
Look, Harrison, it is the arrow of Occonestoga, and
as he spoke he pointed to the shaft which still stuck
in the neck of the serpent. Harrison, who before
had not seen the snake, which the Indian had thrown
aside under a neighbouring bush, now shivered as
with a convulsion, while, almost afraid to speak, and
his face paling like death as he did so, he cried to
him in horror:
God of Heavenspeak, Occonestogaspeakis
she struckis she struck? and before he could hear
the reply, his tremours were so great that he was
compelled
to lay the still insensible form of the maiden,
unequal then to her support, upon the grass beside
him.
The Indian smiled with something of a scornful
satisfaction
as he replied
It was the swift arrow of Occonestogaand the
war-rattle had no bite for the girl of the pale-faces.
The blood is good in her heart.
Thank Godthank God! Young chief of the
Yemassees, I thank theeI thank thee, Occonestoga
thou shalt have a rich gifta noble reward for this;
and seizing the hand of the savage wildly, he pressed
it with a tenacious gripe that well attested the
sincerity
of his feelings. But the gloom of the savage was
too deeply driven into his spirit by his recent
treatment
and fugitive privations, to experience much
pleasure
either from the proffered friendship or the
promised
reward of the English. He had some feeling of
nationality left, which a return to sobriety always
made active.
Occonestoga is a dog, said he, death for
Occonestoga
!
For a moment, Harrison searched him narrowly
with his eye, but as he saw in his look nothing but the
one expression with which an Indian in the moment
of excitement conceals all others, of sullen
indifference
to all things around him, he forbore further
remark
,
and simply demanded assistance in the recovery
of the maiden. Water was brought, and after a few
moments her lover had the satisfaction of noting her
returning consciousness. The colour came back to
her cheeks, her eyes opened upon the light, her lips
murmured in prayer,a prayer for protection, as if
she still felt the dangers from which she had escaped
so happily. But the glance of her lover reassured
her.
Oh, Gabriel, such a dreamsuch a horrible dream,
and she shuddered and looked anxiously around her.
Ay, dearest, such as I never desire that you shall
have again. But fear not. You are now safe and
entirely unhurt. Thanks to our brave friend
Occonestoga
here, whose arrow has been your safety.
Thanks, thanks to thee, chiefI know thee, I shall
remember, and she looked gratefully to the Indian,
whose head simply nodded a recognition of her
acknowledgment.
But where, Gabriel, is the monster? Oh! how
its eye dazzled and insnared me. I felt as if my
feet were tied, and my knees had lost all their
strength.
There he lies, Bess, and a horrible monster indeed.
See there, his rattles, thirteen and a buttonan old
snake whose blow had certainly been death upon the
instant.
The maiden shuddered as she looked upon the reptile
to whose venom she had so nearly fallen a victim.
It was now swollen to a prodigious size from the
natural effects of its own poison. In places about
its body, which the fatal secretion had most easily
effected, it had bulged out into putrid lumps, almost to
bursting; while, from one end to the other of its
attenuated
length, the linked diamonds which form the
ornament of its back, had, from the original dusky
brown and sometimes bronze of their colour, now
assumed a complexion of spotted greenlivid and
diseased
.
Its eyes, however, had not yet lost all of that
original and awful brightness, which, when looking
forth in anger, nothing can surpass for terrific beauty
of expression. The powers of this glance none
may well express, and few imagine; and when we
take into consideration the feeling of terror with which
the timid mind is apt to contemplate an object known
to be so fatal, it will not be difficult to account for its
possession of the charm, commonly ascribed to this
reptile
in the interior of the southern country, by which,
it is the vulgar faith, he can compel the bird from the
highest tree to leave his perch, shrieking with fear and
full of the most dreadful consciousness, struggling with
all the power of its wings, and, at last, after every effort
has proved fruitless, under the influence of that
unswerving
glance, to descend even into the jaws which
lie waiting to receive it. Providence in this way has
seemingly found it necessary to clothe even with a
moral power the evanescent and merely animal nature
of its creation; and, with a due wisdom, for, as the
rattlesnake is singularly slow in its general movements,
it might suffer frequently from want of food unless some
such power had been assigned it. The study of all
nature with a little more exactitude, would perhaps
discover to us an enlarged instinct in every other form
of life, which a narrow analysis might almost set
down as the fullest evidence of an intellectual
existence
.
The interview between Harrison and Bess Matthews
had been especially arranged with reference to a
discussion of various matters, important to both, and
affecting the relations which existed between them.
But it was impossible in the prostrate and nervous
condition in which he found her, that much could be
thought or said of other matters than those which had
been of the last few moments occurrence. Still they
lingered, and still they strove to converse on their
affairs; despite the presence of Occonestoga, who sat
patiently at the foot of a tree without show of
discontent
or sign of hunger, though for a term of at least
eighteen hours he had eaten nothing. In this lies one
of the chief merits of an Indian warrior
Severe the school that made him bear
The ills of life without a tear
And stern the doctrine that denied
The chieftain, fame, the warrior pride;
Who, urged by nature's wants, express'd
The need that hunger'd in his breast
Or, when beneath his foeman's knife,
Who utter'd recreant prayer for life
Or, in the chase, whose strength was spent,
Or in the fight whose knee was bent,
Or, when with tale of coming fight
Who sought his allies' lodge by night,
And ere his missives well were told,
Complained of hunger, wet, and cold.
A woman, if in fight his foe,
Could give, yet not receive a blow
Or, if undext'rously and dull,
His hand and knife had failed to win
The dripping, warm scalp from the scull,
To trim his yellow mocquasin.
Thus, a perfect imbodiment of the character, so
wrought and so described, Occonestoga, calm, sullen,
and stern, sat beneath the tree, without look or word
significant of that fatigue and hunger under which he
must have been seriously suffering. He surveyed with
something like scorn those evidences between the
lovers of that nice and delicate affection which belongs
only to the highest grades of civilization. At length,
bidding him wait his return, Harrison took the way
with Bess, who was now sufficiently restored for that
purpose, to the cottage of the pastor. It was not long
before he returned to the savage, whose hand he again
shook cordially and affectionately, while repeating his
grateful promise of reward. Then turning to a subject
at that time strongly present in his mind, he inquired
into the recent demonstrations of his people.
Occonestoga, what news is this of the Yemassee?
He is angry, is he not?
Angry to kill, Harrison. Is not the scout on the
path of OcconestogaOcconestoga the son of Sanutee?
look! the tomahawk of Sanutee shook in the eyes
of Occonestoga.The swift foot, the close bush, the
thick swamp and the waterthey were the friends
of Occonestoga. Occonestoga is a dog.The scouts
of Yemassee look for him in the swamps.
You must be hungry and weary, Occonestoga.
Come with me to the Block House, where there are
meat and drink.
Harrison is friend to Occonestoga.
Surely I am, was the reply.
The good friend will kill Occonestoga? was the
demand, uttered in tones of more solicitude than is
common to the Indian.
No; kill yousurely notwhy should I kill
you?
It is good! knife Occonestoga, Englishman; put
the sharp tooth here, in his heart, for the father of
Occonestoga has a curse for his name was the
solemn imploration.
No, Occonestogano.I will do no such thing.
Thou shalt live and do well, and be at friendship with
thy father and thy people. Come with me to the
Block House and get something to eat. We will there
talk over this affair of thy people. Come; and with
an air of indifference, the melancholy savage followed
his conductor to the Block House, where the trader and
his wife received them.
CHAPTER XXII.
And wherefore sings he that strange song of death,
That song of sorrow? Is the doom at hand?
Stand close and hear him.
The
wife of Granger soon provided refreshments
for the young savage, of which he ate sparingly,
though without much seeming consciousness of what
he was doing. Harrison did not trouble him much
with remark or inquiry, but busied himself in looking
after some of the preparations for defence of the
building; and for this purpose, Hector and himself
occupied an hour in the apartment adjoining that in
which the household concerns of Granger were carried
on. In this apartment Hector kept Dugdale, a famous
blood-hound, supposed to have been brought from the
Caribbees, which, when very young, Harrison had
bought from a Spanish trader. This dog is a peculiar
breed, and resembled in some leading respects the
Irish wolf-hound, while, having all the thirst and
appetite
for blood which distinguished the more ancient
Slute
or Sleuth-hound of the Scots. It is a mistake to
suppose that the Spaniards brought these dogs to
America. They found them here, actually in use by
the Indians and for like purposes, and only perfected
their training, while stimulating them in the pursuit of
man. The dog Dugdale had been partially trained
after their fashion to hunt the Indians, and even under
his present owner, it was not deemed unbecoming
that he should be prepared for the purposes of war upon
the savages, by the occasional exhibition of a stuffed
figure, so made and painted as to resemble a naked
Indian, around whose neck a lump of raw and
bleeding
beef was occasionally suspended. This was shown
him while chained,from any near approach he was
withheld, until his appetite had been so wrought upon,
that longer restraint would have been dangerous and
impossible. The training of these dogs, as known to
the early French and Spanish settlers, by both of
whom they were in common use for the purpose of
war with the natives, is exceeding curious; and so
fierce under this form of training did they become in
process of time, that it was found necessary to restrain
them in cages while thus stimulated, until the call to
the field, and the prospect of immediate strife should
give an opportunity to the exercise of their unallayed
rapacity. In the civil commotions of Hayti, the most
formidable enemies known to the insurrectionists were
the fierce dogs which had been so educated by the
French. A curious work, found in the Charleston
Library, devoted to the history of that time and
province
,
is illustrated with several plates which show the
training common with the animal. The dog of Harrison
had not however been greatly exercised by his present
owner after this fashion. He had been simply required
to follow and attend upon his master, under the conduct
of Hector, for both of whom his attachments had been
singularly strong. But the early lessons of his Spanish
masters had not been forgotten by Dugdale, who, in the
war of the Carolinians with the Coosaws, following his
master into battle, proved an unlooked-for auxiliar of
the one, and an enemy whose very appearance struck
terror into the other. So useful an ally was not to be
neglected, and the stuffed figure which had formed a part
of the property of the animal in the sale by his Spanish
master, was brought into occasional exercise and use,
under the charge of Hector, in confirming Dugdale's
warlike propensities. In this exercise, with the figure
of a naked Indian perched against one corner, and a
part of a deer's entrails hanging around his neck,
Hector, holding back the dog by a stout rope drawn
around a beam, the better to embarrass him at pleasure,
was stimulating at the same time his hunger and
ferocity.
Does Dugdale play to-day, Hector? inquired his
master.
He hab fine sperits, mossaberry fine sperits. I
kin hardly keep 'em in. See da, now, and, as the
slave spoke, the dog broke away, dragging the rope
suddenly
through the hands of the holder, and, without
remarking
the meat, ran crouching to the feet of Harrison.
Him nebber forget you, mossa, ebber sense you
put you hand down he troat.
Harrison snapped his fingers, and motioning with his
hand to the bleeding bowels of the deer around the
neck of the figure, the hound sprung furiously upon it,
and dragging it to the floor, planted himself across
the body, while, with his formidable teeth, he tore away
the bait from the neck where it was wound, lacerating
the figure at every bite, in a manner which would have
soon deprived the living man of all show of life.
Having given some directions to the slave, Harrison
returned to the apartment where he had left the Indian.
Occonestoga sat in a corner mournfully croning
over, in an uncouth strain, something of a song, rude,
sanguinary, in his own wild language. Something of
the language was known to Harrison, but not enough
to comprehend the burden of what he sung. But the
look and the manner of the savage were so solemn and
imposing, so foreign, yet so full of dignified thought,
that the Englishman did not venture to interrupt him.
He turned to Granger, who, with his wife, was partially
employed in one corner of the apartment, folding up
some of his wares and burnishing others.
What does he sing, Granger? he asked of the
trader.
His death-song, sir.It is something very strange
but he has been at it now for some time; and the
Indian does not employ that song unless with a near
prospect of death. He has probably had some dream
or warning, and they are very apt to believe in such
things.
Indeedhis death-song murmured Harrison,
while he listened attentively to the low chant which
the Indian still kept up. At his request, forbearing his
labour, Granger listened also, and translated at
intervals
the purport of many of the stanzas.
What is the Seratee, in his uncouth lyric, sung
the melancholy Indian
What is the Seratee?
He is but a dog
Sneaking in the long grass
I have stood before him,
And he did not look
By his hair I took him,
By the single tuft
From his head I tore it,
With it came the scalp,
On my thigh I wore it
With the chiefs I stood,
And they gave me honour,
Made of me a chief.
To the sun they held me,
And aloud the prophet
Bade me be a chief
Chief of all the Yemassees
Feather chief and arrow chief
Chief of all the Yemassees.
At the conclusion of this uncouth verse, he
proceeded
in a different tone and manner, and his present
form of speech constituted a break or pause in the
song.
That Opitchi-Manneytowherefore is he wroth
with the young chief who went on the war-path against
the Seratee. He made slaves for him from the dogs of
the long grass. Let Opitchi-Manneyto hear.
Occonestoga
is a brave chief,he hath struck his hatchet
into the lodge of the Savannah, when there was a full
sun in the forests.
Now, said Granger, he is going to tell us of
another of his achievements. Occonestoga went
on
Hear, Opitchi-Manneyto,
Hear Occonestoga speak
Who of the Savannah stood
In the council, in the fight
With the gallant Suwannee?
Bravest he, of all the brave,
Like an arrow path in fight
When he came, his tomahawk
(Hear, Opitchi-Manneyto,
Not a forked tongue is mine)
Frighted the brave Yemassee
Till Occonestoga came
Till Occonestoga stood
Face to face with Suwannee,
By the old Satilla swamp.
Then his eyes were in the mud
With these hands, I tore away
The war ringlet from his head
With it came the bleeding scalp
Suwannee is in the mud;
Frighted back, his warriors run,
Left him buried in the mud
Ho! the gray-wolf speaks aloud,
Hear Opitchi-Manneyto;
He had plenty food that night,
And for me he speaks aloud
Suwannee is in his jaw
Look Opitchi-Manneyto
See him tear Suwannee's side,
See him drink Suwannee's blood
With his paw upon his breast,
Look, he pulls the heart away,
And his nose is searching deep,
Clammy, thick with bloody drink,
In the hollow where it lay.
Look, Opitchi-Manneyto,
Look, the gray-wolf speaks for me.
Then after this wild and barbarous chant which,
verse after verse, Granger rendered to Harrison, a
pause of a few moments was suffered to succeed, in
which, all the while in the profoundest silence, the
young warrior continued to wave his head backward
and forward at regular intervals.
He has had a warning certainly, captain,I have
seen them frequently go on so. Stophe begins!
Not singing, but again addressing the evil deity,
Occonestoga began with the usual adjuration.
Arrows and feathers, burnt arrows and feathers
a bright flame for thee, Opitchi-Manneyto. Look not
dark upon the young brave of Yemassee: Hear his
song of the war-path and the victoryand again he
chanted something which seemed to be more national,
in a more sounding and elevated strain, and which, in
the translation of Granger, necessarily lost much of its
native sublimity.
Mighty is the Yemassee,
Strong in the trial,
Fearless in the strife,
Terrible in wrath
Look, Opitchi-Manneyto
He is like the rush of clouds,
He is like the storm by night,
When the tree-top bends and shivers,
When the lodge goes down.
The Westo and the Edisto,
What are they to him?
Like the brown leaves to the cold,
Look, they shrink before his touch,
Shrink and shiver as he comes
Mighty is the Yemassee.
Harrison now ventured to interrupt the enthusiastic
but still sullen warrior. He interrupted him with a
compliment, confirming that which he had himself been
uttering to the prowess of his nation.
That is a true song, Occonestogathat in praise
of your nation. They are indeed a brave people;
but I fear under wild management now. But come
here is some drink, it will strengthen you.
It is good, said he, drinkingit is goodgood
for strength. The English is a friend to Occonestoga.
We have always tried to be so, Occonestoga, as
you should know by this time. But speak to me of
Pocota-ligo. What have the people been doing there?
What maddens them, and wherefore should they grow
angry with their English brothers?
The Yemassee is like the wolfshe smells blood
on the track of the hunter, when the young cub is
carried
away. He is blind, like the rattlesnake, with the
poison of the long sleep, when he first comes out in the
time of the green corn. He wants blood to drink
he would strike the enemy.
I see. The Yemassees are impatient of peace.
They would go upon the war-path, and strike the
English
as their enemies. Is this what you think,
Occonestoga
?
Harrison speaks! The English is a friend to
Yemassee, but Yemassee will not hear the word of
Occonestoga. Sanutee says the tongue of
Occonestoga
has a forkhe speaks in two voices.
They are mad, young bravebut not so mad, I
think, as to go on the war-path without an object. At
this moment they could not hope to be successful, and
would find it destructive.
The thought of Occonestoga is here. They will
go on the war-path against the English.
Ha!If you think so, Occonestoga, you must be
our friend.
Cha! Cha! Occonestoga is too much friend to
the English.
Not too much, not too muchnot more than they
will well reward you for.
Will the strong water of the English make
Occonestoga
to be the son of Sanutee? Will the meat
carry Occonestoga to the young braves of the
Yemassee
?
Will they sleep till he speaks for them to wake?
Look, Harrison, the death-song is made for
Occonestoga
.
Not sothere is no cause yet for you to sing the
death-song of the young warrior.
Occonestoga has said!he has seenit came
to him when he ate meat from the hands of the trader.
Ah! that is all owing to your fatigue and hunger,
Occonestoga. You have long years of life before you,
and still have some services to perform for your friends
the English. You must find out for us certainly
whether your people mean to go on the war-path or
notwhere they will strike first, and when; and above
all, whether any other tribes join with them. You
must go for us back to Pocota-ligo. You must watch
the steps of the chiefs, and bring word of what they
intend.
An overpowering sense of his own shame as he
listened to this requisition of Harrison, forced his head
down his bosom, while the gloom grew darker upon
his face. At length he exclaimed
It is no good talk: Occonestoga is a dog. The
tomahawk of Sanutee is good for a dog.
Wherefore this, young chief of the Yemassee?
What mean you by this speech?
Young chief of Yemassee! exclaimed the
savage
,
repeating the phrase of Harrison as if in derision
said you not the young chief of Yemassee should
hunt his people like a dog in the cover of the bush?
Not like a dog, Occonestoga, but like a good friend,
as well to the English as to the Yemassee. Is not
peace good for both? It is peace, not war, that the
English desire; but if there be war, Occonestoga, they
will take all the scalps of your nation.
The English must look to his own scalp, cried
the young man, fiercely,the hand of Yemassee is
ready; and as he spoke, for a moment his eye
lightened up, and his form rose erect from the place
where he had been sitting, while a strong feeling of
nationality in his bosom aroused him into something
like the warlike show of an eloquent chief inspiriting
his tribe for the fight. But Granger, who had been
watchful, came forward with a cup of spirits, which,
without a word, he now handed him. The youth seized
it hurriedly, drank it off at a single effort, and, in that
act, the momentary enthusiasm which had lightened
up, with a show of still surviving consciousness and
soul, the otherwise desponding and degraded features,
passed away; and sinking again into his seat, he
replied
to the other portion of the remark of Harrison.
It is well, what the English speaks. Peace is
goodpeace for the Yemasseepeace for the
English
peacepeace
for OcconestogaOcconestoga
speaks for peace.
Then let Occonestoga do as I wish him. Let him
go this very night to Pocota-ligo. Let his eye take the
track of the chiefs, and look at their actions. Let him
come back to-morrow, and say all that he has seen,
and claim his reward from the English.
There is death for Occonestoga if the Yemassee
scout finds his track.
But the young chief has an eye like the hawka
foot like the sneaking panther, and a body limber as the
snake. He can see his enemy afarhe can hide in
the thick bushhe can lie still under the dead timber
when the hunter steps over it.
And rise to strike him in the heel like the
yellow-belly
moccasin. Yes! The young chief is a great
warriorthe Seratee is a dog, the Savannah is a dog
Look, his legs have the scalp of Suwannee and
Chareco. Occonestoga is a great warrior.
The vanity of the savage once enlisted, and his
scruples were soon overcome. An additional cup of
spirits which Granger again furnished him, concluded
the argument, and he now avowed himself ready for
the proposed adventure. His preparations were soon
completed, and when the night had fairly set in, the
fugitive was again within the boundary lines of his
nation; and cautiously thridding his way, with all the
skill and cunning of an Indian, among the paths of the
people whom he had so grievously incensed. He
knew the danger, but he was vain of his warrior and
hunter skill.He did not fear death, for it is the
habitual
practice of the Indian's thought to regard it as a
part of his existence; and his dying ceremonies,
otherwise
,
form no inconsiderable part of the legacy of
renown which is left to his children. But had he
known the doom which had been pronounced against
him, along with the other chiefs, and which had been
already executed upon them by the infuriated people,
he had never ventured for an instant upon so dangerous
a commission.
CHAPTER XXIII.
What love is like a mother's? You may break
The heart that holds ityou may trample it
In shame and sorrow; but you may not tear
One single link away that keeps it there.
Half
conscious only of his design at starting, the
young and profligate savage, on crossing to the
opposite
shore, which he did just at the Block House,
grew more sensible, not only in reference to the object
of his journey, but to the dangers which necessarily
came along with it. Utterly ignorant, as yet, of that
peculiar and unusual doom which had been pronounced
against himself and the other chiefs, and already
executed
upon them, he had yet sufficient reason to
apprehend
that, if taken, his punishment, death probably,
would be severe enough. Apprehending this
probability
,
the fear which it inspired was not however
sufficient to discourage him from an adventure which,
though pledged for its performance in a moment of
partial inebriation, was yet held by the unconventional
and simple Indian to be all-binding upon him. Firmly
resolved, therefore, upon the fulfilment of his promise
to Harrison, who, with Granger and others, had often
before employed him, though on less dangerous
missions
,
he went forward, preparing to watch the progress
of events among the Yemassees, and to report duly
the nature of their warlike proceedings.
The aim of Harrison was preparation, and the
purpose
was therefore of the highest importance upon
Vol. I.I 17
which Occonestoga had been sent. The generally
exposed situation of the whole frontier occupied by the
whites, with the delay and difficulty of warlike
preparation
,
rendered every precautionary measure essential on
the part of the Carolinians. For this reason, a due and
proper intelligence of the means, designs, and strength
of their adversaries, became more absolutely important;
particularly as the capricious nature of savage affections
makes it doubtful whether they can, for any length of
time, continue in peace and friendship. How far
Occonestoga
may stand excused for the part which he had
taken against his countrymen, whatever may have been
the character of their cause, is a question not
necessary
for our consideration here. It is certain that the
degradation consequent upon his intemperance had
greatly contributed towards blunting that feeling of
nationality, which is no small part of the honest boast
of every Indian warrior.
Night had fairly shrouded the forest when the young
chief commenced his journey. But he knew the path,
by night as by day, with a familiarity begun in
childhood
.
His ear, quick, keen, and discriminating by his
education, could distinguish between and identify the
movement of every native of the woodland cover. He
knew the slight and hurried rustle of the black snake,
from the slow, dignified sweep of the rattle; and, drunk
or sober, the bear in the thicket, or the buck bounding
along the dry pine-land ridge, were never mistaken,
one for the other, by our forest warrior. These, as
they severally crossed or lay in his pathfor the
rattlesnake
moves at his own pleasurehe drove aside or
avoided; and when contradictory sounds met his ear,
doubtful in character or significant of some dangerous
proximity, then would the warrior sink down into the
bush or under the cover of the fallen tree, or steal away
into the sheltering shadow of the neighbouring copse,
without so much as a breath or whisper. Such
precautions
as these became more and more necessary as
he drew nigher to the homestead of his people. The
traces of their presence thickened momently around
him. Now the torch flared across his eye, and now
the hum of voices came with the sudden gust; and, more
than once, moving swiftly across his path, wound a
dusky figure like his own, bent upon some secret quest,
and watchful like himself to avoid discovery. He too,
perhaps, had been dimly seen in the same manner
not his features, for none in that depth of shadow in
which he crept could well have made them out;but
such partial glances, though he strove to avoid all
observation, he did not so much heed, as he well knew
that the thought of others seeing him, without
ascertaining
who he was, would be apt to assign him a like
pursuit with that which he assigned to those he saw
the nocturnal amour,pursued by the Yemassees with a
fastidious regard to secrecy, not because of any moral
reserve, but that such a pursuit savours of a weakness
unbecoming to manhood.
On a sudden he drew back from the way he was
pursuing, and sunk under the cover of a gigantic oak.
A torch flamed across the path, and a dusky maiden
carried it, followed by a young warrior. They passed
directly beside the tree behind which Occonestoga had
sought for shelter, and, at the first glance, he knew
Hiwassee, the young maiden who was to have filled
his own lodge, according to the expectations of the
people. But he had lost sight of and forgotten her in
the practices which had weaned him from his brethren
and bound him to the whites. Yet he had regarded
her with favour, and though he had never formally
proposed to break with her the sacred wand of
Checkamoysee
,
[19]
[19]
Checkamoysee, the Yemassee Hymen.
which was to give her the title to his dwelling
and make her his wife, yet, the public expectation had
found sufficient warrant in his own feelings upon the
subject. He now listened with something of
disappointment
,
but more of self-reproach, to the proposition
as it was made to her by another.
It is a brave chief, Hiwasseea brave chief that
would have you enter his lodge. The lodge of Echotee
12
is ready for Hiwassee. Look! this is the stick of
Checkamoysee,break ittake it in thy hands and
break it, Hiwassee, and Echotee will quench the torch
which thou bearest in the running water. Then shalt
thou be the wife of a warrior, and the venison shall
always be full in thy lodge. Break the stick of
Checkamoysee
,
Hiwassee, and be the wife of Echotee.
And the dusky maiden needed little wooing. She
broke the stick, and as she did so, seizing the blazing
torch with a ready hand, Echotee hurried with it to a
brook that trickled along at a little distance, and in the
next instant it hissed in the water, and all was
darkness
.
Without regarding what he was doing, or
thinking
of his own risk, Occonestoga, in the absence
of her accepted lover, could not forbear a word,
something
of reproach, perhaps, in the ear of Hiwassee.
She stood but a few paces off, under the shadow and
on the opposite side of the same tree which gave him
shelter; with the broken stick still in her hand in
attestation of her wild forest nuptial. What he said
was unheard save by herself, but she screamed as she
heard it; and, hearing her lover approach, and now duly
conscious of his error, Occonestoga in the next moment
had darted away from the place of their tryst, and was
pursuing his path with all the vigour of a renewed and
resolute spirit. At length he approached the town of
Pocota-ligo, but, at first, carefully avoiding its main
entrance, which was upon the river, particularly as the
throng of sounds reaching his ears from that quarter
indicated a still active stir, he shot off circuitously into
the thicker woods, so as to come into the immediate
neighbourhood of his father's dwelling. From a
neighbouring
thicket, after a little while, he looked down
upon the cabin which had given a birth-place and shelter
to his infancy; and the feeling of shame grew strong
in his bosom as he thought upon the hopes defeated of
his high-souled father, and of the affections thrown away
of the gentle mother, with whom, however mortified
and fruitless, they still continued to flourish for the
outcast. Such thoughts however were not permitted
to trouble him long; for, as he looked he beheld by the
ruddy blaze of the pine torch which the boy carried
before him, the person of his father emerge from the
lodge, and take the well-known pathway leading to
Pocota-ligo. If Occonestoga had no other virtue, that
of love for his mother was, to a certain extent,
sufficiently
redeeming. His previous thoughts, his natural
feeling, prepared him, whatever the risk, to take
advantage
of the opportunity thus offered him. In another
instant, and the half penitent prodigal stood in the
presence of Matiwan.
Oh, boyOcconestogathou art comethou art
come. Thou art not yet lost to Matiwan. And she
threw herself, with the exclamation, fondly, though but
for a moment, upon his neck; the next, recovering
herself
,
she spoke in hurried tones, full of grief and
apprehension
.
Thou shouldst not comefly, boyfly,
Occonestogabe a swift bird, that the night has
overtaken
far away from his bush. There is danger
there is deathnot deaththere is a curse for thee
from Opitchi-Manneyto.
Let not the grief stand in the eye of Matiwan.
Occonestoga fears not death. He has a song for the
Manneyto of the blessed valley, the great warriors
shall clap their hands and cry `Sangarrah-me,
Sangarrah-me
,
Yemassee,' when they hear. Let not the
grief stand in the eye of Matiwan.
It is for thee, for thee, boyfor thee, Occonestoga.
The sorrow of Matiwan is for thee. Thou hast been
in this bosom, Occonestoga, and thine eyes came, when
the green was on the young leaf and the yellow flower
was hanging over the lodge in the strength of the sun.
Know I not the song of Enoree-Mattee, when the
eyes of Occonestoga looked up? said he not, under the
green leaf, under the yellow flower, the brave comes
who shall have arrows with wings and a knife that has
eyes? Occonestoga is here.
Matiwan was glad. Sanutee lifted thee to the sun,
boy, and begged for thee his beams from the good
Manneyto. The gladness is gone, Occonestoga
gone from Sanutee, gone from Matiwan,gone with
thee. There is no green on the leafmy eyes look
upon the yellow flowers no longer. Occonestoga, it
is thou,thou hast taken all this light from the eye
of Matiwan. The gladness and the light are gone.
Matiwan tells no liethis dog is Occonestoga.
But the gentle parent, tender even in the utterance of
truth, fearing she had gone too far, hastily and almost
indignantly interrupted him in the melancholy
self-condemnation
he was uttering.
No, noOcconestoga is no dog. He is a brave
he is the son of Sanutee, the well-beloved of the
Yemassee
.
Occonestoga has shut his eyes and gone upon
the track of a foolish dream, but he will wake with the
sun,and Matiwan will see the green leaf and the
yellow flower still hanging over the lodge of Sanutee;
and as she spoke she threw her arms about him
affectionately
,
while the tears came to the relief of her
heart and flowed freely down her cheeks. The youth
gently but coldly disengaged her clasp, and proceeded
to seat himself upon the broad skin lying upon the floor
of the cabin; when, aroused by the movement, and
with a return of all her old apprehensions, she thrust
him from it with an air of anxiety, if not of horror, and
shutting her eyes upon the wondering and somewhat
indignant glance with which he now surveyed her,
she exclaimed passionately
Goflywherefore art thou herehere in the
lodge of Sanuteethou, the accursedthe and the
words stuck in her throat, and, unarticulated, came forth
chokingly.
Is Matiwan madhas the fever-pain gone into her
temples? he asked in astonishment.
No, no, nonot mad, Occonestoga. But thou art
cast out from the Yemassee. He does not know thee
the young warriors know thee notthe chiefs know
thee notManneyto denies thee. They have said
thou art a Yemassee no longer. They have cast thee
out.
The Yemassee is great, but he cannot deny
Occonestoga
.
Thou art mad, Matiwan. Look, woman, here
is the broad arrow of Yemassee upon the shoulder of
a chief.
It is goneit is gone from thee, Occonestoga.
They have sworn by Opitchi-Manneyto, that Malatchie,
the Clublifter, shall take it from thy shoulder.
The youth shrunk back, and his eyes started in
horror, while his limbs trembled with a sentiment of
fear not often felt by an Indian warrior. In another
instant, however, he recovered from the stupor if not
from the dread, which her intelligence occasioned.
Ha, Matiwan, thou hast no fork in thy tongue.
Thou speakest not to me with the voice of the
Coonee-latee
.
Opitchi-Manneyto!he hears the voice of Matiwan.
The Yemassee has doomed thee.
They dare notthey will not. I will go with them
upon the war-path against the Santee and the Seratee.
I will take up the hatchet against the English. I will
lead the young warriors to battle. They shall know
Occonestoga for a chief.
Thou canst not, boy. They do not trust thee
they have doomed thee with the chiefs who sold the
land to the English. Has not Malatchie cut with
the knife, and burnt away with fire from their shoulders
the sacred and broad arrow of Yemassee, so that we
know them no more?Their fathers and their sons know
them no morethe mothers that bore them know them
no morethe other nations know them no morethey
cannot enter the blessed valley of Manneyto, for
Manneyto
knows them not when he looks for the broad
arrow of Yemassee, and finds it not upon their
shoulders
.
Woman! thou liest!thou art hissing lies in my
ears, like a green snake, with thy forked tongue. The
Yemassee has not done this thing as thou say'st.
The voice of the woman sunk into a low and husky
murmur, and the always melancholy tones of their
language grew doubly so in her utterance, as she
replied in a stern rebuke, though her attitude and
manner
were entirely passionless:
When has Matiwan lied to Occonestoga?
Occonestoga
is a dog when he speaks of Matiwan as the
forked tongue.
He is a dog if thou hast not lied, Matiwan. Say
that thou hast liedthat thou hast said a foolish thing
to Occonestoga. Say, Matiwan, and the young arrow
will be in thy hand even as the long shoots of the tree
that weeps. Thou shalt be to him as thou wilt.
With an expression the most humbled and imploring,
and something more of warmth than is usually shown
by the Indian warrior, the young chief took the hand
of his mother, while uttering an appeal, virtually
apologizing
for the harsh language he had previously made
use of. With the pause of an instant, and a passionate
melancholy, almost amounting to the vehemence of
despair, she replied:
Matiwan does not lie. The Yemassee has said
the doom, which Enoree-Mattee, the prophet, brought
from Opitchi-Manneyto. Has not Malatchie cut from
the shoulders of the chiefs and burnt away with fire
the broad arrow, and never more may they be known
by the Yemasseenever more by the Manneyto! The
doom is for thee, Occonestoga. It is true. There is
no fork in the tongue of Matiwan. Fly, boyfly,
Occonestoga
.
It is thy mother, it is Matiwan that prays
thee to fly. Matiwan would not lose thee, Occonestoga,
from the happy valley. Be the swift arrow on the path
of flightlet them not see theelet them not give thee
to Malatchie.
Thus, passionately imploring him, the mother urged
upon him the necessity of flight. But, for a few
minutes, as if stunned by the intelligence which he
could not now disbelieve, the young warrior stood in
silence, with down-bending head, the very
personification
of despair. Then, quickly and fully recovering,
with a kindling eye, and a manner well corresponding
with his language, he started forward erectly, in his
fullest height, and with the action of a strong mood,
for a moment assumed the attitude of that true dignity
from which in his latter days and habits he had but too
much and too often departed.
Ha! Is Occonestoga an arrow that is broken?
Is he the old tree across the swamp that the dog's foot
runs over? Has he no strengthhas the blood gone
out of his heart? Has he no knifewhere are the arrow
and the tomahawk? They are hereI have them.
The Yemassee shall not hold me down when I sleep.
Occonestoga sleeps not. He will do battle against the
Yemassee. His knife shall strike at the breast of
Sanutee.
Thou hast said a folly, boyOcconestoga, wouldst
thou strike at thy father? said the mother, sternly.
His hatchet shook over the head of Occonestoga
in the lodge of council. He is the enemy of
Occonestoga
a
bad thorn in the path, ready for the foot that
flies. I will slay him like a dog. He shall hear the
scalp-song of OcconestogaI will sing it in his ears,
woman, like a bird that comes with the storm, while I
send the long knife into his heart; and fiercely, as he
concluded this speech, he chanted a passage of the
famous scalp-song of the Yemassee
I go with the long knife,
On the path of my enemy
In the cover of the brake,
With the tooth of the war-rattle,
I strike the death into his heel
Sangarrah-me, Sangarrah-me.
I hear him groan, I see him gasp,
I tear his throat, I drink his blood,
He sings the song of his dying,
To the glory of Occonestoga.
Ha! thou hearest, Matiwanthis will I sing for
Sanutee when my knee is upon his breast, when my
knife is thick in his heart, when I tear the thin scalp
from his forehead.
Thus, in a deep, fiercely impressive, but low tone,
Occonestoga poured forth in his mother's ears the
fulness of his paroxysm,in his madness attributing,
and with correctness, the doom which had been
pronounced
against him as coming from his father. In
that fierce and bitter moment he forgot all the ties of
consanguinity, and his look was that of the furious and
I 3
fearful savage, already imbruing his hands in parental
blood, which, in his scalp-song, we have heard him
describe. The horror of Matiwan, beyond expression,
could not, however, be kept from utterance:
Thou hast drunk madness, boy, from the cup of
Opitchi-Manneyto. The devil of the white man's
prophet has gone into thy heart. But thou art the
child of Matiwan, and, though thou art in a foolish path,
it is thy mother that would save thee. Gofly,
Occonestoga
keep
on thy shoulder the broad arrow of
Yemassee, so that thy mother may not lose thee from
the blessed valley of Manneyto.
Before the young warrior, somewhat softened by
this speech, could find words to reply to it, his acute
senseacute enough at all times to savour of a
supernatural
facultydetected an approaching sound; and,
through an opening of the logs in the dwelling, the flare
of a torch was seen approaching. Matiwan, much
more apprehensive, with her anxieties now turned in
a new direction, went quickly to the entrance, and
returning instantly, with great alarm, announced the
approach of Sanutee.
He comes to the hatchet of Occonestoga, cried
the youth fiercely, his recent rage re-awakening.
Wouldst thou slay Matiwan? was the reply,and
the look, the tone, the words, were sufficient. The
fierce spirit was quelled, and the youth suffered himself
to follow quietly as she directed. She led him to a
remote corner of the lodge, which, piled up with skins,
furnished a fair chance and promise of security. With
several of these, as he stretched himself at his length,
she contrived to cover him in such a manner as
effectually
to conceal him from the casual observer. Having
so done, she strove to resume her composure in time
for the reception of the old chief, whose torch now
blazed at the entrance.
CHAPTER XXIV.
They bind him, will they slay him? That old man,
His father, will he look upon and see
The danger of his child, nor lift his voice,
Nor lend his arm to save him?
With
a mind deeply taken up with the concerns of
state, Sanutee threw himself upon the bearskin which
formed a sort of carpet in the middle of the lodge, and
failed utterly to remark the discomposure of Matiwan,
which, otherwise, to the keen glance of the Indian,
would not have remained very long concealed. She
took her seat at his head, and croned low and musingly
some familiar chant of forest song, unobtrusively, yet
meant to sooth his ear. He heardfor this had long
been a practice with her and a domestic indulgence
with himhe heard, but did not seem to listen. His
mind was awaybusied in the events of the wild
storm it had invoked, and the period of which was
rapidly approaching. But there were other matters
less important, that called for present attention; and
turning at length to his wife, and pointing at the same
time to the pile of skins that lay confusedly huddled
up over the crouching form of Occonestoga, he gently
remarked upon their loose and disordered appearance.
The well-bred housewife of a city might have
discovered
something of rebuke to her domestic management
in what he said on this subject; but the mind of
Matiwan lost all sight of the reproach, in the
apprehensions
which such a reference had excited. He
saw not her disorder, however, but proceeded to
enumerate
to himself their numbers, sorts, and qualities,
with a simple air of business; until, suddenly
labouring
,
as it appeared, under some deficiency of memory,
he instructed her to go and ascertain the number of
bearskins in the collection.
The Spanish trader will buy from Sanutee with
the next sun. Go, Matiwan.
To hear was to obey; and half dead with fear, yet
rejoiced that he had not gone himself, she proceeded
to tumble about the skins, with ready compliance, and
an air of industry, the most praiseworthy in an Indian
woman. Her labour was lengthened, so Sanutee
seemed to think, somewhat beyond the time necessary
to enumerate a lot of skins not exceeding fifteen or
twenty in number, and with some little sternness at
last he demanded of her the cause of the delay.
Apprehensive that he would yet rise, and seek for
himself a solution of the difficulty, she determined,
as she had not yet ascertained, to guess at the fact,
and immediately replied in a representation which did
not at all accord with the calculation of the chief's
own memory on the subject. The impatience of
Occonestoga, in the meantime, was not less than that
of Sanutee. He worried his mother not a little in his
restlessness while she moved about him; and once as
she bent over him, removing this, and replacing that, he
seized upon her hand, and would have spoken, but that
so dangerous an experiment she would not permit. But
she saw by his glance, and the settled firmness with
which he grasped his hatchet, that his thought was
that of defiance to his father and a desire to throw
aside his restraining cover and assert his manhood.
She drew away from him rapidly, with a finger
uplifted as if in entreaty, while with one hand she
threw over him a huge bearskin, which nearly
suffocated
him, and which he immediately, in part, threw
aside. Sanutee in the meantime seemed very
imperfectly
satisfied with the representation which she
had made, and manifesting some doubt as to the
correctness
of her estimate, he was about to rise and look
for himself into the matter. But, in some trepidation,
the wary Matiwan prevented him.
Wherefore should the chief toil at the task of a
woman? Battle for the chiefwisdom in council
for the chief; and the seat under the big tree, at the
head of the lodge, when the great chiefs come to eat
meat from his hands. Sit, well-belovedwherefore
should not Matiwan look for thee? The toil of the
lodge is for Matiwan.
Sanutee will look, Matiwanthe bearskin is
heavy on thy hands, was the considerate reply.
Go not, look not impatiently, rather too
impatiently
earnest, was the response of the woman;
sufficiently
so to awaken surprise, if not suspicion, in the
mind of the old chief. She saw her error in the next
instant, and, proceeding to correct it, without at the
same time yielding up the point, she said:
Thou art weary, chiefall day long thou hast
been upon the track of toil, and thy feet need rest.
Rest thee.Matiwan is herewhy shouldst thou not
repose? Will she not look to the skins? She goes.
Thou art good, Matiwan, but Sanutee will look
with the eye that is true. He is not weary as thou
say'st. Cha! he exclaimed, as she still endeavoured
to prevent himCha!Cha! impatiently putting
her aside with the exclamation, and turning to the very
spot of Occonestoga's concealment. Hopeless of
escape, Matiwan clasped her hands together, and the
beatings of her heart grew more frequent and painful.
Already his hands were upon the skins,already had
Occonestoga determined upon throwing aside his
covering
and grappling with his fate like a warrior, when
a sudden yell of many voices, and the exciting
bloodcry
of Yemassee battle, Sangarrah-me,
Sangarrah-me
,rung
through the little apartment. Lights flared
all around the lodge, and a confused, wild, and
approaching
clamour, as of many voices, from without,
drew the attention of all within, and diverted Sanutee
from a further search at that time, which must have
resulted in a
denouement
severely trying if not
dangerous
to all parties.
Sangarrah-mehe is herethe slave of
Opitchi-Manneyto
is here.
And a general howl, with a direct appeal to Sanutee,
brought the old chief to the door of the lodge. Before
18
he could propose an inquiry into their business and
desire, they poured that information upon him which
shook and startled him. The indiscretion of
Occonestoga
when speaking in the ear of the Indian maiden
Hiwassee, had brought about its legitimate
consequences
.
In her surprise, and accounting for the shriek
she gave, she had revealed the circumstance to her
lover, and it was not long before he had again related
it to another. The story flew, the crowd increased,
and, gathering excitement from numbers, they rushed
forward to the lodge of Matiwan, where, from his known
love to his mother, they thought it probable he would be
found, to claim the doomed slave of Opitchi-Manneyto.
The old chief heard them with a stern and motionless
calm of countenance; then, without an instant of
reflection
,
throwing open the door of the lodge, he bade
them enter upon the search for their victim.
The clamour and its occasion, in the meantime, had
been made sufficiently and fearfully intelligible to those
within. Matiwan sunk down hopelessly and sad in
a corner of the apartment, while Occonestoga, with
a rapid recovery of all his energies, throwing aside
his covering of skins, and rising from his place of
concealment, stood once again an upright and fearless
Indian warrior. He freed the knife from its sheath,
tightened the belt about his waist, grasped the
tomahawk
in his right hand, and placing himself
conspicuously
in the centre of the apartment, prepared manfully
for the worst.
Such was his position, when, leading the way for the
pursuers of the fugitive, Sanutee re-entered the cabin.
A moment's glance sufficed to show him the truth of
the statement made him, and at the same time
accounted
for the uneasiness of Matiwan, and her desire
to prevent his examination of the skins. He darted a
severe look upon her where she lay in the corner, and
as the glance met her own, she crept silently towards
him and would have clasped his knees; but the ire of
Sanutee was too deeply awakened, and regarding his
profligate son, not merely in that character, but as the
chief enemy and betrayer of his country to the
English
,
he threw her aside, then approached and stretched
forth his arm as if to secure him. But Occonestoga
stood on the defensive, and with a skill and power,
which, at one time, had procured for him a high
reputation for warrior-like conduct, in a field where
the competitors were numerous, he hurled backward
the old chief upon the crowd that followed him. Doubly
incensed with the resistance thus offered, Sanutee
re-advanced
with a degree of anger which excluded the
cautious consideration of the true warrior,and as the
approach was narrow, he re-advanced unsupported.
The recollection of the terrible doom impending over
his headthe knowledge of Sanutee's own share in
its decreethe stern denunciations of his father in his
own ears,the fierce feeling of degraded pride
consequent
upon his recent and present mode of life, and
the desperate mood induced by his complete isolation
from all the sympathies of his people, evinced by their
vindictive pursuit of him,all conspired to make him
the wreckless wretch who would rather seek than shrink
from the contemplated parricide. His determination
was thick in the glance of his eye; and while he threw
back the tomahawk, so that the sharp pick on the
opposite end rested upon his right shoulder, and its
edge lay alongside his cheek, he muttered between
his firmly set teeth, fragments of the fearful scalp-song
which he had sung in his mother's ear before.
Sangarrah-meSangarrah-me,
I hear him groan, I see him gasp,
I tear his throat, I drink his blood
Sangarrah-meSangarrah-me.
This did not discourage the old chief, though the
son, with a desperate strength, while singing the fierce
anthem, grappled his father by his throat, and cried
aloud to him, as he shook the hatchet in his eyes
I hear thee groanI see thee gaspI tear thy
throatI drink thy blood; for I know thee as mine
enemy. Thou art not Sanuteethou art not the
father of Occonestogabut a black dog, sent on his
path to tear. Die, thou dogthou black dogdie
thus I slay theethus I slay thee, thou enemy of
Occonestoga
.
And handling the old man with a strength beyond
his power to contend with, he aimed the deadly stroke
directly at the eyes of his father. But the song and
the speech had aroused the yet conscious but suffering
Matiwan, and starting up from the ground where she
had been lying, almost between the feet of the
combatants
,
with uplifted hands she interposed, just as the
fell direction had been given to the weapon of her
son. The piercing shriek of that fondly cherishing
mother went to the very bones of the young warrior.
Her interposition had the effect of a spell upon him,
particularly
as, at the momentso timely for Sanutee
had been her interpositionhe who gave the blow
could with difficulty arrest the impulse with which it
had been given, and which must have made it a blow
fatal to her. The narrow escape which she had made,
sent through the youth an unnerving chill and shudder.
The deadly instrument fell from his hand, and now
rushing upon him, the crowd drew him to the ground,
and taking from him every other weapon, pinioned his
arms closely behind him. He turned away with
something of horrow in his countenance as he met the
second gaze of his father, and his eyes rested with a
painful solicitude upon the wo-begone visage of
Matiwan, who had, after her late effort, again sunk
down at the feet of Sanutee. He looked fondly, but
sadly upon her, and with a single sentence addressed
to her, he offered no obstacle while his captors led
him away.
Matiwan said he,thou hast bound
Occonestoga
for his enemies. Thou hast given him to
Opitchi-Manneyto
.
The woman heard no more, but as they bore him
off, she sunk down in momentary insensibility upon
the spot where she had lain through the greater part
of the recent controversy. Sanutee, meanwhile, with
much of the character of ancient Roman patriotism,
went forth with the rest, on their way to the council;
one of the judgesindeed, the chief arbiter upon
the destinies of his son.
CHAPTER XXV.
The pain of death is nothing. To the chief,
The forest warrior, it is good to die
To die as he has lived, battling and hoarse,
Shouting a song of triumph. But to live
Under such doom as this, were far beyond
Even his stoic, cold philosophy.
It
was a gloomy amphitheatre in the deep forests
to which the assembled multitude bore the unfortunate
Occonestoga. The whole scene was unique in that
solemn grandeur, that sombre hue, that deep spiritual
repose, in which the human imagination delights to
invest a scene which has been rendered remarkable
for the deed of punishment or crime. A small swamp
or morass hung upon one of its skirts, from the rank
bosom of which, in numberless millions, the flickering
fire-fly perpetually darted upwards, giving a brilliance
of animation to the spot, which, at that moment, no
assemblage of light or life could possibly enliven.
The ancient oak, a bearded Druid, was there to
contribute
to the due solemnity of all associationsthe
gnarled and stunted hickory, the ghostly cedar, and
here and there the overgrown pine,--all rose up in
their primitive strength, and with an undergrowth
around them of shrub and flower, that scarcely at any
time in that sheltered and congenial habitation had
found it necessary to shrink from winter. In the centre
of the area thus invested, rose a high and venerable
mound, the tumulus of many preceding ages, from the
washed sides of which might now and then be seen
protruding the bleached bones of some ancient warrior
or sage. A circle of trees, at a little distance, hedged
it in,made secure and sacred by the performance
there of many of their religious rites and offices,
themselves, as they bore the broad arrow of the
Yemassee
,
being free from all danger of overthrow or
desecration by Indian hands.
Amid the confused cries of the multitude, they
bore the captive to the foot of the tumulus, and bound
him backward, half reclining upon a tree. An hundred
warriors stood around, armed according to the manner
of the nation, each with tomahawk, and knife, and bow.
They stood up as for battle, but spectators simply, and
taking no part in the proceeding. In a wider and
denser circle, gathered hundreds morenot the
warriors
,
but the peoplethe old, the young, the women
and the children, all fiercely excited and anxious to see
and take part in a ceremony, so awfully exciting to an
Indian imagination; conferring, as it did, not only the
perpetual loss of human caste and national
consideration
,
but the eternal doom, the degradation, the denial of,
and the exile from, their simple forest heaven.
Interspersed
with this latter crowd, seemingly at regular
intervals, and with an allotted labour, came a number of
old women, not unmeet representatives, individually,
for either of the weird sisters of the Scottish Thane,
So withered and so wild in their attire
and, regarding their cries and actions, of whom we may
safely affirm, that they looked like any thing but
inhabitants
of earth! In their hands they bore, each of
them, a flaming torch, of the rich and gummy pine;
and these they waved over the heads of the multitude
in a thousand various evolutions, accompanying each
movement with a fearful cry, which, at regular periods,
was chorused by the assembled mass. A bugle, a
native instrument of sound, five feet or more in length,
hollowed out from the commonest timber, the cracks
and breaks of which were carefully sealed up with the
resinous gum oozing from their burning torches, and
which, to this day, borrowed from the natives, our
negroes employ on the southern waters with a peculiar
compass and variety of notegave forth at intervals,
timed with much regularity, a long, protracted, single
blast, adding greatly to the solemnity of a scene, one
of the most imposing among their customs. At the
articulation of these sounds, the circles continued to
contract, though slowly; until, at length, but a brief
space lay between the armed warriors, the crowd, and
the unhappy victim.
The night grew dark of a sudden, and the sky was
obscured by one of the brief tempests that usually usher
in the summer, and mark the transition, in the south, of
one season to another. A wild gust rushed along the
wood. The leaves were whirled over the heads of the
assemblage, and the trees bent downward, until they
eracked and groaned again beneath the wind. A feeling
of natural superstition crossed the minds of the
multitude
,
as the hurricane, though common enough in that
region, passed hurriedly along; and a spontaneous and
universal chorus of prayer rose from their lips, in their
own wild and emphatic language, to the evil deity whose
presence they beheld in its progress.
Thy wing, Opitchi-Manneyto,
It o'erthrows the tall trees
Thy breath, Opitchi-Manneyto,
Makes the waters tremble
Thou art in the hurricane,
When the wigwam tumbles
Thou art in the arrow-fire,
When the pine is shiver'd
But upon the Yemassee,
Be thy coming gentle
Are they not thy well-beloved?
Bring they not a slave to thee?
Look! the slave is bound for thee,
'Tis the Yemassee that brings him.
Pass, Opitchi-Manneyto
Pass, black spirit, pass from us
Be thy passage gentle.
And, as the uncouth strain rose at the conclusion into
a diapason of unanimous and contending voices, of old
and young, male and female, the brief summer tempest
had gone by. A shout of self-gratulation, joined with
warm acknowledgments, testified the popular sense
and confidence in that especial Providence, which even
the most barbarous nations claim as for ever working
in their behalf.
At this moment, surrounded by the chiefs and
preceded
by the great prophet or high-priest,
Enoree-Mattee
,
came Sanutee, the well-beloved of the
Yemassee
,
to preside over the destinies of his son. There
was a due and becoming solemnity, but nothing of the
peculiar feelings of the father, visible in his
countenance
.
Blocks of trees were placed around as seats
for the chiefs, but Sanutee and the prophet threw
themselves, with more of imposing veneration in the
proceeding, upon the edge of the tumulus, just where
an overcharged spot, bulging out with the crowding
bones of its inmates, had formed an elevation answering
such a purpose. They sat directly looking upon the
prisoner, who reclined, bound securely upon his back
to a decapitated tree, at a little distance before them.
A signal having been given, the women ceased their
shoutings, and approaching him, they waved their
torches to closely above his head as to make all his
features distinctly visible to that now watchful and
silent multitude. He bore the examination with a stern,
unmoved cast of expression, which the sculptor of
marble might well have desired for his block. While
the torches waved, one of the women now cried aloud,
in a barbarous chant, above him
Is not this a Yemassee?
Wherefore is he bound thus
Wherefore, with the broad arrow
On his right arm growing,
Wherefore is he bound thus
Is not this a Yemassee?
A second woman now approached him, waving her
torch in like manner, closely seeming to inspect his
features, and actually passing her fingers over the
emblem upon his shoulder, as if to ascertain more
certainly
the truth of the image. Having done this, she
turned about to the crowd, and in the same barbarous
sort of strain with the preceding, replied as follows:
It is not the Yemassee,
But a dog that runs off.
From his right arm take the arrow,
He is not the Yemassee.
As these words were uttered, the crowd of women and
children around cried out for the execution of the
judgment thus given, and once again flamed the torches
wildly, and the shoutings were general among the
multitude. When they had subsided, a huge Indian
came forward directly before the prisonersmeared
with blood and covered with scalps which, connected
together by slight strings, formed a loose robe over his
shoulders. In one hand he carried a torch, in the
other a knife. This was Malatchie, the executioner
of the nation. He came forward, under the instructions
of Enoree-Mattee, the prophet, to claim the slave of
Opitchi-Manneyto,that is, in our language, the slave
of hell. This he did in the following strain:
'Tis Opitchi-Manneyto
In Malatchie's ear that cries,
That is not the Yemassee
And the woman's word is true
He's a dog that should be mine,
I have hunted for him long.
From his master he hath run,
With the stranger made his home,
Now I have him, he is mine
That Opitchi-Manneyto.
And, as the besmeared and malignant executioner
howled his fierce demand in the very ears of his
victim
,
he hurled the knife which he carried, upwards,
with such dexterity into the air, that it rested, point
downward, and sticking fast on its descent, into the
tree and just above the head of the doomed
Occonestoga
.
With his hand, at the next instant, he laid a
resolute gripe upon the shoulder of the victim, as if to
confirm and strengthen his claim by actual possession;
while, at the same time, with a sort of malignant
pleasure, he thrust his besmeared and distorted visage
close into that of his prisoner. Writhing against the
ligaments which bound him fast, Occonestoga strove
to turn his head aside from the disgusting and obtrusive
presence; and the desperation of his effort, but that
he had been too carefully secured, might have resulted
in the release of some of his limbs; for the breast heaved
and laboured, and every muscle of his arms and legs
was wrought, by his severe action, into a rope, hard,
full, and indicative of prodigious strength.
There was one person in that crowd who
sympathized
with the victim; and this was Hiwassee, the
maiden in whose ears he had uttered a word, which, in
her thoughtless scream and declaration of the event,
for she had identified him, had been the occasion which
led to his captivity. Something of self-reproach for
her share in his misfortune, and an old feeling of regard
for Occonestoga, who had once been a favourite with the
young of both sexes among his people, was at work in
her bosom; and, turning to Echotee, her
newly-accepted
lover, as soon as the demand of Malatchie had been
heard, she prayed him to resist the demand. In such
cases, all that a warrior had to do was simply to join
issue upon the claim, and the popular will then
determined
the question. Echotee could not resist an
application so put to him, and by one who had just
listened to a prayer of his own, so all-important to his
own happiness; and being himself a noble youth, one
who had been a rival of the captive in his better days,
a feeling of generosity combined with the request of
Hiwassee, and he boldly leaped forward. Seizing
the knife of Malatchie, which stuck in the tree, he
drew it forth and threw it upon the ground, thus
removing the sign of property which the executioner
had put up in behalf of the evil deity.
Occonestoga is the brave of Yemassee, exclaimed
the young Echotee, while the eyes of the captive looked
what his lips could not have said. Occonestoga is
a brave of Yemasseehe is no dog of Malatchie.
Wherefore is the cord upon the limbs of a free
warrior
?
Is not Occonestoga a free warrior of Yemassee?
The eyes of Echotee have looked upon a warrior like
Occonestoga, when he took many scalps. Did not
Occonestoga lead the Yemassee against the
Savannahs
?
The eyes of Echotee saw him slay the
red-eyed
Suwannee, the great chief of the Savannahs. Did
not Occonestoga go on the war-path with our young
braves against the Edistoes, the brown-foxes that came
out of the swamp? The eyes of Echotee beheld him.
Occonestoga is a brave, and a hunter of Yemassee
he is not the dog of Malatchie. He knows not fear.
He hath an arrow with wings, and the panther he runs
down in chase. His tread is the tread of a sly serpent
that comes, so that he hears him not, upon the track of
the red deer, feeding down in the valley. Echotee
knows the warriorEchotee knows the hunterhe
knows Occonestoga, but he knows no dog of
Opitchi-Manneyto
.
He hath drunk of the poison drink of the pale-faces
his feet are gone from the good path of the
Yemassee
he
would sell his people to the English for
a painted bird. He is the slave of Opitchi-Manneyto,
cried Malatchie, in reply. Echotee was not satisfied
to yield the point so soon, and he responded accordingly.
It is true. The feet of the young warrior have
gone away from the good paths of the Yemassee, but
I see not the weakness of the chief, when my eye
looks back upon the great deeds of the warrior. I
see nothing but the shrinking body of Suwannee under
the knee, under the knife of the Yemassee. I hear
nothing but the war-whoop of the Yemassee, when
we broke through the camp of the brown-foxes, and
scalped them where they skulked in the swamp. I
see this Yemassee strike the foe and take the scalp,
and I know OcconestogaOcconestoga, the son of the
well-belovedthe great chief of the Yemassee.
It is goodOcconestoga has thanks for Echotee
Echotee is a brave warrior! murmured the captive to
his champion, in tones of melancholy
acknowledgment
.
The current of public feeling began to set
strongly towards an expression of sympathy in behalf
of the victim, and an occasional whisper to that
effect might be heard here and there among the
multitude
.
Even Malatchie himself looked for a moment
as if he thought it not improbable that he might be
defrauded of his prey; and, while a free shout from
many attested the compliment which all were willing
to pay Echotee for his magnanimous defence of one,
who had once been a successful rival in the general
estimation, the executioner turned to the prophet and
to Sanutee, as if doubtful whether or not to proceed
farther in his claim. But all doubt was soon quieted,
as the stern father rose before the assembly. Every
sound was stilled in expectation of his words on so
momentous an occasion. They waited not long.
The old man had tasked all the energies of the
patriot, not less than of the stoic, and having once
determined upon the necessity of the sacrifice, he had
no hesitating fears or scruples palsying his
determination
.
He seemed not to regard the imploring glance
of his son, seen and felt by all besides in the
assembly
;
but with a voice entirely unaffected by the
circumstances
of his position, he spoke forth the doom
in confirmation with that originally expressed.
Echotee has spoken like a brave warrior with a
tongue of truth, and a soul that has birth with the sun.
But he speaks out of his own heartand does not
speak to the heart of the traitor. The Yemassee will
all say for Echotee, but who can say for Occonestoga
when Sanutee himself is silent? Does the Yemassee
speak with a double tongue? Did not the Yemassee
promise Occonestoga to Opitchi-Manneyto with the
other chiefs? Where are they? They are gone into the
swamp, where the sun shines not, and the eyes of
Opitchi-Manneyto are upon them. He knows them
for his slaves. The arrow is gone from their
shoulders
,
and the Yemassee knows them no longer. Shall
the dog escape, who led the way to the Englishwho
brought the poison drink to the chiefs, which made
them dogs to the English and slaves to
Opitchi-Manneyto
?
Shall he escape the doom the Yemassee
hath put upon them? Sanutee speaks the voice of
the Manneyto. Occonestoga is a dog, who would sell
his fatherwho would make us women to carry water
for the pale-faces. He is not the son of Sanutee
Sanutee knows him no more. Look,Yemassees
the well-beloved has spoken!
He paused, and turning away, sunk down silently
upon the little bank on which he had before rested;
while Malatchie, without further oppositionfor the
renunciation of his own son by one so highly esteemed
as Sanutee, was conclusive against the youth
advanced
to execute the terrible judgment upon his victim.
Oh! father, chief, Sanuteeburst convulsively
from the lips of the prisonerhear me, father
Occonestoga
will go on the war-path with thee, and with
the Yemasseeagainst the Edisto, against the
Spaniard
hear,
Sanuteehe will go with thee against the
English.But the old man bent notyielded not, and
the crowd gathered nigher.
Wilt thou have no ear, Sanutee?it is
Occonestoga
it
is the son of Matiwan that speaks to thee.
Sanutee's head sunk as the reference was made to
Matiwan, but he showed no other sign of emotion.
He moved nothe spoke not, and bitterly and
hopelessly
the youth exclaimed
Oh! thou art colder than the stone-house of the
adderand deafer than his ears. Father, Sanutee,
wherefore wilt thou lose me, even as the tree its leaf,
when the storm smites it in summer? Save me,
father.
And his head sunk in despair, as he beheld the
unchanging
look of stern resolve with which the
unbending
sire regarded him. For a moment he was
unmanned; until a loud shout of derision from the
crowd, regarding his weakness, came to the support of
his pride. The Indian shrinks from humiliation,
where he would not shrink from death; and, as the
shout reached his ears, he shouted back his defiance,
raised his head loftily in air, and with the most perfect
composure, commenced singing his song of death, the
song of many victories.
Wherefore sings he his death-song? was the
general inquiry, he is not to die!
Vol. I.K 19
Thou art the slave of Opitchi-Manneyto, cried
Malatchie to the captivethou shalt sing no lie of
thy victories in the ear of Yemassee. The slave of
Opitchi-Manneyto has no triumphand the words of
the song were effectually drowned, if not silenced, in
the tremendous clamour which they raised about him.
It was then that Malatchie claimed his victimthe
doom had been already given, but the ceremony of
expatriation and outlawry was yet to follow, and under
the direction of the prophet, the various castes and
classes of the nation prepared to take a final leave of
one who could no longer be known among them.
First of all came a band of young, marriageable
women, who, wheeling in a circle three times about
him, sung together a wild apostrophe containing a
bitter farewell, which nothing in our language could
perfectly imbody.
Go,thou hast no wife in Yemasseethou hast
given no lodge to the daughter of Yemasseethou hast
slain no meat for thy children. Thou hast no name
the women of Yemassee know thee no more. They
know thee no more.
And the final sentence was reverberated from the
entire assembly
They know thee no morethey know thee no
more.
Then came a number of the ancient menthe
patriarchs
of the nation, who surrounded him in circular
mazes three several times, singing as they did so a
hymn of like import.
Gothou sittest not in the council of Yemassee
thou shalt not speak wisdom to the boy that comes.
Thou hast no name in Yemasseethe fathers of
Yemassee, they know thee no more.
And again the whole assembly cried out, as with
one voicethey know thee no more, they know thee
no more.
These were followed by the young warriors, his old
associates, who now, in a solemn band, approached
him to go through a like performance. His eyes sunk
gloomily as they camehis blood was chilled to his
heart, and the articulated farewell of their wild chant
failed seemingly to reach his ear. Nothing but the
last sentence he heard
Thou that wast a brother,
Thou art nothing now
The young warriors of Yemassee,
They know thee no more.
And the crowd cried with themthey know thee
no more.
Is no hatchet sharp for Occonestoga?moaned
forth the suffering savage. But his trials were only then
begun. Enoree-Mattee now approached him with the
words, with which, as the representative of the good
Manneyto, he renounced him,with which he denied
him access to the Indian heaven, and left him a slave
and an outcast, a miserable wanderer amid the shadows
and the swamps, and liable to all the dooms and
terrors which come with the service of
Opitchi-Manneyto
.
Thou wast the child of Manneyto
sung the high-priest in a solemn chant, and with a
deep-toned voice that thrilled strangely amid the silence
of the scene.
Thou wast a child of Manneyto,
He gave thee arrows and an eye,
Thou wast the strong son of Manneyto,
He gave thee feathers and a wing
Thou wast a young brave of Manneyto,
He gave thee scalps and a war-song
But he knows thee no morehe knows thee no more.
And the clustering multitude again gave back the last
line in wild chorus. The prophet continued his chant:
That Opitchi-Manneyto claims thee,
He commands thee for his slave
And the Yemassee must hear him,
Hear, and give thee for his slave
They will take from thee the arrow,
The broad arrow of thy people
Thou shalt see no blessed valley,
Where the plum-groves always bloom
Thou shalt hear no song of valour,
From the old time Yemassee
K 2
Father, mother, name, and people,
Thou shalt lose with that broad arrow,
Thou art lost to the Manneyto
He knows thee no more, he knows thee no more.
The despair of hell was in the face of the victim,
and he howled forth, in a cry of agony, that for a
moment silenced the wild chorus of the crowd around,
the terrible consciousness in his mind of that privation
which the doom entailed upon him. Every feature
was convulsed with emotionand the terrors of
Opitchi-Manneyto's
dominion seemed already in strong
exercise upon the muscles of his heart, when Sanutee,
the father, silently approached, and with a pause of a
few moments, stood gazing upon the son from whom
he was to be separated eternallywhom not even the
uniting, the restoring hand of death could possibly
restore to him. And hehis once noble sonthe
pride of his heart, the gleam of his hope, the
triumphant
warrior, who was even to increase his own
glory, and transmit the endearing title of well-beloved,
which the Yemassee had given him, to a succeeding
generation. These promises were all blasted, and
the father was now present to yield him up for ever
to deny himto forfeit him, in fearful penalty, to the
nation whose genius he had wronged, and whose rights
he had violated. The old man stood for a moment,
rather, we may suppose, for the recovery of resolution,
than with any desire for his contemplation. The pride
of the youth came back to him,the pride of the
strong mind in its desolationas his eye caught the
inflexible glance of his unswerving father; and he
exclaimed bitterly and loud:
Wherefore art thou comethou hast been my foe,
not my fatherawayI would not behold thee! and
he closed his eyes after the speech, as if to relieve
himself from a disgusting presence.
Thou hast said well, OcconestogaSanutee is thy
foehe is not thy father. To say this in thy ears
has he come. Look on him, Occonestogalook up,
and hear thy doom. The young and the old of the
Yemasseethe warrior and the chief,they have all
forgotten thee. Occonestoga is no name for the
Yemassee. The Yemassee gives it to his dog. The
prophet of Manneyto has forgotten theethou art
unknown
to those who are thy people. And I, thy father
with this speech, I yield thee to Opitchi-Manneyto.
Sanutee is no longer thy fatherthy father knows thee
no moreand once more came to the ears of the
victim that melancholy chorus of the multitude
He knows thee no morehe knows thee no more.
Sanutee turned quickly away as he had spoken, and,
as if he suffered more than he was willing to show,
the old man rapidly hastened to the little mound where
he had been previously sittinghis eyes diverted from
the further spectacle. Occonestoga, goaded to madness
by these several incidents, shrieked forth the bitterest
execrations, until Enoree-Mattee, preceding Malatchie,
again approached. Having given some directions in
an under-tone to the latter, he retired, leaving the
executioner alone with his victim. Malatchie, then,
while all was silence in the crowda thick silence,
in which even respiration seemed to be suspended
proceeded to his duty; and, lifting the feet of
Occonestoga
carefully from the ground, he placed a log
under themthen addressing him, as he again bared
his knife which he stuck in the tree above his head,
he sung
I take from thee the earth of Yemassee
I take from thee the water of Yemassee
I take from thee the arrow of Yemassee
Gothou art no Yemassee,
Yemassee knows thee no more.
Yemassee knows thee no more, cried the
multitude
,
and their universal shout was deafening upon
the ear. Occonestoga said no word nowhe could
offer no resistance to the unnerving hands of Malatchie,
who now bared the arm more completely of its
covering
.
But his limbs were convulsed with the spasms
of that dreadful terror of the future which was racking
and raging in every nerve of his frame. The silence
of all indicated the general anxiety; and Malatchie
prepared to seize the knife and perform the operation,
when a confused murmur arose from the crowd around;
the mass gave way and parted, and, rushing wildly
into the area, came Matiwan, his motherthe long
black hair streamingthe features, an astonishing
likeness to his own, convulsed like his; and her action
that of one reckless of all things in the way of the
forward
progress she was making to the person of her
child. She cried aloud as she camewith a voice
that rung like a sudden death-bell through the ring
Would you keep the mother from her boy, and he
to be lost to her for ever? Shall she have no parting
with the young brave she bore in her bosom? Away,
keep me not backI will look upon, I will love him.
He shall have the blessing of Matiwan, though the
Yemassee and the Manneyto curse.
The victim heard, and a momentary renovation of
mental life, perhaps a renovation of hope, spoke out
in the simple exclamation which fell from his lips.
Oh, Matiwanoh, mother.
She rushed towards the spot where she heard his
appeal, and thrusting the executioner aside, threw her
arms desperately about his neck.
Touch him not, Matiwan, was the general cry
from the crowd.Touch him not, Matiwan
Manneyto
knows him no more.
But Matiwan knows himthe mother knows her
child, though the Manneyto denies him. Oh, boy
oh, boy, boy, boy. And she sobbed like an infant on
his neck.
Thou art come, Matiwanthou art come, but
wherefore
?to
curse like the fatherto curse like the
Manneyto, mournfully said the captive.
No, no, no! Not to cursenot to curse. When
did mother curse the child she bore? Not to curse,
but to bless thee.To bless thee and forgive.
Tear her away, cried the prophet; let
Opitchi-Manneyto
have his slave.
Tear her away, Malatchie, cried the crowd,
impatient
for the execution. Malatchie approached.
Not yetnot yet, appealed the woman. Shall
not the mother say farewell to the child she shall see
no more? and she waved Malatchie back, and in the
next instant, drew hastily from the drapery of her dress
a small hatchet, which she had there carefully
concealed
.
What wouldst thou do, Matiwan? asked
Occonestoga
,
as his eye caught the glare of the weapon.
Save thee, my boysave thee for thy mother,
Occonestogasave thee for the happy valley.
Wouldst thou slay me, motherwouldst strike the
heart of thy son? he asked, with a something of
reluctance
to receive death from the hands of a parent.
I strike thee but to save thee, my son:since they
cannot take the totem from thee after the life is gone.
Turn away from me thy headlet me not look upon
thine eyes as I strike, lest my hands grow weak and
tremble. Turn thine eyes awayI will not lose thee.
His eyes closed, and the fatal instrument, lifted above
her head, was now visible in the sight of all. The
executioner rushed forward to interpose, but he came
too late. The tomahawk was driven deep into the
scull, and but a single sentence from his lips preceded
the final insensibility of the victim.
It is good, Matiwan, it is goodthou hast saved me
the death is in my heart. And back he sunk as he
spoke, while a shriek of mingled joy and horror from
the lips of the mother announced the success of her
effort to defeat the doom, the most dreadful in the
imagination
of the Yemassee.
He is not losthe is not lost. They may not
take the child from his mother. They may not keep
him from the valley of Manneyto. He is freehe is
free. And she fell back in hysteries into the arms of
Sanutee, who by this time had approached. She had
defrauded Opitchi-Manneyto of his victim, for they
may not remove the badge of the nation from any but
the living victim.
END OF VOL. I.